ENERGY  EFFICIENCY  TECHNOLOGIES 

AND  PROGRAMS 

S.  HRG.  110–1142 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, AND 

INNOVATION 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JUNE  21,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

74–985 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director,  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director,  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE,  TECHNOLOGY,  AND  INNOVATION 

JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts,  Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 21, 2007  ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Kerry  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................

WITNESSES 

Birnbaum,  Jay,  Senior  Vice  President  and  General  Counsel,  CURRENT 
Group, LLC  ...........................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Callahan, Kateri, President, Alliance to Save Energy  ..........................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hicks,  Tom,  Vice  President,  Leadership  in  Energy  and  Environmental  De-
signs (LEED), U.S. Green Building Council  ....................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Johnson,  Douglas  K.,  Senior  Director,  Technology  Policy  and  International 
........................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Krebs,  Ph.D.,  Martha  A.,  Deputy  Director,  Research  and  Development, 
...........................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Zimmerman,  P.E.,  Charles  R.,  Vice  President,  Prototype  and  New  Format 
..................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Affairs, Consumer Electronics Association 

California Energy Commission 

Development, Wal-Mart Stores, Inc. 

APPENDIX 

He´bert,  Jack,  President  and  CEO,  Cold  Climate  Housing  Research  Center, 
prepared statement  ..............................................................................................
Letter,  dated  June  29,  2007  to  Hon.  John  F.  Kerry  and  Hon.  John  Ensign 
from George Burnes, President and CEO, Smartcool Systems Inc.  .................

Page 
1 
1 
2 

35 
37 
3 
5 

41 
43 

30 
32 

20 
22 

16 
18 

72 

61 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

ENERGY  EFFICIENCY  TECHNOLOGIES 

AND  PROGRAMS 

THURSDAY,  JUNE  21,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, AND 
INNOVATION, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:34  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253, Russell Senate Office Building, Hon. John F. Kerry, Chair-
man of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN F. KERRY, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MASSACHUSETTS 

Senator  KERRY.  This  hearing  will  come  to  order.  Thank  you  all 

very much for being here. 

I  apologize  for  being  a  moment  late.  We’re  obviously  in  the  mid-
dle of a critical debate on energy, and I’ve been busy trying to work 
on CAFE, so I apologize, we’re running a little behind. 

This  hearing  of  the  Subcommittee  is  on  the  issue  of  energy  effi-
ciency. As most people who have been focused on the issue of global 
climate  change  understand,  there  are  three  very  significant  ways 
that  you  have  an  opportunity  to  be  able  to  deal  with  it  rapidly,  to 
the  best  of  our  knowledge.  One  is  through  clean  coal  technology, 
finding a way to burn coal cleanly, carbon-neutrally, either capture 
or sequester or some other technology that may or may not appear. 
The  second  is  alternative  and  renewable  fuels,  which  we’re  busy 
debating on the floor of the Senate and otherwise. We’re moving in 
various  ways  towards  various  ethanols,  increasingly  cellulosic.  But 
also  the  potential  of  other  alternative  sources,  as  well  as  renew-
able, that may or may not make up a big difference. And the final 
fastest,  cheapest,  most  efficient,  biggest,  and  most  immediate  grab 
is energy efficiency. It’s staring us in the face. 

We  waste  stunning  amounts  of  our  produced  energy.  We  lose  it 
through  the  inefficiency  of  appliances,  through  the  inefficiency  of 
autos,  through  the  inefficiency  of  products,  through  the  problems 
with some; heating systems, i.e., leaks under the ground, and other 
kinds of systems, such as escalators that never stop running, lights 
that  never  go  off.  It’s  just  unbelievable  how  much  energy  there  is 
to  be  saved  and  grabbed,  and  what  a  significant  contribution  to 
global climate change doing so would be. 

That’s  what  we’re  here  to  talk  about  today.  Today’s  focus  is  en-
ergy  efficiency.  And  it’s  amazing  how  many  businesses  are  sud-
denly beginning to see that light bulb come on as they start to take 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

advantage  of  it  and  improve  their  bottom  line.  Lots  of  companies 
are  redesigning  their  buildings  using  environmentally  friendly 
products. The result is that, if you look at something like Texas In-
struments, in Dallas, they had a profound sea change in what they 
were  able  to  do,  or  not  do,  because  they  were  thinking  of  moving 
to China. By redesigning their building, creating a design that was 
smaller,  lower,  not  as  high,  with  pipes  that  are  straight,  not  bent 
everywhere,  so  that  it  takes  less  energy  to  move  the  fluid  through 
them, and by putting in various climate control and other kinds of 
products,  they’ve  been  saving  a  net  of  something  like  $3  million  a 
year.  And  were  able  to  keep  the  jobs  in  Dallas,  not  go  to  China, 
and continue to contribute to the base of that economy. 

There  are  countless  stories  like  that.  My  wife  was  very  involved 
in the development of a green building in Pittsburgh. She built the 
first  office  space  that  was  green,  and  subsequently,  the  contractor 
who  built  it,  who  had  never  heard  of  green  building,  has  become 
a completely green contractor, and has now funded a chair—I think 
it’s  at  the  University  of  Pittsburgh  or  Carnegie  Mellon—for  green 
building  and  they’re  teaching  green  building.  Pittsburgh  became 
the  top  green  city  in  America,  replaced  by  Portland,  Oregon,  when 
they grabbed onto green building, other places are also going green. 
They  now  have  a  convention  center  in  Pittsburgh,  it’s  an  entirely 
self-contained building. Green. The only green convention center in 
the United States. 

These  are  all  the  possibilities,  folks.  China  is  about  to  build,  lit-
erally,  several  hundred  million  green  housing  units.  They’re  look-
ing  at  ways  to  do  that,  and  they’re  turning  to  other  places  for  the 
technology to do it. There’s a huge market here. This is opportunity 
staring us in the face, and that’s what we want to talk about today. 
I’m  delighted  to  have  Mr.  Charles  Zimmerman,  the  Vice  Presi-
dent  of  Prototype  and  New  Format  Development  for  Wal-Mart 
Stores, Inc.; Ms. Kateri Callahan—I’ve got to put these on, I guess, 
for  this  stuff—the  President  of  the  Alliance  to  Save  Energy;  Mr. 
Tom  Hicks,  the  Vice  President  of  LEED of  the  U.S.  Green  Build-
ing  Council;  Dr.  Martha  Krebs,  the  Deputy  Director  of  the  Re-
search and Development of the California Energy Commission; Mr. 
Jay  Birnbaum,  Senior  Vice  President  and  General  Counsel  for  the 
CURRENT  Group;  and  Mr.  Douglas  Johnson,  the  Senior  Director 
of  Technology,  Policy,  and  International  Affairs,  for  the  Consumer 
Electronics Association. 

Welcome, all of you, and thank you very much for being here. 
Let me turn to Senator Klobuchar for her comments. 
STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Well, thank you, Mr. Chairman. Thank you 
for  holding  this  very  timely  hearing.  In  fact,  I’m  going  to  have  to 
leave  early  to  go  preside  over  the  Senate,  where  we’re  continuing 
to debate the energy bill. 

Thank  you  for  being  here  on  this  important  topic.  I’ve  certainly 
seen  more  and  more  interest,  in  our  state.  From  tiny  little  towns 
with  city  councils  who  have  decided  to  change  out  all  their  light 
bulbs,  to  major  governments  in  Minneapolis  and  our  counties  that 
are trying to do everything to make their buildings more green. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

this 

isn’t 

to  understand 

I  think  one  of  the  things  that’s  changed  in  the  last  year  is  that 
people  are  starting 
just  about 
environmentalism,  but  it’s  also  about  saving  money.  I  hope  that’s 
one of the things that you talk about as you go through your testi-
mony.  I  want  to  thank  you  for  that,  and  tell  you  that’s  where  my 
heart  is.  Set  the  standards  high,  because  I  believe  when  you  set 
those  standards  high,  which  we  really  haven’t  been  doing  in  the 
last 10 years in Washington, the investment will follow, the behav-
ior will change, and we will be much better off. 

Thank you very much. 
Senator  KERRY.  Thank  you,  Senator  Klobuchar.  And  thanks  for 
your  leadership  and  involvement  on  these  issues;  much  appre-
ciated. 

Let’s  begin  and  roll  down.  Let  me  just  warn  everybody,  we  do 
have  a  ‘‘Chair  turns  into  pumpkin’’  problem  at  about  10  of  4,  be-
cause  I’ve  got  to  go  down  to  the  State  Department  and  meet  with 
the  Secretary.  I  think  we  can  get  everything  in  here  and  have  a 
lot of questions and a good dialogue in that period of time. 

So,  Ms.  Callahan,  if  you  want  to  start,  and  we’ll  go  from  there. 

STATEMENT OF KATERI CALLAHAN, PRESIDENT, 

ALLIANCE TO SAVE ENERGY 

Ms. CALLAHAN. First, let me thank you, Mr. Chairman, for allow-

ing me to appear today. 

I’m  Kateri  Callahan.  I  serve  as  the  President  of  the  Alliance  to 
Save  Energy.  And  I’d  like  to  start  by  thanking  you  for  all  of  your 
many years of leadership on environmental issues, and particularly 
on energy efficiency. 

We  believe,  as  the  Alliance  to  Save  Energy,  that  we  have  proof 
that what you said is very true, that energy efficiency is the cheap-
est,  the  quickest,  and  the  cleanest  way  to  tackle  what  we  see  as 
the  linked  problems  of  our  growing  energy  demand:  rising  prices 
and global warming. And we believe we have the proof of that. 

We’ve  done  studies  that  show  that,  over  the  past  30  years,  en-
ergy  efficiency  improvements  and  technologies  and  public  policies 
have contributed and combined to displacing the need for about 43 
quads of energy. That’s about 40 percent of today’s energy use. And 
what  that  means  is  that  energy  efficiency  is  actually  contributing 
more  to  meeting  today’s  demand  for  energy  than  any  other  single 
resource,  including  petroleum.  Notwithstanding  that  current  con-
tribution,  and  what’s,  I  think,  so  important  and  beautiful,  if  you 
will,  about  energy  efficiency,  is  that  there  is  still  more,  and—that 
can be done, and significantly more as we try to meet the exploding 
growth in energy in a sustainable fashion. 

The McKinsey Global Institute just did a study that showed that, 
through  cost-effective,  energy  efficiency  measures,  we  can  reduce 
energy  use  in  our  homes  by  about  36  percent,  and  almost  20  per-
cent  in  our  commercial  buildings.  And  that’s  very  important,  be-
cause, as you most likely know, the buildings in the United States 
contribute about 40 percent of our CO2 loadings, and that’s a figure 
that’s  equivalent  to  India  and  Japan,  the  two  countries  combined, 
their  contribution  of  CO2.  So,  tackling  energy  use  in  buildings  is 
important. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

My testimony details a number of efficiency programs and polices 
that  we  represent.  They—we  try  to  look  at  it,  in  terms  of  sectoral 
impact—buildings,  transportation—and  then  the  utility  sector  are 
the  ones  covered  in  the  testimony  that’s  submitted  for  the  record. 
Senator  KERRY.  Let  me  just  say  that  everybody’s  testimony  will 
be  put  in  the  record,  in  full.  So,  if  you  can  each  summarize,  then 
that way that’ll give us more time to—— 

Ms. CALLAHAN. Right. 
What  we  did  was  to  try  to  build  our  recommendations  around 
our  finding  that  the  most  effective  Federal  policy  is  one  that  com-
bines  four  elements  so  that  you  get  a  continuous  cycle  of  improve-
ment.  The  first  is  to  invest  in  research  and  development  so  you 
keep  the  technologies  in  the  pipeline.  The  second  is  to  provide  in-
centives  so  that  you  create  the  initial  markets  for  those  tech-
nologies.  The  third  is  public  education  so  you  get  widespread  com-
mercialization  of  the  technologies.  Then,  once  you  have  that,  you 
put  in  place  the  codes  and  the  appliance  standards  that  allow  you 
to  set  a  minimum  efficiency  or  a  maximum  energy  allowable  use 
for the commercial projects. 

So,  on  the  first,  on  research  and  development,  one  of  the  things 
that we’re recommending is a commercial buildings initiative. That 
would provide the technologies and the knowledge base to allow us 
to get to carbon-neutral buildings, which is a goal that’s being em-
braced  by  policy  leaders  and  leading  organizations  all  across  the 
United States. That provision is actually in the Senate energy bill, 
thanks  to  Senator  Dorgan,  one  of  your  fellow  committee  members, 
and we are very pleased with that. We hope that, after authorizing 
such an initiative, it can be appropriated. 

A  second  key  element  in  the  building  sector  are  the  energy—the 
model efficiency codes that are established for commercial buildings 
and  houses  at  the  Federal  level.  We  have  sought  for,  and  actually 
have  in  the  House  bill,  but  not  in  this  bill,  a  directive  to  DOE  to 
ensure  that  we  get  a  30  percent  reduction  in  our  model  energy 
codes, reduction in energy use by 2010, and a 50 percent reduction 
in  the  new  codes  that  we  put  forward  in—by  2030.  Again,  it’s  in 
this—it’s  in  the  House  bill,  not  in  the  Senate  bill.  We’re  hopeful 
that it’ll come out in a final package. 

We  also  look  at  Federal  energy  management.  And  I  know  that’s 
something  that  Congress  has  been  very  focused  on.  We  worked 
with our Alliance Chairman, Senator Pryor—again, one of your fel-
low members—to develop a set of policies, that would create a new 
paradigm  and  structure  for  Federal  energy  management,  that  we 
believe  will  allow  the  Federal  Government  to  meet  the  aggressive 
goals you all set in EPAct 2005, and that the President put forward 
in  his  latest  Executive  Order.  Those  provisions,  again,  are  put  for-
ward  as  an  amendment  to  the  energy  bill,  and  we’re  hoping  this 
Subcommittee will support that. 

Appliance  standards,  which  you  mentioned,  Senator  Pryor—or 
Senator  Kerry,  excuse  me—are  one  of  the  most  important  things 
that  we’ve  done  in  this  country,  in  terms  of  driving  efficiency.  We 
are  proposing  a  set  of  recommendations,  of  consensus-based  appli-
ance agreements that have been developed with the manufacturers 
and the advocates, but also, and importantly, recommendations for 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

DOE  to  conduct  their  rulemakings  in  a  more  timely  fashion,  in  a 
more—put in place more effective standards. 

The  appliance  standards,  just  to  give  you  a  notion  of  the  mag-
nitude of these, the ones that we have in place today are displacing 
the  need  for  about  7  percent  of  our  current  electricity  use.  They, 
by  the  year  2010,  will  allow  us  to  not  emit  65  million  metric  tons 
of  CO2,  and  they’re  going  to  save  American  consumers  and  busi-
nesses $234 million in avoided energy costs. So, they are very effec-
tive. 

There  are  15  products  out  there  that  we’ve  identified  for  which 
there’s  no  Federal  standard.  So,  there’s  work  that  the  Congress 
could  do  here.  And  we  think  that  if  you  put  in  place  standards  on 
those  15  products,  you  could  save  about  $54  billion  in  avoided  en-
ergy costs by 2030. 

And  finally,  we’ve  recommended  programs  in  the  utility  area. 
The  utilities  in  this  country,  natural  gas  and  electricity  utilities, 
have  proven  to  be  a  very  effective  deliverer  of  energy  efficiency. 
And  so,  we’re  supporting  an  energy  efficiency  resource  standard 
that  would  require  utilities  to  implement  programs  that  result  in 
a  specified  amount  of  energy  efficiency,  or  electricity  and  natural 
gas savings. They’re very much like a renewable portfolio standard, 
so  they’re  market-based  and  flexible,  and  a  mechanism  that  will 
allow  us  really  to  put  energy  efficiency  on  par  with  other  genera-
tion. 

So,  in  conclusion,  as  you  look  to,  perhaps,  develop  legislation  on 
energy  efficiency  through  this  Subcommittee  or  other  means,  we 
stand ready to help you with that. We’ve got lots of good ideas we’d 
like  to  see  translated  into  Federal  policy.  And  we  believe  that, 
through  energy  efficiency,  you’re  not  only  going  to  transform  the 
current  energy  crisis  and  tackle  global  climate,  but  you’re  also 
going to have a win-win for consumers in terms of money back into 
their pocketbook and the creation of a stronger economy. 

Thank you for your time. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Callahan follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KATERI CALLAHAN, PRESIDENT, ALLIANCE TO SAVE ENERGY 
Introduction 

The Alliance to Save Energy is a bipartisan, nonprofit coalition of more than 120 
business,  government,  environmental  and  consumer  leaders.  The  Alliance’s  mission 
is to promote energy efficiency worldwide to achieve a healthier economy, a cleaner 
environment,  and  greater  energy  security.  The  Alliance,  founded  in  1977  by  Sen-
ators Charles Percy and Hubert Humphrey, currently enjoys the leadership of Sen-
ator Mark Pryor as Chairman; Duke Energy CEO Jim Rogers as Co-Chairman; and 
Senators  Jeff  Bingaman,  Byron  Dorgan,  and  Susan  Collins  along  with  Representa-
tives  Ralph  Hall,  Zach  Wamp  and  Ed  Markey,  as  its  Vice  Chairs.  Attached  to  this 
testimony  are  lists  of  the  Alliance’s  Board  of  Directors  and  its  Associate  members. 
The  Alliance  is  pleased  to  testify  at  a  hearing  on  energy  efficiency  technologies 
and programs. At the request of committee staff, I will focus on the energy efficiency 
of buildings, both in direct policies and by encouraging utility energy efficiency pro-
grams, but will also touch on transportation efficiency. 
Energy Efficiency: America’s Greatest Energy Resource 

Natural gas prices have doubled in the last few years, and gasoline and electricity 
prices also reached all-time highs. Recent energy price increases cost American fam-
ilies  and  businesses  over  $300  billion  each  year.  The  President  recognized  energy 
security  as  a  major  issue  in  the  State  of  the  Union  message.  And  the  world’s  sci-
entists  recently  reaffirmed  the  urgent  need  to  reduce  global  warming.  These  prob-
lems  are  not  going  to  go  away—electricity  use  in  the  United  States  is  projected  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

grow by half by 2030. Such growth will lead to higher prices, greater volatility, and 
increasing dependence on foreign natural gas as well as foreign oil. 

Energy  efficiency  is  the  quickest,  cheapest,  and  cleanest  way  not  only  to  tackle 
our  current  energy  cost  issues,  but  also  to  meet  the  anticipated  future  growth  in 
energy demand in the United States. The enormous contribution of energy efficiency 
to  meeting  our  energy  needs  is  achieved  with  little  or  no  negative  impact  on  our 
wilderness  areas,  our  air  quality,  or  the  global  climate.  Energy  efficiency  enhances 
our  national  and  energy  security  by  lessening  requirements  for  foreign  energy 
sources.  Further,  energy  efficiency  is  invulnerable  to  supply  disruptions;  is  rarely 
subject  to  siting  disputes;  is  available  in  all  areas  in  large  or  small  quantities;  and 
generally costs much less than it would to buy additional energy. 

Energy efficiency is the Nation’s greatest energy resource—efficiency now contrib-
utes  more  than  any  other  single  energy  resource  to  meeting  our  Nation’s  energy 
needs,  including  oil,  natural  gas,  coal,  or  nuclear  power.  The  Alliance  to  Save  En-
ergy  estimates  that  without  the  energy  efficiency  gains  since  1973  we  would  now 
be  using  at  least  43  quadrillion  Btu  more  energy  each  year,  or  43  percent  of  our 
actual energy use. 

Much  of  these  savings  resulted  from  Federal  energy  policies  and  programs  like 
appliance  and  motor  vehicle  standards,  research  and  development,  and  the  EN-
ERGY STAR program. Federal action for energy efficiency has been most effective 
when  it  combines  four  elements  to  create  a  cycle  of  improvement:  (1)  Support  for 
research  and  development  on  new  energy-efficiency  technologies,  (2)  Incentives  and 
early  adoption  to  create  initial  markets  for  the  most  advanced  products  and  tech-
nologies,  (3)  Public  education  to  spur  widespread  commercialization  of  efficient  op-
tions, and (4) Standards and codes to set an efficiency floor. This testimony will dis-
cuss policies in all these areas. 
The Potential Impact of Energy Efficiency in Buildings 

Building energy use is a major factor in the linked problems of energy prices, en-
ergy security, and global warming, and must be a major part of their solution. More 
than  one-third  of  all  energy  used  in  the  United  States,  and  more  than  two-thirds 
of  electricity,  goes  to  heat,  cool,  and  power  buildings.  Just  over  half  of  that  is  for 
homes, the rest for a wide variety of commercial buildings. 

Great  strides  have  been  made  in  improving  the  efficiency  of  appliances,  heating 
and  cooling  systems,  equipment,  and  the  building  envelope  (walls,  windows,  doors, 
and  roofs).  At  the  same  time  the  growing  size  of  homes  and  appliances,  and  the 
growth in electronic equipment have overwhelmed the efficiency savings. 

An even greater savings potential remains—a recent study by the McKinsey Glob-
al  Institute  found  that  measures  that  pay  for  themselves  in  10  years  would  save 
36  percent  of  energy  use  for  homes  and  19  percent  of  energy  used  for  commercial 
buildings.  A  2000  study  by  several  national  labs  estimated  that  energy-efficiency 
policies  and  programs  could  cost-effectively  reduce  U.S.  energy  use  in  residential 
buildings  by  20  percent  and  in  commercial  buildings  by  18  percent  over  a  20-year 
span,  essentially  reversing  the  growth  they  projected  in  building  energy  use.  The 
American  Institute  of  Architects  has  called  for  reducing  fossil  fuel  use  in  new  and 
renovated buildings by 60 percent by 2010 and by 100 percent by 2030. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
1
a

.

l
l

a
c
1
2
6

7 

A  combination  of  several  policies  and  programs  have  made  a  real  impact  on  sav-
ing energy in buildings, including appliance standards, building energy codes, label-
ing  programs,  tax  incentives,  and  research  and  development  of  new  technologies— 
I will talk about some of these later in the testimony. But one of the most effective 
approaches  has  been  utility  energy-efficiency  programs,  and  I  will  start  with  these. 
Utility Energy-Efficiency Programs 

Why  should  utilities  reduce  their  sales  by  helping  their  customers  reduce  energy 
consumption? Many utilities have found that helping their customers to save a kilo-
watt-hour  of  electricity  is  cheaper  and  easier  than  generating  and  delivering  that 
kilowatt-hour.  For  these  utilities  and  their  customers  energy  efficiency  is  a  key  en-
ergy resource. 

As  California  found  out  in  2001,  a  slight  excess  of  demand  for  electricity  over 
available  supply  can  cause  blackouts,  massive  price  spikes,  and  economic  turmoil. 
Small  increases  in  demand  have  doubled  retail  natural  gas  prices  nationwide  over 
the last few years, resulting in plant shutdowns and home foreclosures. Energy-effi-
ciency  programs  are  the  cheapest,  quickest,  and  cleanest  way  to  respond  to  these 
challenges.  In  California  in  2001  an  aggressive  campaign  reduced  peak  electricity 
demand by 10 percent in less than 1 year, and thus helped avoid further shortages. 
These  demand-side  management  (DSM)  programs  use  measures  such  as  rebates 
for efficient appliances, commercial lighting retrofits, and energy audits to help their 
customers  use  less  energy.  The  cost  to  the  utility  for  the  energy  savings  is  often 
around  2–4  cents  per  kilowatt-hour  (kWh),  much  less  than  the  cost  of  generating 
and  delivering  electricity.  Such  efficiency  investments  save  consumers  money,  in-
crease  consumer  comfort,  reduce  air  pollution  and  global  warming,  enhance  eco-
nomic competitiveness, and promote energy reliability and security. 

Over the last two decades, states worked with regulated utilities to avoid the need 
for about one hundred 300-Megawatt (MW) power plants. However, utility spending 
on DSM programs nationwide was cut almost in half as the electricity industry was 
partially  deregulated  in  the  late  1990s.  In  the  last  couple  years  there  has  been  a 
resurgence of interest in electricity and natural gas energy-efficiency programs, with 
new  programs  in  states  such  as  Georgia  and  Arkansas,  and  added  funding  in  lead-
ers  like  California  and  Vermont.  Some  states  have  also  chosen  to  run  similar  de-
mand reduction programs themselves. 
Utility Sector Energy-Efficiency Policies 

Recommendation: Fund the Energy Efficiency Pilot Program authorized in Section 
140 of the Energy Policy Act of 2005, and require states to consider adopting policies 
to promote utility energy-efficiency programs. 

Several  major  new  reports  have  focused  in  part  on  the  need  for  new  policies  to 

promote utility energy-efficiency programs, including: 

• The  National  Action  Plan  for  Energy  Efficiency  brought  together  more  than  50 
organizations, led by the Edison Electric Institute and the National Association 
of  Regulatory  Utility  Commissioners  (NARUC).  They  seek  ‘‘to  create  a  sustain-
able, aggressive national commitment to energy efficiency through gas and elec-
tric utilities, utility regulators, and partner organizations.’’ 

• The Western Governors’ Association Clean and Diversified Energy Initiative set 
an  ambitious  goal  of  a  20  percent  increase  in  energy  efficiency  by  2020  in  the 
West; the Energy Efficiency Task Force Report examines how to achieve it. 

• The  U.S.  Environmental  Protection  Agency’s  Clean  Energy-Environment  Guide 
to  Action  details  many  policies  and  practices  states  are  adopting  to  manage 
their energy needs and air quality. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
2
a

.

l
l

a
c
1
2
6

8 

• The  Department  of  Energy,  in  consultation  with  NARUC  and  the  National  As-
sociation  of  State  Energy  Officials,  as  well  as  the  Alliance,  issued  a  report  on 
state  and  regional  policies  that  promote  utility  energy-efficiency  programs 
under section 139 of the Energy Policy Act of 2005. 

Together  these  reports  set  forth  policies  needed  to  help  utilities  create  effective 

energy-efficiency programs. These policies include: 

Adopt  energy  efficiency  goals,  requirements,  or  commitments,  with  reporting  on 
progress  and  oversight.  For  example,  California  conducted  a  study  of  the  potential 
savings  from  cost-effective  energy-efficiency  programs  in  the  state,  set  targets  for 
each  of  its  regulated  electric  and  natural  gas  utilities,  required  each  utility  to  sub-
mit plans to meet those targets, and approved $2 billion in funding for the planned 
programs over 3 years. 

Use energy efficiency as a priority resource when planning to meet customer needs. 
As utilities in some regions plan to build the first new generating plants and trans-
mission lines in years, they are showing more interest in alternatives. For example, 
Georgia Power in its most recent Integrated Resource Planning (IRP) process agreed 
to initiate the first energy-efficiency programs in a decade. 

Provide robust and stable program funding. Funds can be provided as part of util-
ity rates or through a small surcharge on utility bills (a public benefits fund or sys-
tem  benefits  charge).  For  example,  Wisconsin  recently  increased  its  public  benefit 
fund and protected it from raids to pay for state deficits. 

Set  rates  to  incentivize  utilities  and  customers.  Typically  utilities  earn  more  by 
selling  more  energy.  It  is  important  to  ‘‘decouple’’  utility  revenues  from  sales,  or  to 
provide  utilities  with  performance  incentives  for  effective  energy-efficiency  pro-
grams, in order to align utility benefits with customer benefits. For example, North-
west Natural, a natural gas utility in Oregon, has a ‘‘conservation tariff’’ that helps 
it promote energy savings rather than sales. 

Carefully  evaluate  energy-efficiency  programs,  with  measurement  and  verification 
of  energy  savings  and  appropriate  cost-effectiveness  tests,  so  all  stakeholders  can 
rely  on  the  energy  savings.  For  example,  in  Texas  savings  estimates  used  to  meet 
the state peak load reduction requirements are verified by a contractor to the Public 
Utility Commission of Texas. 

These  policies  are  typically  set  at  a  state  level,  by  public  utility  commissions  or 
sometimes by state legislatures. However, as there are compelling national interests 
that cannot easily be addressed by individual states, Federal action is needed. While 
most  individual  states  are  not  large  enough  to  affect  the  shortage  of  natural  gas 
that  has  driven  up  prices,  concerted  Federal  action  could  have  an  impact.  In  addi-
tion,  the  grid  failures  that  blackened  much  of  the  Midwest  and  Northeast  in  2003 
showed that reliability issues are not confined within state lines. 

As  a  focus  for  Federal  policy,  the  energy  efficiency  resource  has  several  advan-

tages: 

• It is readily available in all parts of the nation, 
• It is available for direct natural gas use as well as for electricity, 
• It is cost-effective today, and 
• The potential savings are enormous. 
The Senate recognized the potential of utility energy-efficiency programs, and the 
need  for  a  Federal  role,  in  its  2005  energy  bill.  In  addition  to  the  required  report 
in  Section  139,  Section  140  authorized  $5  million  a  year  for  5  years  to  create  state 
pilot programs designed to achieve 0.75 percent annual reductions in electricity and 
natural  gas  use.  In  the  Senate  version  of  the  bill,  Section  141  would  have  required 
state  public  utility  commissions  to  consider  policies  to  promote  utility  energy-effi-
ciency  programs.  The  Alliance  urges  appropriation  of  funds  to  implement  Section 
140, which was enacted, and thanks the Senate for including funds in its appropria-
tions  bill  last  year.  We  also  strongly  support  enactment  of  Section  141.  But  we  be-
lieve more concerted Federal action is needed. 
Energy Efficiency Resource Standard 

Recommendation:  Enact  a  Federal  energy  efficiency  resource  standard  for  electric 
and  natural  gas  utility  energy-efficiency  programs,  coordinated  with  any  renewable 
electricity standard. 

Several states are already developing innovative policies to set performance stand-
ards  for  utility  energy-efficiency  programs  alongside  standards  for  generation  from 
renewable sources. 

Like  a  renewable  electricity  standard  (RES),  an  energy  efficiency  resource  stand-
ard (EERS) is a flexible performance-based and market-based regulatory mechanism 
to  promote  use  of  cost-effective  energy  efficiency  as  an  energy  resource.  An  EERS 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

requires utilities to implement energy-efficiency programs sufficient to save a speci-
fied amount of electricity or natural gas, such as 0.75 percent of the previous year’s 
sales.  Note  that  an  EERS  is  not  a  requirement  that  the  utility’s  sales  decrease  in 
absolute terms or a limit on its sales at all; it is a performance requirement for the 
utility’s energy-efficiency programs. 

An  EERS  gives  utilities  broad  flexibility  about  how  and  where  to  achieve  the  en-
ergy savings. Utilities can meet an EERS through the kinds of effective demand re-
duction programs that have been conducted in many states for years. They also may 
be  able  to  use  customer  combined  heat  and  power,  and  energy  loss  reductions  in 
the distribution system. They can implement their own programs, hire energy serv-
ice  companies  or  other  contractors,  or  sometimes  pay  other  utilities  to  achieve  the 
savings by buying credits. The program savings are independently verified. 

Usually,  the  costs  of  the  energy-efficiency  programs  must  be  recovered  from  en-
ergy  customers  through  utility  rates,  but  the  savings  from  avoided  energy  supply 
are  greater  than  the  efficiency  cost.  It  is  important  for  states  to  set  rates  in  a  way 
that utilities are not financially penalized for reduced sales due to effective energy- 
efficiency programs. 

According  to  the  American  Council  for  an  Energy-Efficient  Economy,  a  national 

0.75 percent EERS would by 2020: 

cubic feet of natural gas (14 percent) each year. 

• Save  386  billion  kWh  of  electricity  (8  percent  of  total  use)  and  3,600  billion 
• Reduce  peak  electric  demand  by  124,000  MW  (avoiding  about  400  power 
• Save consumers $64 billion (net after investments), and 
• Prevent  320  million  metric  tons  of  carbon  dioxide  greenhouse  gas  emissions 

plants), 

each year. 

An EERS and an RES may be used in combination. Renewable and efficiency re-

quirements reinforce each other in several ways in the states: 

• Texas  has  separate  renewable  and  efficiency  requirements.  The  efficiency  tar-
gets focus on peak demand—utilities are required to avoid 10 percent of the ex-
pected increase in electric peak demand through efficiency programs. They have 
easily exceeded these targets. 
• Connecticut  added  to  its  RES  a  separate  tier  under  which  utilities  are  to  save 
1  percent  of  electricity  use  each  year  through  residential  and  commercial  pro-
grams  and  combined  heat  and  power.  Pennsylvania  includes  energy  efficiency 
with certain other resources in one tier of its alternative energy portfolio stand-
ards. 
• Hawaii  and  Nevada  added  efficiency  resources  as  options  in  their  portfolio 
standards—with higher overall targets—after utilities claimed to have difficulty 
meeting  renewable  targets  (Nevada  caps  the  amount  efficiency  can  contribute). 
• California  has  a  ‘‘loading  order’’  that  sets  efficiency  as  the  preferred  resource; 
once  cost-effective  efficiency  measures  have  been  exhausted,  utilities  are  to  use 
renewable  sources,  and  only  then  traditional  sources.  The  PUC  sets  targets  for 
utility  energy-efficiency  programs  based  on  a  study  of  their  potential  savings. 
A  national  EERS  should  build  on  these  examples  and  on  state  regulatory  exper-

tise but ensure that energy efficiency meets national goals. 
Appliance Energy-Efficiency Standards 

Recommendations  for  appliance  efficiency  standards:  Strengthen  appliance  effi-

ciency standards by: 

1. adopting additional standards based on negotiated agreements, 
2.  directing  DOE  regularly  to  review  and  update  both  test  methods  and  stand-
ards  to  keep  pace  with  rapidly  changing  technology,  with  accelerated  consider-
ation of the products with the greatest energy savings, 
3.  clarifying  DOE’s  authority  to  set  standards  that  best  serve  the  public  inter-
est,  including  regional  standards  and  multiple  specifications  for  a  single  prod-
uct, 
4. clarifying that Federal preemption does not apply to products for which there 
is no Federal standard, and 
5. providing adequate and stable funding for the DOE program. 

Appliance  standards  have  been  one  of  the  most  effective  energy-efficiency  pro-
grams.  Standards  in  place  today  are  expected  to  save  7  percent  of  U.S.  electricity 
use  and  reduce  greenhouse  gas  emissions  by  65  million  metric  tons  by  2010,  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

are expected to save consumers $234 billion (this is net savings—after repaying any 
increased  first-cost  for  more  efficient  appliances).  Energy  efficiency  advocates  and 
states have identified at least 15 appliance types with significant energy savings op-
portunities  but  no  Federal  efficiency  standards  at  present.  Adopting  efficiency 
standards for these 15 products alone could save 52 TWh of electricity and 340 bil-
lion  cubic  feet  of  natural  gas  annually  by  2020,  and  save  consumers  $54  billion  in 
energy costs between now and 2030. Even more could be saved by updating existing 
Federal standards. 

In  recent  years  the  Alliance  and  other  energy-efficiency  advocates  have  focused 
much of our attention on lengthy delays and lack of progress at DOE in setting re-
quired appliance standards. Due to a provision in EPAct 2005—and a lawsuit—last 
year  DOE  set  an  explicit  schedule  for  appliance  standard  rulemakings,  which  was 
later  adopted  in  a  court  order.  So  far,  they  have  met  that  schedule.  However,  the 
two new DOE-proposed standards (on distribution transformers and residential fur-
naces) were far weaker than we and many others believe is required by Federal law, 
justified  by  DOE’s  own  data  and  analysis,  and  needed  in  order  to  meet  the  energy 
needs of our Nation. 

We urge you to monitor carefully both DOE’s adherence to its regulatory schedule 
and the actual outcome of the rulemaking process. In addition, Congress should take 
additional steps to strengthen the Federal appliance standards and testing program 
and assure that it is adequately funded. 

First,  since  EPAct  2005  we  have  reached  additional  consensus  agreements  with 
product  manufacturers  on  new  and  updated  standards.  DOE  believes  it  does  not 
have  the  authority  to  adopt  one  of  them,  for  residential  boilers.  In  addition,  effi-
ciency advocates and industry groups are currently in negotiations on several other 
products.  We  urge  Congress  to  act  promptly  to  enact  into  law  all  negotiated  agree-
ments that are reached. 

Second,  at  present,  there  is  no  requirement  for  DOE  regularly  to  review  and  up-
date all existing standards and test procedures. The existing law does require a lim-
ited number of reviews for some products, but subsequent reviews are discretionary. 
In  addition,  Congress  should  establish  a  general  requirement  for  periodic  review  of 
all standards and test procedures every 5 to 8 years, updating them if justified, and 
should  provide  funding  for  DOE  to  maintain  this  schedule.  In  particular,  DOE  test 
methods for a number of products are seriously lagging the pace of technology devel-
opment,  thus  preventing  effective  standards  for  those  products  (examples  include 
tankless  water  heaters,  products  that  use  standby  power  even  when  turned  ‘‘off,’’ 
and  many  appliances  with  advanced  electronic  controls).  If  DOE  fails  to  keep  its 
standards up-to-date, Congress should allow states to set standards to limit the de-
mands on their energy systems from those products. 

In addition, DOE has limited its schedule for setting appliance standards to Con-
gressionally-mandated  rulemakings  with  a  date  certain.  This  narrow  approach  has 
delayed consideration of some standards with the greatest potential energy savings. 
For  example,  DOE  has  identified  furnace  fans  and  residential  refrigerators  as  two 
product  standards  that  offer  the  potential  for  very  large  energy  savings,  but  the 
agency has yet to even schedule these rulemakings. Congress should direct DOE to 
begin these two important rulemakings as soon as possible. 

Third,  Congress  should  allow  DOE  to  consider  alternative  approaches  in  setting 
appliance  standards  where  these  better  serve  the  intent  of  the  law:  to  maximize 
cost-effective energy savings. We offer several examples: 

• Congress  should  explicitly  authorize  DOE  to  set  regionally-appropriate  appli-
ance standards for climate-sensitive products such as furnaces, boilers, air con-
ditioners,  and  heat  pumps,  since  regional  weather  conditions  can  significantly 
affect  the  feasibility  or  cost-effectiveness  of  a  given  technology  or  efficiency 
measure. For example, ‘‘condensing’’ furnaces can cut energy losses in half, but 
may not be cost-effective in warm areas where they are seldom used. A regional 
furnace standard would save large amounts of natural gas. 
• Congress  should  clarify  that  DOE  may  include  two  or  more  specifications  for 
different features of the product that all contribute to energy efficiency. One ex-
ample  is  the  authority  for  DOE  to  set  standards  for  air  conditioners  in  terms 
of  both  average  efficiency,  which  reduces  consumer  bills,  and  performance  dur-
ing the hottest summer days, which provides added benefit by easing the strain 
on electric utility systems during peak demand periods. A second example is the 
ability to set efficiency requirements for both direct electricity use and consump-
tion of (heated) water in the case of a dishwasher or clothes washer. 
• In  addition,  expedited  procedures  for  consideration  of  consensus  standards  pro-

posed to DOE may speed up adoption of non-controversial standards. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

Finally,  Congress  should  make  it  clear  that  Federal  law  does  not  preempt  states 
from setting their own appliance standards in the absence of a Federal standard in 
place.  This  principle  has  generally  been  upheld  in  interpretation  of  the  Federal  ap-
pliance standards laws, but in some cases it has been argued that the mere author-
ity for DOE to set standards should preempt the states, even if DOE fails to exercise 
that authority. If DOE fails to act, or if it establishes a ‘‘no standard’’ Federal stand-
ard,  a  state  should  be  able  to  adopt  its  own  energy-saving  standards  for  that  prod-
uct. 
Building Energy Codes 

One  of  the  most  important  opportunities  for  reducing  energy  use  and  costs  is  by 
designing  and  constructing  a  new  building  to  be  energy-efficient  from  the  start. 
Every new building that is not efficient represents a lost opportunity—one that will 
likely  be  with  us  for  another  30–50  years  or  longer,  a  time  frame  that  will  almost 
certainly  see  much  higher  prices  and  much  more  intense  concern  over  energy  sup-
plies, air pollution, and greenhouse gas emissions. 

There is cause for optimism in the growing interest shown by builders and devel-
opers in green buildings and rating systems such as the U.S. Green Building Coun-
cil’s  LEED;  the  bold  new  policy  commitments  to  energy  efficiency  targets  by  the 
American  Society  of  Heating,  Refrigerating  and  Air-Conditioning  Engineers 
(ASHRAE),  the  American  Institute  of  Architects,  and  the  U.S.  Conference  of  May-
ors; and the Federal Government’s own commitment (in EPAct 2005) to design new 
Federal buildings to be 30 percent more efficient than current practice. But a great 
deal of work remains to be done. Congress can support and encourage these broader 
initiatives  with  specific  actions  that  take  best  advantage  of  Federal  leverage  in 
building codes and Federal financing for home mortgages. 

Recommendations for assisting state energy-efficient building codes: 

1. Congress should direct DOE to support a process of continuous improvement 
in  the  model  energy  codes  for  both  residential  and  commercial  buildings,  tar-
geting a 30 percent reduction in new building energy use by 2010 and a 50 per-
cent savings by 2020. States should be required to adopt codes that match these 
energy savings and to achieve high rates of compliance with their codes. 
2.  To  make  sure  that  energy  codes  are  not  just  a  paper  exercise,  Congress 
should  fully  fund  the  programs  for  state  code  compliance  and  training  author-
ized in Section 128 of the Energy Policy Act of 2005. 

Under present law independent organizations (the International Code Council and 
ASHRAE)  set  national  model  residential  and  commercial  building  energy  codes. 
DOE  reviews  updates  in  the  model  building  codes  to  determine  if  the  revisions  im-
prove  energy  efficiency.  Following  that  determination,  each  state  is  required  to  re-
view and, for commercial buildings, update its own building code to meet or exceed 
the model code. However, there is no penalty for a state that fails to comply. 

Two  changes  are  needed.  First,  DOE  should  set  a  goal  for  continuous  improve-
ment  of  the  model  building  codes.  Rather  than  wait  passively  for  action  by  others, 
DOE  should  instead  take  the  initiative  to  engage  with  organizations  including 
ASHRAE  and  the  International  Code  Council  to  advance  the  model  codes  steadily 
toward specific targets: 30 percent efficiency improvement by 2010, for both residen-
tial  and  commercial  model  codes,  and  at  least  50  percent  improvement  by  2020. 
ASHRAE has already adopted a similar goal, but there is no similar urgency for res-
idential  buildings,  and  it  is  hard  to  move  diverse,  consensus-based  organizations  to 
take ambitious action. DOE support is needed both for technical underpinnings and 
to  represent  the  national  interest  in  reduced  energy  use  and  greenhouse  gas  emis-
sions. If the outside organizations fail to achieve these goals, then DOE should pro-
pose modified codes that do. 

Second,  we  need  to  encourage  state  action  to  update  and  achieve  full  compliance 
with  the  energy  codes.  States  should  be  required  to  adopt  strong  codes  for  residen-
tial as well as commercial buildings. And they should be required to achieve strong 
compliance  with  their  codes.  In  a  recent  review  of  residential  energy  code  compli-
ance  studies  from  a  dozen  states,  compliance  rates  were  found  to  vary  widely,  but 
the  average  was  far  below  100  percent,  and  typically  closer  to  40  to  60  percent.  A 
number  of  studies  have  pointed  to  the  constraints,  including  staff  time  and  exper-
tise,  facing  many  local  code  enforcement  agencies  in  making  sure  that  energy  code 
requirements  are  met,  both  at  the  design  and  permit  stage,  and  in  verifying  actual 
construction and installation practices on-site. 

Congressional  oversight  would  be  helpful  here  as  well.  The  code  compliance  pro-
gram authorized under Section 128 of EPAct 2005 is a small but important step to-
ward providing an incentive for states to adopt and enforce up-to-date energy codes; 
it  should  be  fully  funded.  In  addition,  DOE  has  not  made  the  required  determina-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

tion of energy savings on any recent code updates: the 2003, 2004, or 2006 residen-
tial IECC or the 2001 or 2004 ASHRAE commercial standard. 

Recommendations  for  Federal  standards  for  manufactured  homes  and  buildings 

funded by the Federal Government: 

1.  Congress  should  require  HUD  to  strengthen  the  national  energy  efficiency 
standards for manufactured housing to the same levels required by the model 
building code for site-built homes. 
2.  Congress  should  require  that  federally  insured  mortgages  be  available  for 
new homes only if the homes meet or exceed model energy efficiency codes. 
3. Congress should require that all new DOD Privatized Military Housing be 
designed to meet or exceed the criteria for an ENERGY STAR home. 

About one in 12 new homes in the United States is a manufactured housing unit 
(147  million  in  2005).  Because  these  homes  are  factory-produced  with  many  stand-
ardized components, manufactured housing units should be inherently more energy- 
efficient than their site-built counterparts. For example, it is much easier and more 
cost-effective  to  achieve  an  air-tight  duct  system  in  the  factory  than  on  a  construc-
tion  site.  Instead,  manufactured  homes  are  generally  much  less  efficient  than  site- 
built homes, due to poorly insulated walls and roof, single-pane windows, and ineffi-
cient  heating  and  cooling  systems.  A  2004  Pacific  Northwest  National  Laboratory 
report found that improving the energy efficiency of a manufactured home, not even 
to the current IECC, would save an average of $150–$180 per year. The initial cost 
would be about $1,000 to $1,500. 

The  Department  of  Housing  and  Urban  Development,  which  is  responsible  for 
adopting  the  Manufactured  Housing  Construction  and  Safety  Standards  (MHCSS), 
has  not  updated  these  standards  to  keep  up  with  changing  energy  prices  and  tech-
nological  advances.  As  a  result,  the  ‘‘HUD-code’’  standards  are  now  well  below  the 
comparable energy efficiency code requirements for new site-built homes. For exam-
ple,  a  new  manufactured  home  built  for  Minnesota  today  is  required  to  have  only 
as  much  wall  insulation—and  not  as  much  ceiling  and  floor  insulation—as  a  site- 
built home in Miami. 

Many of these manufactured units are sold to low and moderate income families— 
those  who  can  least  afford  to  pay  the  rising  utility  bills  for  gas,  electricity,  and  in 
some  cases  propane  heating.  And  often  taxpayers  end  up  subsidizing  the  ongoing 
costs  to  operate  these  inefficient  housing  units  through  the  Low-Income  Home  En-
ergy  Assistance  Program  (LIHEAP)  or  through  the  Low-Income  Weatherization  As-
sistance  Program,  which  helps  pay  for  energy-saving  retrofits.  It  is  far  easier  and 
cheaper to make these manufactured homes more efficient in the first place. 

To  qualify  for  a  federally  insured  mortgage,  a  new  home  should  be  required  to 
meet  or  exceed  the  efficiency  levels  of  the  model  energy  code.  This  will  assure  that 
Federal taxpayer funds are not used to underwrite inefficient new homes with high-
er utility bills—a different kind of hidden, long-term ‘‘mortgage.’’ Updated standards 
would  affect  a  lot  of  housing:  a  2003  U.S.  Census  Bureau  survey  found,  for  homes 
constructed  in  the  previous  4  years,  486,000  FHA  mortgages,  225,000  VA  mort-
gages, 29,000 USDA mortgages, and 38,000 public housing units. 

Current  law  requires  HUD  and  the  Department  of  Agriculture  (USDA)  to  set  en-
ergy-efficiency standards for public and assisted housing and new homes (other than 
manufactured homes) with federally insured mortgages. However, the agencies have 
never changed the standard from the legislated backstop of the 1992 Model Energy 
Code (the predecessor to the IECC) and ASHRAE Standard 90.1–1989. 

In  order  to  move  military  service  members  and  their  families  out  of  outdated 
housing  units,  Congress  authorized  the  Department  of  Defense  (DOD)  to  enter  fi-
nancial  partnerships  with  builders  to  construct  an  estimated  185,000  homes  using 
joint funding. DOD is leasing the homes for up to 50 years, and will pay the energy 
bills through utility allowances to the military personnel. DOD imposes many stand-
ards on these units, and energy efficiency criteria are established for some projects, 
but  there  are  no  uniform  energy  standards  applied  to  all  Privatized  Housing 
projects. If these homes are built to ENERGY STAR Homes criteria, each military 
family—and  ultimately  the  Federal  taxpayers—will  save  an  average  of  $300  a  year 
in  energy  bills.  The  added  initial  cost  of  ENERGY  STAR homes  is  about  $1,500 
to $3,000. 
Buildings Research, Development, and Deployment 

Recommendation for a buildings RD&D program: Establish and fund a long-term 
program  to  develop  and  establish  in  the  market  net-zero  energy  commercial  build-
ings. 

To create the technology and knowledge base needed to achieve the long-term goal 
of  net-zero  energy  (and  ‘‘carbon-neutral’’)  buildings,  the  Federal  Government  needs 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

to  make  a  major  commitment—in  close  partnership  with  states,  utilities,  and  the 
private  sector—to  a  comprehensive,  multi-year  program  to  transform  building  tech-
nologies and practices. This transformation must go well beyond individual technical 
measures  to  include  a  design  process  that  integrates  sustainability  from  the  start, 
and effective means of managing construction and building operation to assure con-
tinued high performance over the lifetime of the building and systems. 

The  need  is  especially  acute  in  the  commercial  buildings  sector,  where  the  chal-
lenge  of  maintaining  performance,  comfort,  occupant  health,  and  amenities  while 
radically reducing energy consumption without significantly increasing costs is even 
greater  than  for  smaller  residential  buildings.  Yet  ‘‘net-zero  energy  homes’’  rather 
than  commercial  buildings  have  received  the  lion’s  share  of  funding  and  program 
attention to date by DOE, utility and state programs, and private partnerships. 

Investing  1⁄10 of  1  percent  of  the  $135  billion  in  annual  energy  costs  for  all  U.S. 
commercial  buildings  would  represent  a  substantial  increase  over  the  current  Fed-
eral  efforts  by  DOE  and  all  other  agencies.  But  this  is  the  equivalent  of  less  than 
12  hours  of  energy  costs  for  the  Nation’s  commercial  building  stock—a  reasonable 
price to assure that we really have the technologies and practices to cut energy use 
by  more  than  half  over  the  next  two  decades.  To  be  effective,  these  funds  would 
need  to  be  directed  toward  a  well-orchestrated  plan  to  address  innovation  in  tech-
nology  and  practices,  strategic  and  well-monitored  demonstrations  of  these  new 
methods, and paths to effective large-scale deployment in new and existing commer-
cial buildings. 

Such  an  integrated  strategy  requires  careful  preparation  and  broad  engagement 
of  the  building  industry,  the  design  professions,  financial  institutions,  government 
policy-makers, and private owners and developers. There is growing interest in sus-
tainable  design  but  the  industry  is  fragmented,  risk  averse,  and  driven  largely  by 
short  term  economic  interests.  By  itself  the  Federal  Government  cannot  create  the 
needed technologies, nor force the market to accept them. But it can and should be 
the  catalyst  in  partnering  with  industry,  states,  and  utilities  for  these  essential 
steps. 
Increasing Energy Efficiency in Federal Facilities 

Recommendations for Federal energy management: 

1. Establish a procedure to implement all cost-effective efficiency improvements 
in large Federal buildings. 
2. Increase oversight and funding, and modify authority for Energy Savings Per-
formance Contracts. 

The  United  States  Federal  Government  is  the  single  largest  consumer,  and  the 
single largest waster, of energy in the world. In 2005 the Federal Government over-
all  used  1.6  quadrillion  Btu  of  ‘‘primary’’  energy  (including  the  fuel  used  to  make 
the electricity it consumed), or 1.6 percent of total energy use in the United States. 
Taxpayers in this country paid $14.5 billion for that energy. Almost half of that en-
ergy,  and  more  than  half  of  the  cost,  was  for  vehicles  and  equipment,  primarily  for 
military  planes,  ships,  and  land  vehicles.  The  rest,  0.9  quadrillion  Btu  at  a  cost  of 
$5.6  billion,  was  for  heating,  cooling,  and  powering  more  than  500,000  Federal 
buildings around the country. 

Repeated  efforts  over  the  last  two  decades  have  resulted  in  dramatic  energy  and 
cost  savings,  but  large  cost-effective  savings  remain  available.  Overall  Federal  pri-
mary energy use decreased by 13 percent from 1985 to 2005, and the Federal energy 
bill  decreased  by  25  percent  in  real  terms,  even  after  the  27  percent  jump  in  fuel 
prices in the United States in 2005. Congress and the president have set even more 
aggressive  targets  for  future  savings  that  could  yield  well  over  $1  billion  in  energy 
cost savings each year from Federal buildings alone. 

But  these  savings  will  not  occur  without  greater  funding  and  oversight.  In  addi-
tion  to  greater  appropriations,  the  Alliance  supports  a  new  focus  on  energy  effi-
ciency  throughout  Federal  buildings  and  increased  use  of  Energy  Savings  Perform-
ance Contracts (ESPCs) and Utility Energy Service Contracts (UESCs). The Alliance 
believes  that  a  new  paradigm  and  a  new  structure  are  needed  to  ensure  that  all 
large Federal buildings are made energy-efficient, that improvements are not made 
just  when  appropriations  happen  to  be  available  or  an  energy  manager  happens  to 
be  a  champion  of  efficiency.  Thus  we  recommend  a  package  of  policies  that  have 
been introduced in a new bill by Senator Pryor, S. 1434: 

• All  large  Federal  buildings  and  facilities  should  conduct  comprehensive  energy 
and  water  savings  evaluations  (‘‘energy  audits’’)  to  identify  and  prioritize  all 
economic  opportunities  for  investments  to  reduce  energy  and  water  use.  These 
evaluations  should  consider  both  capital  investments,  such  as  a  new  boiler  or 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

chiller,  and  operational  improvements,  such  as  checking  and  adjusting  lighting 
or mechanical system controls. 
• Agencies  should  implement  all  measures  identified  in  the  energy  and  water 
evaluations that have a simple payback of fifteen years or less. The calculation 
of cost savings should consider not only energy and water costs but also reduced 
costs  of  building  operations,  maintenance,  repair,  and  equipment  replacement. 
• It  is  critical  that  the  agencies  not  only  make  the  capital  investments  but  also 
make  sure  that  the  measures  work,  and  keep  on  working.  Start-up  commis-
sioning,  and  periodic  recommissioning,  are  an  essential  part  of  all  measures  to 
ensure  that  they  work  as  intended—followed  by  effective  operation,  mainte-
nance, and repair as well as measurement and evaluation of savings. 
• Sustained  oversight  is  needed  to  ensure  that  every  agency  is  implementing 
these measures. While Congressional action is important, the first level of over-
sight  should  be  agency  self-certification  through  an  open  web-based  tracking 
system, along with benchmarking of building energy and water use, and reviews 
in  the  agency  energy  scorecards  that  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget  al-
ready prepares. 
• Both  the  energy-savings  evaluations  and  the  measures  themselves  should  be 
funded through a combination of increased appropriations and private financing 
through ESPCs and UESCs. 

The  Alliance  also  supports  additional  modifications  to  ESPC  authority  to  remove 
a  number  of  arbitrary  impediments.  First,  the  authority  for  Federal  agencies  to 
enter into ESPCs should be permanently extended, to avoid the problems that have 
occurred with the lapse of authority in 2003–2004. Second, energy managers should 
be  able  to  use  appropriated  funds  and  financing  through  ESPCs  to  fund  the  same 
project.  Third,  Congress  should  end  any  self-imposed  agency  caps  on  the  duration 
of  ESPC  contracts  below  the  statutory  limit  of  25  years  and  on  total  obligations 
under ESPCs. 
Energy Efficiency Tax Incentives 

Recommendations for energy-efficiency tax incentives: 

1. Provide long-term extensions, with improvements, of tax incentives for highly 
efficient new homes, home improvements, commercial buildings, appliances, and 
vehicles. 
2.  Enact  a  vehicle  fuel  use  ‘‘feebate,’’  with  incentives  for  fuel-efficient  vehicles 
paid for by a fee for gas guzzlers, to reduce fuel use in all vehicles. 

The Energy Policy Act of 2005 (EPAct 2005) included important tax incentives for 
highly  energy-efficient  new  homes,  improvements  to  existing  homes,  commercial 
buildings, heating and cooling equipment, appliances, fuel cells, and hybrid and ad-
vanced  diesel  vehicles.  These  incentives  for  consumers  and  businesses  have  the  po-
tential to help transform markets to embrace energy-efficient technologies and thus 
to help the best buildings, vehicles, and equipment become mainstream. 

Unfortunately, most of the EPAct 2005 incentives were not put in place for a long 
enough period of time to ensure market transformation. Most of the incentives were 
limited  to  2  years—expiring  on  December  31,  2007.  And,  while  two  of  the  incen-
tives—for  commercial  buildings  and  new  homes—were  extended  for  1  year  and  so 
now are set to expire at the end of 2008, this is still not adequate to ensure a mean-
ingful  impact  on  the  market.  A  large  commercial  building  initiated  when  the  bill 
was signed in August 2005 will not be finished before the commercial buildings de-
duction  was  set  to  expire  in  December  2007.  A  building  initiated  now  could  not  be 
finished  before  the  new  expiration  date  in  2008.  In  order  for  these  tax  incentives 
to be effective in creating a market transformation toward greater energy efficiency 
and  reductions  in  energy  use  they  need  to  be  given  more  time  to  work.  Lifting  or 
increasing the caps on the incentives for hybrid vehicles is equally important. 

The  Alliance  also  supports  a  new,  performance-based  tax  credit  for  whole  home 
retrofits that save energy, included in the EXTEND Act, which we thank the Chair-
man  for  cosponsoring.  The  credit  is  on  a  sliding  scale  based  on  percentage  energy 
savings,  starting  with  homes  that  are  certified  as  saving  20  percent  of  energy  use. 
This new approach should encourage much greater energy savings by helping home-
owners  find  the  best  measures  for  their  homes  and  subsequently  ensuring  that  the 
savings  are  realized  from  the  improvements  made.  The  new  credit  will  require  an 
inspection  and  certification  of  the  energy  savings  in  order  to  establish  the  level  of 
credit to be received. 

And  the  Alliance  supports  a  more  comprehensive  approach  to  incentivizing  more 
fuel-efficient vehicles. A new, innovative approach to encouraging efficiency of light- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

duty cars and trucks is a national ‘‘feebate’’ system. A national feebate would apply 
a fee or rebate to new vehicles based on the expected lifetime fuel use of the vehicle. 
We  would  recommend  that  the  fee  and  rebate  apply  to  manufacturers  of  all  light- 
duty  passenger  vehicles—including  SUVs  and  minivans—but  they  could  be  deter-
mined relative to vehicles in the same class or to vehicles of the same size. The fee 
or  rebate  would  then  be  proportional  to  the  fuel  economy,  determined  relative  to  a 
dividing line or reference mpg. 

We  would  recommend  setting  this  dividing  line  between  fees  and  rebates  each 
year such that the total fees would pay for all the rebates thereby allowing the pro-
gram  to  operate  at  no  cost  to  the  government.  Under  such  an  arrangement,  about 
half  the  vehicles  would  receive  a  rebate,  and  about  half  the  vehicles  would  be  as-
sessed a fee. 

This would create an incentive for manufacturers to use fuel-efficient technologies 
in  the  vehicles  they  produce,  and  hence  should  increase  the  availability  of  efficient 
vehicles,  as  well  as  creating  an  incentive  for  consumers  to  purchase  more  efficient 
vehicles.  As  fuel  economies  increased,  the  reference  mpg’s  would  be  ratcheted  up, 
creating  an  incentive  for  continual  improvement,  but  never  out  of  line  with  the  ex-
isting  market.  This  policy  has  the  potential  to  improve  fuel  economies  throughout 
the passenger vehicle fleet, not just give new technologies a foothold in the market-
place. 
Transportation 

Given  that  the  transportation  sector  accounts  for  two-thirds  of  U.S.  oil  use  and 
that passenger cars and light trucks consume 40 percent of that oil, it is critical that 
we address vehicle fuel consumption. There is no shortage of technologies to improve 
vehicle fuel efficiency. Many of these technologies are already in vehicles, including 
electronic  controls  and  ignition,  light  weight  materials,  improved  engine  designs. 
Other  technologies  are  now  being  pulled  ‘‘off  the  shelf’’  and  increasingly  deployed 
in new vehicles. They include (for example): 

• Variable Cylinder Management—turns off cylinders when not in use. 
• Advanced Drag Reduction—further reduces vehicle air resistance. 
• Variable Valve Timing and Lift—optimizes the timing of air intake into the cyl-
• Reductions in Engine Friction—using more efficient designs, bearings and coat-
• Hybrid  Drive  Trains—internal  combustion  engine  combined  with  electric  motor 

ings that reduce resistance between moving parts. 

inder with the spark ignition. 

and regenerative braking. 

While advanced technologies have been, and continue to be, deployed in new cars 
and  trucks,  we’re  not  getting  more  miles  per  gallon  (mpg)  as  a  result.  We  are  get-
ting more towing capacity, more acceleration, more weight, and more space. 

For the last 20 years, the Nation’s oil policy has in effect been made in America’s 
car  showrooms.  It  is  time  for  the  Federal  Government  to  provide  more  guidance  in 
the  vehicle  marketplace.  I  have  already  discussed  the  idea  of  a  vehicle  fuel  use 
‘‘feebate.’’  But  the  most  important  single  policy  would  be  a  strong  increase  in  Cor-
porate Average Fuel Economy Standards. 

Between  1975  and1985,  fuel  economy  standards  were  used  to  help  achieve  a  70 
percent  improvement  in  new  vehicle  fuel  economy.  But  since  the  mid-1980s,  CAFE 
standards  have  been  largely  unchanged.  Worse,  old  testing  methods,  a  loophole  for 
‘‘trucks’’, and credit for ‘‘dual-fuel’’ vehicles that almost always run on gasoline have 
further weakened existing CAFE standards. EIA estimates that the actual fuel econ-
omy of vehicles is about 20 percent lower than the CAFE standard test results sug-
gest.  If  we  are  to  address  the  interconnected  issues  of  gas  prices,  oil  imports,  and 
climate  change,  we  need  to  reform  and  significantly  increase  CAFE  standards  in 
order to direct our technological ingenuity to saving fuel. 
Conclusion 

The Energy Policy Act of 2005 included some important measures to reduce build-
ing  energy  use,  including  new  appliance  standards  and  tax  incentives.  But,  while 
helpful, they were not aggressive enough to address the critical energy issues facing 
our  Nation.  In  the  last  year  and  a  half,  concern  about  the  linked  issues  of  energy 
prices, energy security, and global warming has only grown. There are measures we 
could and should take, such as consumer education, that would have an immediate 
impact. But polls also show that a large majority of Americans are rightly more con-
cerned that Congress find long-term energy solutions than that Congress quickly ad-
dress  current  prices.  There  is  an  opportunity  now  to  enact  significant  energy-effi-
ciency  measures  that  will  benefit  the  economy,  the  environment,  and  energy  secu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

rity  for  years  to  come.  The  buildings  being  designed  and  constructed  today  will  de-
termine our energy use for decades to come. The Alliance urges you to seize the op-
portunity  to  reduce  energy  waste,  supply  shortages,  price  volatility,  pollution,  and 
global warming, to transform energy crises into economic opportunities. 

Senator  KERRY.  Thank  you  very  much,  Ms.  Callahan.  We  appre-

ciate it. 

Mr. Zimmerman? 

STATEMENT OF CHARLES R. ZIMMERMAN, P.E., 

VICE PRESIDENT, PROTOTYPE AND NEW FORMAT 

DEVELOPMENT, WAL-MART STORES, INC. 

Mr.  ZIMMERMAN.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Kerry  and  distinguished 

members of the Committee. 

My name is Charles Zimmerman, and I’m Vice President of Pro-
totype  and  New  Format  Development  for  Wal-Mart  Stores.  In  my 
current  role,  I’m  responsible  for  the  architectural  and  engineering 
system design for all of our retail facilities. 

On behalf of Wal-Mart and our 1.8 million associates around the 
world,  I’d  like  to  thank  the  Subcommittee  for  its  work  on  this  im-
portant  issue  and  for  holding  this  hearing  today.  Wal-Mart  appre-
ciates the opportunity to participate in this critical discussion. 

Our  company  holds  a  really  unique  position  in  the  world  of  en-
ergy. While there are no firm statistics, it is widely understood that 
Wal-Mart  is  the  largest  private  purchaser  of  electricity  in  the 
world. Since energy is also Wal-Mart’s second largest operating ex-
pense, it should come as no surprise that we’ve been focused on en-
ergy efficiency practically since the day we were founded. 

Fortunately, our global presence gives us a great opportunity for 
energy  efficiency  comparisons.  As  Wal-Mart  has  continued  to  ex-
pand into other countries, our primary mode of expansion has been 
to  acquire  existing  stores  in  those  countries;  therefore,  it  is  inter-
esting to note that the stores we have built in the U.S. are actually 
more  energy  efficient  than  those  we  have  acquired  in  any  other 
country  thus  far.  This  is  even  true  for  stores  in  countries  with 
much  most  stringent  energy  regulation  and  much  higher  utility 
rates than the U.S., such as the U.K. and Japan. 

In fact, the stores we acquired in the U.K. actually use twice the 
energy,  and  our  stores  in  Japan,  one  and  a  half  times  as  much  as 
energy,  as  our  stores  in  the  U.S.  This  is  because  Wal-Mart  has  al-
ways recognized what many other companies have not, and that is 
that energy is not a noncontrollable expense. 

Since  nearly  one-third  of  Wal-Mart’s  energy  is  consumed  in  the 
form of lighting, we have developed, over the last decade, what we 
feel  is  one  of  the  most  energy  efficient  lighting  systems  in  the 
world. In fact, our installed lighting load in one of our newer stores 
is  nearly  50  percent  less  than  the  baseline  requirements  estab-
lished  in  the  Energy  Policy  Act  of  2005.  This  truly  innovative  sys-
tem  results  in  the  fact  that  during  daylight  hours,  our  sales  floor 
lighting  is  either  off  or,  at  the  very  least,  significantly  dimmed. 
This  is  possible  thanks  to  a  sophisticated  daylight  harvesting  sys-
tem  comprised  of  hundreds  of  skylights  per  store  that  are  con-
nected  to  sensors  and  the  state-of-the-art  control  technology.  This 
allows  our  sales  floor  lighting  system  to  continually  modulate  the 
amount of energy needed based on the natural light available. This 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

system is so dynamic that it even gradually ramps the lighting lev-
els up and down as clouds pass over the store. 

In  our  non-sales-floor  areas,  such  as  offices,  breakrooms,  and 
restrooms, lighting is controlled by occupancy sensors that turn off 
the lights when no one is in the space. Even our freezer-case light-
ing  has  now  evolved  into  an  amazing  display  of  advanced  tech-
nology,  as  it  is  now  comprised  of  motion-activated  LEDs,  or  light- 
emitting diodes. These lights turn themselves on as a customer ap-
proaches, and then turn themselves off as the customer leaves. The 
result  is  a  lighting  system  where  virtually  all  the  lighting  in  the 
building  is  dynamic  and  only  ‘‘on’’  to  the  degree  that  conditions 
warrant. 

And  this  is  just  lighting.  Similar  dynamic  efforts  are  underway 

with our HVAC and refrigeration systems. 

As  efficient  and  forward-thinking  as  our  energy  practices  have 
always  been,  we  also  have  very  aggressive  goals  in  our  sustain-
ability and energy efficiency efforts for the future. 

In  October  of  2005,  we  announced  plans  to  reduce  the  energy 
consumption  in  our  already  energy  efficient  existing  buildings  by 
another  20  percent  by  2012.  We  also  announced  plans  to  develop 
a new store prototype that will increase efficiency another 25 to 30 
percent  by  2009.  In  an  effort  to  eclipse  these  goals,  we  currently 
have over a dozen retrofit initiatives that are in some phase of de-
velopment  or  implementation.  In  fact,  we  will  retrofit  over  1,300 
existing  stores  in  the  U.S.  this  year  alone  with  either  HVAC,  re-
frigeration,  or  lighting  retrofits,  or  a  combination  of  all  three. 
These  1300  retrofits  all  result  in  paybacks  of  2  years  or  less,  and 
energy savings approaching 18 percent. 

We  are  also  applying  these  technologies  to  our  new-store  pro-
gram  and  will  open,  within  the  next  12  months,  stores  that  meet 
or exceed our 25 to 30 percent efficiency goal. 

As  proud  as  we  are  of  these  accomplishments  and  innovations, 
we are even more proud to share what we are learning with every-
one,  including  our  competitors.  The  best  thing  about  the  informa-
tion we are sharing is not—is that it’s not theory, it is proven, real 
initiatives with proven, real paybacks. 

I  am  often  told  by  others  that  until  there  are  new  technologies, 
or  until  there  is  additional  legislation,  energy  efficiency  will  never 
achieve  mainstream  attractiveness.  Believe  me,  the  technology  ex-
ists. We’re examples of that. Wal-Mart is not waiting for legislation 
to  cause  us—proactively,  but  we  would  like  to  encourage  Congress 
to  continue  to  look  at  new  incentives  that  will  help  others  act 
proactively, as well. 

In conclusion, I’m very proud to work for a company that is com-
mitted  to  invest  up  to  $500  million  per  year  to  move  toward  our 
goal  of  being  supplied  by  100  percent  renewable  energy,  but  I  am 
even  more  proud  that  they  encourage  me  to  proactively  share  our 
innovations with the world. 

We, at Wal-Mart, applaud Congress in its efforts to communicate 
the necessity and the benefits of energy efficiency. We look forward 
to working with you to effectively and constructively address these 
issues. 

Thank  you  for  your  time  and  allowing  me  to  speak  on  behalf  of 

Wal-Mart on this very important topic. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Zimmerman follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHARLES R. ZIMMERMAN, P.E., VICE PRESIDENT, 

PROTOTYPE AND NEW FORMAT DEVELOPMENT, WAL-MART STORES, INC. 

Committee: 

Chairman  Kerry,  Ranking  Member  Ensign  and  distinguished  Members  of  the 

Wal-Mart  Stores,  Inc.,  thanks  the  Subcommittee  for  its  work  on  this  important 
issue and for holding this hearing today, and we appreciate the opportunity to par-
ticipate in this critical discussion. 
Background 

Wal-Mart is based in Bentonville, Arkansas. Our company employs approximately 
1.3  million  Associates  from  all  50  states  and  approximately  1.8  million  Associates 
worldwide. Each week over 176 million customers worldwide choose to shop at Wal- 
Mart,  which  we  feel  reflects  the  success  of  our  dedication  to  providing  Every  Day 
Low Prices to our customers. Wal-Mart does not just operate stores, clubs, and dis-
tribution centers in communities; we take a proactive stance in community involve-
ment on a number of issues. 
Purpose of Hearing and Wal-Mart’s Role 

The purpose of this hearing is to better understand the technologies and practices 
available today that increase energy efficiency and reduce greenhouse gas emissions. 
Wal-Mart  is  eager  to  share  its  information  and  experiences  and  we  applaud  the 
Committee for its interest in this important subject. 
Wal-Mart’s Policies and Procedures 

Wal-Mart takes a keen interest in the serious risks—and opportunities—of global 
climate change. More than 2 years ago our CEO Lee Scott announced that Wal-Mart 
would make ‘‘sustainability’’ an organizing principle for the company. In recognizing 
that climate change is among the greatest issues confronting our business, our cus-
tomers, and our communities, he announced three goals for our company: to be sup-
plied  100  percent  by  renewable  energy;  to  create  zero  waste;  and  to  sell  products 
that sustain our resources and the environment. Since that time we have acted rap-
idly to become a cleaner, greener and more sustainable company. This past January 
we  announced  our  support  of  the  effort  by  the  companies  and  organizations  of  the 
U.S. Climate Action Partnership (US–CAP), and endorsed the group’s call for strong 
mandatory  national  policies  and  market-based  programs  for  greenhouse  gas  reduc-
tions.  Wal-Mart  looks  forward  to  working  with  Congress  and  the  White  House  to 
enact meaningful legislation to slow, stop and reverse the growth of greenhouse gas 
emissions. To be clear, we take this position because we believe it is in the best in-
terest  of  our  customers,  our  employees,  our  stockholders  and  our  Nation  to  tackle 
this challenge. But we also believe that with the right policies, businesses large and 
small—from Wal-Mart, to our suppliers, to small businesses across the country—can 
save. We believe this because of what we are seeing every day as we undertake our 
aggressive sustainability agenda. 

As  part  of  this  commitment,  we  intend  to  be  the  most  energy  efficient  retailer  in 

the world and we are working hard to achieve this commitment. 

While there are no firm statistics, it is widely believed that Wal-Mart is the larg-
est ‘‘private’’ purchaser of electricity in the world. In fact, Wal-Mart is widely consid-
ered to be the second largest purchaser in total energy, second only to the U.S. Gov-
ernment.  Energy  is  also  Wal-Mart’s  second  largest  operating  expense.  Therefore,  it 
should  be  no  surprise  that  Wal-Mart  has  been  focused  on  energy  efficiency  prac-
tically since it was founded. 

As  Wal-Mart  has  continued  to  expand  into  other  countries,  our  primary  mode  of 
expansion has been to acquire existing stores in those countries. The stores we have 
built  in  the  U.S.  are  more  efficient  on  an  ‘‘energy  per  square  foot  basis’’  than  those 
we have acquired in any other country. This is even true for stores in countries with 
much  more  stringent  energy  regulations  than  current  U.S.  regulations  and  much 
higher utility rates, such as the UK and Japan. 

Nearly one-third of Wal-Mart’s energy is consumed in the form of lighting. Recog-
nizing  this  as  an  opportunity  for  responsible  business  practice,  we  have  developed 
over  the  last  decade,  what  we  feel  is,  one  of  the  most  efficient  lighting  systems  in 
the world. Our installed lighting load is more than 40 percent less than the baseline 
requirements established in the Energy Policy Act of 2005. 

During  the  day,  sales  floor  lighting,  in  stores  built  in  the  last  decade,  is  off  or 
significantly dimmed. This is possible thanks to a sophisticated daylight harvesting 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

system  comprised  of  hundreds  of  skylights  per  store  that  are  connected  to  state-of- 
the-art  sensors  and  control  technology.  This  allows  our  sales  floor  lighting  system 
to  continually  modulate  the  amount  of  energy  needed,  based  on  the  natural  light 
available. This system is so dynamic that it gradually ramps up and down as clouds 
pass  over  the  store.  In  our  non-sales  floor  areas  such  as  offices,  break  rooms  and 
restrooms,  lighting  is  controlled  by  occupancy  sensors  that  turn  off  the  lights  when 
no  one  is  in  the  space.  Beginning  in  January,  even  our  freezer  case  lighting  has 
evolved  into  an  amazing  display  of  advanced  technology  when  it  became  comprised 
of  ‘‘motion-activated  LEDs.’’  The  lights  turn  themselves  on  as  a  customer  ap-
proaches,  and  turn  themselves  off  as  the  customer  leaves.  The  result  is  a  200,000 
square-foot  building  where  virtually  all  of  the  lighting  is  dynamic  and  only  ‘‘on’’  to 
the degree that conditions warrant. 

From an HVAC and refrigeration standpoint, Wal-Mart has always ‘‘reclaimed’’ or 
‘‘recycled’’ the waste heat from our refrigeration equipment to generate our domestic 
hot  water.  We  are  beginning  to  take  this  a  step  further  in  new  stores,  testing  the 
concept  of  heating  the  entire  store  with  the  ‘‘waste  heat’’  generated  by  this  equip-
ment. Wal-Mart views the ‘‘waste heat’’ as a source of energy and we are expanding 
the use of this ‘‘free’’ energy source. 

Wal-Mart  recognizes  the  influence  and  implications  of  responsible  energy  policy 
by  a  large  retailer.  We  strive  to  continue  to  decrease  our  footprint  on  the  environ-
ment. As efficient and forward-thinking as our energy policies already are, we have 
very  aggressive  goals  in  our  sustainability  and  energy  efficiency  efforts  for  the  fu-
ture. 

In October of 2005, we announced plans to reduce energy consumption in our ex-
isting  energy-efficient  buildings  by  20  percent  over  the  next  7  years.  We  also  plan 
to develop a new store prototype that will increase efficiency 25 percent–30 percent 
over the next 4 years. 

We also plan to retrofit over 400 of our refrigeration systems and HVAC systems 
this  year  with  technologies  that  will  reduce  our  energy  consumption  by  8  percent 
and  6  percent  respectively  and  have  a  payback  of  less  than  2  years.  Additionally, 
we have recently approved an investment of $25 million to retrofit 500 of our exist-
ing  stores  this  year  with  motion  activated  LED  lighting.  This  never  before  utilized 
technology will result in an energy reduction of 3 percent and a payback of 2 years. 
Wal-Mart  plans  to  continue  using  energy  retrofit  efforts  to  reduce  energy  consump-
tion; currently over a dozen similar initiatives are in some phase of development or 
implementation. 

In regards to new store prototypes, we opened the first two of our newly developed 
‘‘higher  efficiency’’  prototypes  earlier  this  year  in  Kansas  City,  Missouri,  and  in 
Rockton, Illinois. These stores are predicted to be 20 percent more efficient than our 
earlier prototypes. By early next year we plan to have met our goal and be opening 
stores  that  are  27  percent  more  efficient.  Plans  are  already  in  development  for 
stores  that  approach  and  possibly  exceed  50  percent  efficiency  in  certain  climate 
zones. 

As proud as we are of these accomplishments and innovations, we are more proud 

to share what we are learning with everyone, even our competitors. 

Wal-Mart  recently  opened  a  new  facility  in  Savannah,  Georgia,  which  included 
the  first  low-temperature  CO2 secondary  loop  refrigeration  system  ever  installed  in 
the United States. At the grand opening, we conducted tours of the facility providing 
detailed descriptions of the systems to Target, Food Lion, Publix, Costco, and many 
others since. 

We  have  recently  shared  these  details  on  our  initiatives  and  their  related  pay-
backs  at  the  Department  of  Energy,  Pentagon,  Defense  Science  Board,  Office  of 
Management  and  Budget,  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  and  even  with  our  re-
tail  competitors,  Office  Depot  and  Best  Buy.  We  also  recently  shared  our  story  of 
energy  efficiency  in  Mexico  City  at  a  meeting  of  the  Commission  on  Environmental 
Cooperation. The information we are sharing is not theory; it is real initiatives and 
real paybacks. 

Wal-Mart  has  often  been  told  by  others  that  there  need  to  be  new  technologies, 
or  that  there  is  a  need  for  new  legislation  before  energy  efficiency  becomes  some-
thing with mainstream attractiveness. While Wal-Mart is not waiting for legislation 
to  act  proactively  in  the  area  of  energy  efficiency,  we  would  encourage  Congress  to 
continue to look at new incentives that will help others to act proactively like Wal- 
Mart.  Our  experience  tells  us  that  there  is  a  tremendous  amount  of  opportunity  to 
increase  the  energy  efficiency  of  our  economy,  save  consumers  money,  and  address 
the serious threat of global climate change. 

Wal-Mart  takes  pride  in  the  fact  that  it  has  committed  to  invest  up  to  $500  mil-
lion  dollars  per  year  in  innovative,  energy  saving  and  climate-friendly  technologies, 
but  we  are  even  more  proud  to  pro-actively  share  our  innovations  with  the  world. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

Conclusion 

Wal-Mart  seeks  excellence  and  responsibility  in  everything  we  do.  We  constantly 
strive  to  improve  our  business  processes  and  to  enrich  the  communities  in  which 
we are located. We at Wal-Mart applaud Congress in its efforts to communicate the 
necessity and the benefits of energy efficiency. 

Thank  you  for  inviting  Wal-Mart  to  present  testimony  on  this  very  important 
topic.  We  look  forward  to  working  with  the  Committee  to  effectively  and  construc-
tively address these issues. 

Senator KERRY. Well, thank you for your testimony, Mr. Zimmer-
man. And I’ll have more to say about it afterwards, but thank you. 

Dr. Krebs? 

STATEMENT OF MARTHA A. KREBS, PH.D., 

DEPUTY DIRECTOR, RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT, 

CALIFORNIA ENERGY COMMISSION 

Dr.  KREBS.  Mr.  Chairman,  my  name  is  Martha  Krebs.  I’m  the 
Deputy  Director  for  Research  and  Development  at  the  California 
Energy  Commission.  It’s  a  pleasure  to  be  here  today  and  discuss 
the  experience  of  the  State  of  California  and  other—and  its  State 
agencies to provide advanced energy efficiency technologies to Cali-
fornians. 

There  were  two  critical  policy  actions  taken  in  the  decade  after 
the 1973 OPEC oil embargo that has sustained California’s leader-
ship in energy efficiency. 

First,  it  established  the  State’s  appliance  and  new-building 
standards  in  1976  and  1978.  As  administered  and  updated  by  the 
California  Energy  Commission  on  a  3-year  cycle,  these  standards 
repeatedly  raise  the  bar  for  efficiency  gains  and  ensure  that  Cali-
fornia’s  buildings  and  appliances  remain  the  most  efficient  in  the 
Nation. 

The  second  critical  policy  action  was  decoupling  the  utilities’ 
rates  of  return  from  the  volumes  of  electricity  or  natural  gas  that 
they  sell.  Since  1982,  the  State’s  investor-owned  utilities  use  mod-
est  regular  adjustments  to  electric  and  gas  rates  to  sever  the  link 
between  the  utilities’  financial  health  and  the  electricity  and  nat-
ural  gas  volumes  that  they  sell.  Decoupling  helps  align  the  inter-
ests of utilities and their customers. 

From this period in time, California IOUs began to offer and sus-
tain a variety of programs to foster efficiency investments by indus-
try and individual customers. They ranged from direct subsidies to 
rebate  and  buy-down  programs.  In  conjunction  with  these  utility 
programs,  and  to  support  the  use  of  advanced  efficiency  tech-
nologies,  the  California  Energy  Commission  established  additional 
incentive  programs  in  both  the  efficiency  and  renewable  areas.  As 
a  result,  California’s  per-capita  electricity  use  has  been  essentially 
constant  since  the  mid-1970s.  At  least  half  of  this  difference  has 
been  shown  to  be  due  to  the  success  of  the  State  energy  efficiency 
policies, the standards, and the utility incentive programs. 

Since  2003,  energy  efficiency  programs  in  California  have  been 
guided  by  the  loading  order.  It  places  cost-effective  energy  effi-
ciency  and  demand  response  at  the  top  of  the  State’s  procure-
ment—electricity procurement resources, followed by renewable en-
ergy generation and then cleaner and more efficient fossil-fuel gen-
eration. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

In  2005,  California’s  Public  Utility  Commission  required  the 
State’s  regulated  utilities  to  fully  integrate  energy  efficiency  into 
their  resource  procurement  process.  Utilities  are  now  required  to 
invest  in  energy  efficiency  whenever  it  is  cheaper  than  building 
new power plants. 

In  2006,  California  utilities  began  aggressive  programs  to  exe-
cute  their  energy-saving  goals.  The  utilities  have  budgeted  more 
than  $2  billion  to  deliver  their  energy  efficiency  programs  from 
2006 through 2008. 

In  looking  forward  to  the  next  procurement  order,  the  next  3- 
year  cycle,  from  2008  to  2010,  the  PUC  is  holding  workshops,  this 
summer, to explore the technical and financial basis for even larger 
efficiency savings in the future, and also as part of the response to 
the  Governor’s  climate  action  and  the  legislature’s  climate  action 
program. 

As  part  of  California’s  utility  restructuring  legislation,  in  1996 
the legislature created the Public Interest Energy R&D Program at 
the  California  Energy  Commission.  Today,  the  CEC  has  about  $80 
million  annually  to  support  energy  R&D,  to  advance  new  energy 
technologies. Not much by comparison to the Federal program, but 
very large by comparison to any other State program. 

The legislative goals are to help develop and bring to market new 
technologies  for  efficiency,  renewables,  as  well  as  clean  fossil  fuel 
generation, transportation, transmission and distribution, and envi-
ronmental  impact.  And  though  my  testimony  does  not  discuss  it, 
the  investments  by  the  Federal  Government  in  all  of  these  areas 
are a huge source of leverage for our programs. 

PIER’s  funding  priorities  have  reflected  the  goals  given  to  us, 
and  about—from  2001  to  2006,  35  percent  of  our  resources  were 
spent on efficiency and demand response. We’ve had a lot of results 
and  payoff  as  a  result  of  that.  We’ve  introduced  nine  new  lighting 
technologies,  eight  heating,  ventilation,  and  air-conditioning  tech-
nologies.  We’ve  provided  the  basis  for  14  code  changes  in  the  new 
2008  efficiency  standards  process.  And  we  have,  along  with  our 
utilities, worked to demonstrate our new technologies on State uni-
versity  campuses  and  at  private-sector  commercial  and  industrial 
sites. 

In  industry,  we’ve  also  focused  on  our  agricultural  sector,  par-
ticularly  in  terms  of  water  use,  as  well  as  in  our  farms  and  our 
food  processing  industry.  And  we’ve  worked  with—in  the  informa-
tion  technology  and  semiconductor  businesses  in  Silicon  Valley 
with  respect  to  improving  efficiency  in  data  centers  and  server 
farms. 

We’ve  also  worked  on  new  communications  technologies  that 
allow  two-way  interaction  between  utilities  and  their  customers  to 
provide  demand  response  in  times  of  critical  peaks,  particularly  in 
California summers. 

We’ve  developed  these  technologies  from  the  beginning  with  an 
eye on getting them into the market. We build our projects so that 
we have the right industry players, so that they can take it to mar-
ket  after  we  do  the  research.  User  input  is  sought  from  the  begin-
ning.  And  we  work  with  our  utilities  in  a  very  integrated  way  so 
that  the  emerging  technologies  that  we  provide  to  them  are—be-
come  the  basis  for  the  next  generation  of  efficiency  procurement 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

that  they’re  going  to  be  required  to  deliver  by  the  Public  Utility 
Commission. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Krebs follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARTHA A. KREBS, PH.D., DEPUTY DIRECTOR, 

RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT, CALIFORNIA ENERGY COMMISSION 

Mr.  Chairman,  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  my  name  is  Martha  Krebs,  I  am 
the  Deputy  Director  for  Research  and  Development  at  the  California  Energy  Com-
mission.  It  is  a  pleasure  to  appear  before  you  and  to  discuss  the  experience  of  the 
California  Energy  Commission  (CEC)  in  working  with  the  State’s  Investor  Owned 
Utilities  (IOU)  to  provide  advanced  energy  efficiency  technologies  to  California’s 
end-users. 
Overview 

In this testimony, I will describe some of the foundational actions that California 
has taken to establish its leadership in electrical energy efficiency for more than 30 
years. Recent actions in efficiency procurement programs as well as climate change 
policy  will  assure  continuing  improvements  in  electrical  energy  efficiency,  thus  re-
ducing  demand  in  the  coming  years.  Finally  I  will  describe  the  approach  that  the 
CEC’s  Public  Interest  Energy  Research  (PIER)  program  has  taken  in  working  with 
the  California  IOU’s  and  other  State  agencies  to  develop  and  help  bring  to  market 
new  efficiency  technologies.  Much  of  the  information  in  this  testimony  is  based  on 
California Energy Commission documents, in particular, the 2005 Integrated Energy 
Policy  Report  and  ‘‘Energy  Efficiency  in  California  and  the  United  States,’’  Chang, 
Rosenfeld,  and  McAuliffe,  which  will  appear  later  this  year  in  Climate  Change 
Science and Policy. The opinions expressed here are my own; while I try to express 
the policy and accomplishments of California and the CEC, it is not an official docu-
ment. 
California’s  Energy  Efficiency  has  Improved  Continuously  Over  the  Last 

Thirty Years as a Result of Deliberate Policy Action 

There  were  two  critical  policy  actions  taken  in  the  decade  after  the  1973  OPEC 
Oil  Embargo  that  has  sustained  California’s  leadership  in  energy  efficiency:  Appli-
ance  and  new  building  efficiency  standards  and  the  decoupling  of  public  utility  fi-
nancial returns from the volumes of electricity and natural gas sold. 

Standards. California established the state’s appliance (Title 20) and new-building 
(Title 24) standards in 1976 and 1978, respectively. It was the first state in the Na-
tion  to  adopt  efficiency  standards  for  appliances.  After  other  states  followed,  the 
Federal standards were established in the National Appliance Energy Conservation 
Act  of  1987.  As  administered  and  developed  by  the  California  Energy  Commission, 
these standards are regularly updated and strengthened, repeatedly raising the bar 
for  efficiency  gains  and  ensuring  that  California’s  buildings  and  appliances  will  re-
main  the  most  energy  efficient  in  the  Nation.  California’s  most  recently  adopted 
statewide  energy  efficiency  standards  for  buildings  and  appliances  (the  2005  up-
dates are expected to save 2,800 MW over the next 10 years (about 5 percent of the 
60  GW  of  in-state  capacity).  The  standards  updating  process  takes  place  over  a  3- 
year  period  that  involves  open  participation  by  utilities,  manufacturers  and  con-
sumer representatives. 

Decoupling. The second critical policy action involved establishing an incentive for 
utility  investments  in  energy  efficiency.  Under  traditional  utility  regulation,  a  util-
ity’s  recovery  of  its  infrastructure  investment  costs  is  tied  to  how  much  energy  it 
sells.  According  to  this  model,  energy  efficiency  results  in  lower-than-anticipated 
sales and thus prevents utilities from fully recovering their fixed costs. As a result, 
traditional regulation deters utilities from investing in energy efficiency and instead 
encourages  them  to  increase  sales  to  increase  revenues.  However,  since  1982  (with 
a brief hiatus in the mid-1990s, when ‘‘restructuring’’ took resource planning respon-
sibilities  away  from  the  utilities),  California  law  has  required  the  state’s  investor- 
owned utilities to use modest regular adjustments to electric and gas rates to sever 
the link between the utilities’ financial health and the amount of electricity and nat-
ural  gas  they  sell.  This  concept,  known  as  ‘‘decoupling,’’  removes  significant  regu-
latory and financial barriers to utility investments in cost-effective energy efficiency 
improvements, and helps align the interests of utilities and customers. 

From  this  period  on,  California  IOUs  offered  a  variety  of  programs  to  foster  effi-
ciency investments by industry and individual customers. These ranged from direct 
subsidies  to  rebate  and  buy-down  programs.  To  support  the  utilization  of  advanced 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

technologies  in  conjunction  with  the  utility  programs,  the  CEC  was  authorized  to 
establish  additional  incentive  programs  for  both  efficiency  and  renewable  tech-
nologies. 

Results.  With  concurrent  investments  in  energy  efficiency  programs  across  the 
state,  California  has  pursued  strong  energy  efficiency  programs  and  policies  that 
have  set  it  apart  from  the  rest  of  the  U.S.,  Figure  1  shows  that  California’s  histor-
ical  energy  efficiency  policies  have  enabled  the  state  to  hold  per  capita  electricity 
use essentially constant, while in the United States as a whole, per capita electricity 
use increased by nearly 50 percent since the mid-1970s. 

Calculations  by  Commissioner  Arthur  Rosenfeld  and  his  colleagues  assume  that 
about one-half of the difference between California and the rest of the United States’ 
per capita consumption is due to climate, price, and mix of industries, but the other 
half  is  due  to  the  success  of  state  energy  efficiency  policies,  standards  and  utility 
programs that promote energy efficient technologies. If California’s per capita emis-
sions  had  grown  at  the  same  rate  as  the  rest  of  the  country  since  1975,  the  state 
would  have  needed  approximately  50  additional  medium-sized  (500  MW)  power 
plants. 

Figure 2 shows the annual energy savings from California’s energy efficiency util-
ity  incentive  programs  and  efficiency  standards.  When  summed  together,  the  three 
decades  of  energy  efficiency  programs  and  standards  have  resulted  in  annual  effi-
ciency  savings  today  equivalent  to  approximately  15  percent  of  California’s  annual 
electricity  consumption,  as  shown  in  Figure  2.  From  CO2 reduction  perspective, 
these  savings  have  reduced  CO2 emissions  from  the  electricity  generation  sector  by 
nearly  20  percent  compared  to  what  otherwise  might  have  happened  without  these 
programs and standards. This equates to an avoidance of CO2 emissions in the state 
as  a  whole  of  about  4  percent  due  to  historical  energy  efficiency  programs  and 
standards. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

1
s
b
e
r
k
1
2
6

24 

These energy savings, and associated reduction in greenhouse gas emissions, have 
delivered  substantial  net  economic  benefits  to  California.  The  state’s  efficiency 
standards,  which  are  designed  to  be  cost-effective,  accelerate  energy  savings  across 
the  state.  The  cost  of  utility  efficiency  programs  has  averaged  two  to  three  cents 
per  kWh  saved,  from  the  utility  perspective.  This  is  less  than  half  the  cost  of  the 
avoided baseload generation—the generation type most often displaced by energy ef-
ficiency  programs—and  is  about  one-sixth  of  the  cost  of  peak  generation.  Over  the 
last decade alone, these efficiency programs have provided net benefits of about $5.3 
billion  to  California’s  customers  from  foregone  electricity  purchases.  Though  Cali-
fornia  is  often  maligned  for  its  high  electricity  retail  rates  compared  to  the  rest  of 
the  U.S.,  the  state’s  energy  efficiency  policies  have  reduced  overall  energy  bills  for 
its residents and businesses. Since 1973, on a per capita basis, energy bills in Cali-
fornia have averaged $100 per year less than U.S. bills. 
Energy  Efficiency  Is  a  Critical  Component  of  California’s  Future  Energy 

and Climate Change Response Policies 

The Loading Order and the 2006–08 Efficiency Resource Procurement by the Inves-
tor  Owned  Utilities.  Since  2003,  energy  efficiency  programs  in  California  have  been 
guided  by  a  formal  state  policy  that  places  cost-effective  energy  efficiency  above  all 
other  energy  resources.  The  Energy  Action  Plan,  which  was  adopted  by  the  state’s 
energy agencies, endorsed by Governor Schwarzenegger, and later updated in 2005, 
establishes  a  ‘‘loading  order’’  of  preferred  energy  resources.  The  loading  order  de-
clares  that  cost-effective  energy  efficiency  and  demand  response  are  the  state’s  top 
priority  procurement  resources,  followed  by  renewable  energy  generation,  and  fi-
nally cleaner and more efficient fossil-fueled generation. 

After  examining  the  potential  for  cost-effective  achievable  energy  efficiency  im-
provements  in  the  state,  the  California  Public  Utility  Commission  (CPUC)  in  2004 
established  energy  savings  targets  for  the  Investor  Owned  Utilities  that  are  the 
most aggressive in the Nation. These targets will more than double the current level 
of savings over the next decade. While other states’ energy efficiency efforts deliver 
annual savings ranging from about 0.1 percent to 0.8 percent of their electricity use, 
the annual California targets will ramp up to 1 percent by 2008. 

Figure 3 illustrates the historical annual energy savings and the targeted savings 
levels,  which  significantly  surpass  historical  reductions.  In  a  few  years’  time,  Cali-
fornia’s  per  capita  electricity  consumption  should  begin  to  decline.  The  energy  sav-
ings targets will avoid nearly 5,000 MW of peak demand in the next 10 years, avert-
ing  the  construction  of  a  new  500-MW  power  plant  every  year.  Customers  will  also 
obtain  some  relief  from  rising  natural  gas  bills  through  the  tripling  of  annual  gas 
savings by the end of the decade. 

In 2005, California regulators adopted a new administrative structure for the de-
livery of energy efficiency programs that charges the state’s regulated utilities with 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

2
s
b
e
r
k
1
2
6

25 

fully  integrating  energy  efficiency  into  their  resource  procurement  process.  Utilities 
are now required to invest in energy efficiency whenever it is cheaper than building 
new  power  plants,  and  the  savings  achieved  through  these  energy  efficiency  pro-
grams  will  be  subject  to  independent  verification.  This  rigorous  evaluation  of  sav-
ings  will  be  essential  to  ensure  that  the  savings  have  in  fact  occurred  and  can  be 
counted  upon  for  resource  planning  purposes,  as  well  as  for  the  state’s  greenhouse 
gas emission reduction goals. 

In 2006, California utilities began launching aggressive programs to execute their 
energy  savings  goals.  The  utilities  have  budgeted  $2  billion  to  deliver  their  energy 
efficiency programs during the three-year cycle from 2006 through 2008. This three- 
year investment will return nearly $3 billion in net benefits to California’s economy 
through  reduced  energy  bills  and  the  avoided  construction  of  new  power  plants. 
Moreover,  by  2008,  these  programs  will  reduce  the  state’s  annual  greenhouse  gas 
emissions by over three million metric tons of CO2, which is equivalent to removing 
about 650,000 cars from the roads. 

In looking forward to the next procurement order beyond 2008 as well as climate 
change  response  requirements,  the  CPUC  is  holding  workshops  this  summer  to  ex-
plore  the  technical  and  financial  basis  for  even  larger  efficiency  savings  in  the  fu-
ture. 

California  Climate  Action  Policy  Specifics. 

In  June  2005,  Governor 
Schwarzenegger  signed  Executive  Order  S–3–04,  which  established  aggressive 
greenhouse gas reduction targets for California: reduce greenhouse gas emissions to 
2000  levels  by  2010;  to  1990  levels  by  2020;  and  to  80  percent  below  1990  levels 
by  2050.  The  2020  emissions  reduction  goal  was  subsequently  codified  by  Assembly 
Bill  (AB)  32,  California’s  Global  Warming  Solutions  Act  of  2006,  which  was  signed 
into law by the Governor in September 2006. 

Energy efficiency strategies figure prominently in the state’s plan for meeting the 
2010 and 2020 GHG reduction goals. While per capita emissions in the utility sector 
are  slowly  declining,  the  state’s  absolute  GHG  emissions  have  risen  since  the  mid- 
1970s  due  to  continuing  population  growth  of  1.8  percent  per  year.  Some  of  the 
strategies identified in this sector involve efficiency efforts already underway as dis-
cussed above. For example, currently funded programs and existing efficiency stand-
ards  in  the  electricity  and  natural  gas  sectors  are  expected  to  save  15.8  MmtCO2 
in 2020 (about 9 percent of what will be needed to meet the state’s goal). Other effi-
ciency strategies will require additional action. Existing and expanded efficiency im-
provements in the buildings and industry sectors are expected to contribute 17 per-
cent  of  the  total  greenhouse  gas  reductions  needed  to  meet  the  state’s  2020  goal. 
These contributions to California’s emissions reduction goals could be even great-
er,  as  the  greenhouse  gas  reductions  resulting  from  future  improvements  to  the 
state’s  building  and  appliance  energy  efficiency  codes  and  standards  have  yet  to  be 
determined.  While  transportation  is  the  largest  source  of  GHG  emissions  (41  per-
cent), electricity consumed by buildings and industry (including electricity imported 
from  out-of-state)  is  the  second  largest  source  of  California’s  GHG  emissions,  total-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

3
s
b
e
r
k
1
2
6

26 

ing  108  million  metric  tons  of  carbon  dioxide  equivalent  (MmtCO2)  and  accounting 
for 22 percent (of the state’s total GHG emissions). Natural gas use in buildings and 
industry contribute another 14 percent of California’s GHG emissions. 
California’s Energy Technology Research and Development Programs Have 

Emphasized Energy Efficiency 

From its initial establishment in 1975, the California Energy Commission has de-
veloped  and  administered  incentive  programs  that  support  the  development,  dem-
onstration  and  deployment  of  advanced  energy  technologies  across  the  spectrum  of 
energy  generation  and  end-use.  The  scale  of  this  effort  was  substantially  increased 
when the Public Interest Energy Research Program was created in 1996. 

In  1996  as  part  of  AB  1890  (Chapter  854,  Statutes  of  1996),  California’s  utility 
restructuring legislation, the legislature required that $62.5 million be collected an-
nually  from  the  three  investor-owned  electric  utilities  and  deposited  in  the  Public 
Interest  Energy  Research  and  Development  Account,  to  be  invested  by  the  Cali-
fornia Energy Commission for energy-related research, development and demonstra-
tion  (RD&D)  efforts  that  serve  the  greater  public  interest.  Thus,  administration  of 
public interest RD&D was shifted from California’s investor-owned utilities to state 
government, a major change intended to ensure an appropriate role for public inter-
est energy research in a newly competitive energy marketplace. 

By  2002  the  Federal  natural  gas  public  research  surcharge  administered  by  the 
Gas  Technology  Institute  was  being  zeroed  out  by  the  FERC,  California  acted  to 
maintain  RD&D  for  its  gas  utilities.  In  2003,  the  legislature  authorized  and  the 
CPUC created the Public Interest Natural Gas Research Fund that is administered 
by  the  CEC  in  conjunction  with  its  electric  PIER  funds.  This  fund  is  collected  from 
California’s investor owned natural gas utilities; in FY 2007–08, it will provide $18 
million for RD&D. Thus the CEC has about $80 million annually to support RD&D 
to  advance  new  energy  technologies,  the  largest  such  research  funds  among  the  50 
states. 

The  legislature  explicitly  defined  what  energy  RD&D  ‘‘in  the  public  interest’’ 
means following three principles; they have guided PIER’s investments over its first 
decade of existence: 

markets; 

and products; 

• Provide  environmentally  sound,  safe,  reliable  and  affordable  energy  services 
• Support  RD&D  not  adequately  provided  by  competitive  or  regulated  energy 
• Advance energy science and technology to the benefit of all California’s citizens. 
PIER  is  reauthorized  every  5  years.  Its  2006  reauthorization  took  place  in  an  at-
mosphere  of  high  concern  and  determination  to  address  the  impacts  of  climate 
change.  The  legislature  rearticulated  PIER’s  goals  with  an  emphasis  on  reducing 
greenhouse  gases  and  having  market  impacts.  They  also  added  a  new  mandate  for 
transportation research relevant to both vehicles and fuels that reflects the concern 
about  transportation  as  a  major  source  of  greenhouse  gases.  The  remaining  three 
goals  reflect  the  continuing  importance  of  the  Loading  Order  discussed  above.  The 
goals are: 

‘‘Develop  and  help  bring  to  market,  energy  technologies  that  provide  increased 
environmental benefits, greater system reliability, and lower system costs’’ 

• ‘‘Advanced transportation technologies that reduce air pollution and greenhouse 
gas emissions beyond applicable standards, and that benefit electricity and nat-
ural gas ratepayers. 
• ‘‘Increased  energy  efficiency  in  buildings,  appliances,  lighting,  and  other  appli-
cations beyond applicable standards, and that benefit electric utility customers. 
• ‘‘Advanced  electricity  generation  technologies  that  exceed  applicable  standards 
to  increase  reductions  in  greenhouse  gas  emissions  from  electricity  generation, 
and that benefit electric utility customers. 
• ‘‘Advanced  electricity  technologies  that  reduce  or  eliminate  consumption  of 
water  or  other  finite  resources,  increase  use  of  renewable  energy  resources,  or 
improve transmission or distribution of electricity generated from renewable en-
ergy resources.’’ 

PIER’s  funding  priorities  have  reflected  these  goals.  Figure  4  represents  the  cu-
mulative  PIER  investment  from  2001–2005.  The  transportation  RD&D  effort  began 
in  FY  2005–06  and  is  not  reflected  in  this  figure.  The  figure  indicates  the  impor-
tance  that  CEC  has  placed  on  efficiency  and  demand  response  as  a  priority  target 
for Energy RD&D in California. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

The  CEC  RD&D  Approach  to  Efficiency  Research.  To  support  the  state  in  accom-
plishing  these  policies  and  goals,  as  well  as  anticipate  future  needs,  the  PIER  pro-
gram  has  defined  five  strategic  objectives  that  will  provide  California  with  afford-
able, comfortable and energy-smart choices for daily life and a strong state economy: 
1. Reduce energy cost and improve performance of efficiency end-use systems (res-
idential,  commercial,  industrial,  agricultural).  This  objective  is  directly  tied  to 
helping  the  state  meet  the  aggressive  efficiency  goals,  as  well  as  supports  the 
implementation of efficiency as the first option in the loading order. 
2.  Develop  energy-efficient  technologies  for  unique  California  conditions  and  in-
dustries.  This  objective  will  also  help  the  state  meet  the  aggressive  efficiency 
goals and it will help address issues related to population and economic growth 
in hot inland areas. 
3.  Reduce  water  use  and  improve  efficiency  of  alternative  water  sources,  treat-
ment,  and  delivery.  In  addition  to  supporting  the  efficiency  goals,  this  objective 
supports the policy to reduce electricity demand related to the water supply. 
4.  Develop  end-use  cost-effective  load  management  and  demand  response  tech-
nologies.  This  objective  supports  the  aggressive  peak  demand  reduction  goals 
and  help  mitigate  the  impact  of  increased  peak  demand  spikes  due  to  the 
growth in hot inland areas. 
5.  Develop  knowledge  base  for  future  decisionmaking  and  informed  end-use  pol-
icy relative to electricity. This objective will address the trends, technology gaps, 
and  emerging  energy  issues  to  provide  policymakers  with  the  knowledge  re-
quired to develop effective future policy in this area. 

Buildings  Efficiency  RD&D  Approach.  The  Buildings  RD&D  effort  area  includes 
new  and  existing  buildings  in  both  the  residential  and  the  non-residential  sectors. 
The  program  seeks  to  decrease  building  energy  use  through  research  that  will  de-
velop  or  improve  energy  efficient  technologies,  strategies,  tools,  and  building  per-
formance evaluation methods. 

A  number  of  specific  issues  and  technologies  have  been  addressed.  Customers  do 
not  have  affordable  and  effective  tools,  technologies,  controls,  and  strategies  to  re-
spond to future time dependent price structures for electricity. Because affordability 
is  the  primary  driver  for  building  equipment  purchase  decisions,  development  of 
lower  first-cost  options  for  energy  efficient  products,  as  well  as  lower  operational 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

4
s
b
e
r
k
1
2
6

28 

costs for energy consuming systems, are essential for increasing the adoption of en-
ergy efficiency measures in California. 

Decisions  regarding  building  components,  systems,  and  operations  are  generally 
made  based  on  non-energy  considerations,  but  understanding  and  addressing  the 
substantial  energy  impacts  of  key  non-energy  considerations  such  as  health,  safety 
and productivity are critical to improving energy efficiency in California’s buildings. 
The existing building sector is so large that efficient replacement products, improved 
operational strategies, and appropriate intervention tactics that can reach the exist-
ing building market are critical. 

Systems  and  equipment  frequently  perform  less  efficiently  than  predicted  due  to 
suboptimal  integration  of  subsystems  and  components,  improper  installation,  poor 
maintenance,  and  user’s  inability  to  detect  and  diagnose  equipment  performance 
degradation, thereby reducing the equipment life and increasing energy costs. Tech-
nologies,  products,  strategies  and  business  models  developed  for  national  markets 
do  not  adequately  address  California’s  unique  building  energy  needs,  and  do  not 
take  advantage  of  state  organizations,  programs,  and  initiatives  which  can  help  fa-
cilitate  improved  building  energy  efficiency.  The  digital  revolution  has  opened  up 
new,  more  affordable  opportunities  for  energy  savings  and  peak  demand  manage-
ment  in  buildings,  but  the  proliferation  of  entertainment  and  information  systems 
has also significantly increased plug loads. 

The  Buildings  research  effort  has  paid  off  in  numerous  technology  introductions 

in the last 3 years: 

using both compact fluorescents and LED technologies. 

• Nine  new  lighting  technologies  for  home,  office,  and  institutional  environments 
• Eight commercial Heating, Ventilation and Air Conditioning Technologies. 
• Fourteen Code Changes for the 2008 Efficiency Standards Process. 
• The UC–CSU Campus Technology Demonstration Program—11 technologies on 

13 campuses. 

Industry  RD&D  Approach.  The  industrial,  agriculture  and  water  sectors  in  Cali-
fornia  use  30  percent  of  all  the  electricity  consumed  annually  in  the  state.  These 
sectors—vital to California’s economy—rely on an affordable, reliable and sustained 
supply  of  energy.  Through  Research,  Development  and  Demonstration  (RD&D),  the 
program  seeks  to  improve  the  energy  efficiency  of  industrial  processes,  agricultural 
operations, and water and wastewater treatment plants. These sectors are also sen-
sitive to the cost, reliability and quality of electric power. Therefore, besides improv-
ing energy efficiency, the program also strives to research, develop, and demonstrate 
technologies that help these sectors deal with cost, power quality and power supply 
reliability issues. The following priorities guide RD&D in this area: 

• Industry—California has a substantial industrial base. The energy reliability of 
these industries is critical not only for California’s economy but for the national 
economy as well. The major industries—such as food processing, electronics and 
e-commerce,  petroleum  refining  and  production—all  depend  on  continued  low 
cost and reliable energy. 
• Agriculture—Agriculture  forms  a  large  segment  of  California’s  economy  worth 
$27.2 billion in cash receipts in 2000. Agriculture is highly dependent upon elec-
trical  energy  for  irrigation  and  post-harvest  processing.  Electrical  costs  and 
power  reliability  are  critical  for  a  successful  and  sustainable  agricultural  oper-
ation. The PIER IAW develops techniques and technologies for advanced irriga-
tion and other load management practices that will help this sector cope better 
in the current electric market. 
• Water—The availability of low-cost clean water is essential to California’s econ-
omy and continued prosperity. The state transports and treats large volumes of 
water  across  the  state.  Both  of  these  activities  rely  heavily  on  electric  power. 
RD&D  pursues  energy  efficiency  improvements  for  processing  water  for  urban, 
industrial  and  agricultural  consumption  and  energy-efficient  wastewater  recov-
ery. 

PIER  Industry  Efficiency  RD&D  has  focused  advanced  technologies  for  refrigera-
tion and cooling, waste heat recovery, low emission combustion technology in the in-
dustrial setting, water treatment and recovery technologies, process heat production, 
and efficient data centers/server farms. 

Demand  Response  RD&D  Approach.  Electricity  demand  in  California  increases 
most dramatically in the summer, driven by high air conditioning loads. The genera-
tion  system  must  be  able  to  accommodate  these  high  summer  peaks,  in  addition  to 
the  demand  swings  caused  by  weather  variability  and  the  economy.  Though  peak 
demand periods typically occur only between 50–100 hours a year, they impose huge 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

burdens  on  the  electric  system.  One  measure  of  the  ‘‘peakiness’’  of  the  electric  sys-
tem  is  load  factor,  which  measures  the  relationship  between  annual  peak  in  MW 
and annual consumption in MWh. If peak demand grows faster than annual average 
consumption,  the  load  factor  decreases.  In  California  in  recent  years,  weather-ad-
justed load factors have decreased as air conditioner loads have increased. 

One problem with meeting peak demand is that most new gas-fired power plants 
are  combined  cycle  designed  to  run  at  high  load  factors  where  they  are  most  effi-
cient  and  can  generate  enough  revenue  to  recoup  investments.  Combined-cycle 
plants  also  have  less  capability  to  ramp  up  and  down  to  meet  peak  demand  than 
the  older  steam  boiler  units,  which  make  up  the  majority  of  California’s  fleet  of 
power plants. While some utilities have invested in simple-cycle peaking plants that 
run just a few hours each year, most of the state’s new power plants are combined- 
cycle and are not well matched with swings in system demand. 

Demand  response  programs  help  reduce  peak  demand  in  two  ways.  First,  price- 
sensitive  programs  provide  customers  with  the  financial  incentives  and  metering 
technology to reduce electric loads when prices and electricity demand are high. Sec-
ond,  reliability  programs  provide  customers  with  a  non-price  signal  that  clearly 
shows  when  system  resources  are  strained  and  demand  reduction  would  be  most 
beneficial. Reducing system load before it reaches capacity constraints increases the 
reliability of California’s electricity grid. By reducing the need for additional system 
infrastructure  or  peaking  generation,  demand  response  also  lowers  consumer  elec-
tricity costs over the long term. 

Price-sensitive  and  reliability  programs  are  both  key  components  of  demand  re-
sponse.  The  state  has  historically  relied  on  reliability  programs  in  times  of  con-
strained  supply,  most  recently  during  the  summer  of  2005  in  Southern  California. 
Advances  in  metering  and  communications  technologies  allow  significant  improve-
ments to price-responsive and signal-responsive programs. New metering technology 
will  be  the  primary  platform  for  the  state’s  future  demand  response  policies.  Both 
types  of  programs  are  being  designed  to  allow  customer  control—a  key  feature  ex-
pected to increase participation by providing customers with greater choice over im-
pacts on their homes and businesses. 

PIER Demand Response RD&D includes research on automated demand response 
technology  (AutoDR)  for  both  buildings  and  selected  industrial  processes.  These 
technologies focus generally on two-way communication technologies integrated with 
energy  and  process  controls  to  permit  customers  to  optimize  their  work  and  manu-
facturing  environments  while  responding  to  the  external  energy  supply  and  pricing 
signals  from  the  utilities.  PIER  also  supports  research  that  examines  alternative 
pricing  approaches  and  mechanisms  that  can  elicit  effective  demand  response  from 
electricity  consumers.  California  electricity  utilities  are  critical  participants  in  this 
research. 

Results  from  4  years  of  PIER  R&D  on  AutoDR  involving  over  40  different  facili-
ties  revealed  average  demand  reductions  of  about  10–15  percent  during  three-  to 
six-hour  long  peak  demand  response  events.  Representatives  from  firms  as  diverse 
as  Albertson’s,  Target,  and  Cisco  report  that  they  believe  automating  demand  re-
sponse  by  price  signals  can  institutionalize  these  savings,  thereby  providing  Cali-
fornia  with  reliable  demand  response  savings.  PG&E  plans  to  install  AutoDR  tech-
nologies  in  200  large  commercial  facilities  in  2007  to  reduce  peak  demand  by  15 
MW. 
PIER  Efficiency  RD&D  Programs  Focus  on  Market  Success  From  the 

Beginning of Individual Projects; California Utilities are Key Players 

In addressing these issues, maintaining a strong market connection is a key goal 
of  the  PIER  Buildings  Program.  The  PIER  Buildings  Program  strives  to  maintain 
a strong market connection in various ways including: 

• Identification of research that is responsive to known market needs. 
• Inclusion of market partners on research teams. 
• Identification  and  implementation  of  market  linkages  including  linkages  to  the 
building  community,  industry,  equipment  manufacturers,  utilities,  codes  and 
standards groups, and other implementers of building efficiency market actions. 
A  major  focus  of  planning  and  conducting  PIER  efficiency  research  is  on  imple-
menting  the  research  results—we  seek  market  connections  early  in  a  research 
project to encourage industry players who will adopt the results and achieve market 
impact.  Such  connections  take  on  many  forms,  including  advisory  groups,  coordi-
nating  groups,  and  industry  organizations.  Projects  are  developed  with  a  view  to-
ward  progression  from  technical  verification  leading  to  ultimate  demonstration  in 
the  user’s  environment.  User  input  is  sought  from  the  beginning.  This  approach  is 
represented in Figure 5 below. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

Many  Efficiency  RD&D  projects  enlist  the  support  and  guidance  of  an  Advisory 
Committee  and  some  larger  research  programs/projects  have  a  Technical  Advisory 
Group (TAG). These advisors are industry representatives from a wide range of dis-
ciplines,  including  building  operation/management,  insurance,  city  building  codes, 
energy  research,  product  manufacturing  and  distribution,  and  the  electric/gas  utili-
ties.  These  advisory  bodies  provide  input  on  market  needs;  help  refine  project 
scopes; suggest market adopters; and review research results. 

PIER  efficiency  research  also  connects  with  the  market  through  California’s 
Emerging  Technology  Coordinating  Council.  The  council  is  a  collaboration  of  public 
agencies  involved  with  administrating  California  utility-ratepayer  funded  programs 
for  energy  related  research  and  energy-efficient  emerging  technologies.  The  group 
includes  representatives  from  the  California  Energy  Commission,  Pacific  Gas  & 
Electric,  Southern  California  Edison,  Southern  California  Gas,  and  San  Diego  Gas 
& Electric. 

The  utilities’  emerging  technology  programs  as  well  as  their  incentives  and  effi-
ciency  procurement  programs  are  critical  elements  of  the  market  development  and 
commercialization  efforts  of  the  CECs  Efficiency  RD&D  program.  All  of  these  pro-
grams are the result of California’s progressive commitment to efficiency and its rec-
ognition that technological advance can change the way we produce and use energy. 
I am pleased to be able to present this information to you. 

This completes my prepared testimony. Thank you. 

Senator KERRY. Thank you very much, Dr. Krebs. 
Mr. Johnson? 

STATEMENT OF DOUGLAS K. JOHNSON, SENIOR DIRECTOR, 

TECHNOLOGY POLICY AND INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS, 

CONSUMER ELECTRONICS ASSOCIATION 

Mr. JOHNSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
CEA  represents  the  innovation  industry.  Our  2,100  members 
make the products that keep America connected, informed, and en-
tertained.  Our  members  drive  the  U.S.  economy  and  ensure  that 
America  represents—or  remains  as  the  world’s  innovation  leader. 
Our  members  are  committed  to  energy  efficiency  and  conserva-
tion.  Energy  efficiency  is  not  just  the  right  thing  to  do,  it  is  good 
business.  Efficient  energy  use  minimizes  heat  generation,  the 
enemy  of  performance  and  longevity  in  our  products.  Many  indus-
try  trends  drive  the  improving  energy  efficiency  of  electronics,  in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

5
s
b
e
r
k
1
2
6

31 

cluding  convergence,  miniaturization,  portability,  and  the  transi-
tion from analog to digital technology. 

At  CEA,  we  take  a  number  of  concrete  steps  to  promote  energy 
efficiency.  First,  we  promote  the  use  of  industry  standards  for  en-
ergy  efficiency.  Recently,  we  developed  new  standards  for  energy 
use  in  set-top  boxes,  and  helped  devise  a  standard  for  measuring 
power  use  of  digital  televisions.  These  voluntary  programs  and 
standards  initiatives  deliver  more  energy  efficient  products  to  con-
sumers and business. 

In  addition,  we  conduct  research  studies  to  ensure  that  policy-
makers  and  the  public  have  accurate  information.  These  studies 
analyze  the  energy  use  of  our  products,  as  well  as  the  energy-sav-
ing benefits of telecommuting and e-commerce. 

CEA  also  educates  consumers  about  the  energy  use  of  our  prod-
ucts.  CEA’s  myGreenElectronics.org  website  presents  commonsense 
consumer  tips  for  saving  energy,  and  an  energy-use  calculator 
which  allows  consumers  to  determine  how  much  power  is  required 
for  their  electronics.  The  website  also  allows  consumers  to  search 
for energy efficient products. 

As  part  of  our  educational  efforts,  we  publicly  highlight  green 
products  and  technologies  at  our  international  trade  show,  the 
International  CES.  We  also,  at  that  trade  show,  encourage  energy 
conservation  through  product  displays,  conference  sessions,  and  a 
prestigious Eco-design Award. 

Finally,  we  work  cooperatively  with  government  agencies  to  pro-
mote  voluntary,  market-oriented  programs,  such  as  ENERGY 
STAR.  Through  ENERGY  STAR,  our  products  have  saved  18.8 
billion  kilowatt  hours  of  energy  and  avoided  emissions  equivalent 
to 3.8 million metric tons of carbon. 

However,  despite  its  success,  the  ENERGY  STAR program  is 
threatened  by  unnecessary  regulation  at  the  State  level.  Of  par-
ticular  concern  are  California  mandates  for  audio  and  video  prod-
ucts and external power supplies based on the voluntary thresholds 
established  within  the  ENERGY  STAR program.  While  we  sup-
port  California’s  objective  of  energy  conservation,  we  are  very  con-
cerned about the specific approach. 

ENERGY  STAR’s  success  is  due,  in  part,  to  its  voluntary  na-
ture.  Making  voluntary  specifications  mandatory  will  likely  dis-
courage  participation  in  the  national  ENERGY  STAR program, 
with  unfortunate  consequences  for  consumers  and  manufacturers, 
as well as energy savings, in general. 

In  light  of  these  issues  and  concerns,  CEA  has  urged  California 
to  withdraw  its  regulations  for  consumer  audio  and  video  products 
and recognize the success of voluntary programs, such as ENERGY 
STAR,  which  better  support  energy  efficiency  in  the  consumer 
electronics market. 

In  conclusion,  this  Committee’s  focus  on  energy  efficiency  is  im-
portant  and  necessary.  Electronics  are  part  of  the  energy-savings 
solution.  Our  products  save  energy  by  providing  control  over  home 
heating,  cooling,  and  lighting.  They  allow  teleworking  and  remote 
access  to  information  and  entertainment,  which  save  fuel  and  re-
duce carbon emissions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

We urge you to support innovation and consumer-oriented initia-
tives, like ENERGY STAR, which are the keys to energy efficiency 
for the consumer electronics industry. 

We’re committed to working with you and my fellow panelists to-
ward a greener and more efficient future. I look forward to address-
ing any questions you may have. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Johnson follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DOUGLAS K. JOHNSON, SENIOR DIRECTOR, TECHNOLOGY 

POLICY AND INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS, CONSUMER ELECTRONICS ASSOCIATION 

Introduction 

Chairman Kerry, Ranking Member Ensign, and Members of the Subcommittee: 
I  am  pleased  to  accept  your  invitation  to  testify  on  behalf  of  the  Consumer  Elec-
tronics  Association  (CEA).  CEA  is  the  principal  U.S.  trade  association  of  the  $155 
billion consumer electronics industry. CEA’s more than 2,100 members are involved 
in  the  design,  development,  manufacturing,  distribution  and  integration  of  audio, 
video, in-vehicle electronics, wireless and landline communication, information tech-
nology,  home  networking,  multimedia  and  accessory  products,  as  well  as  related 
services that are sold through consumer channels. CEA’s members include large and 
small  manufacturers  as  well  as  many  leading  retailers.  CEA  also  produces  the  Na-
tion’s  largest  annual  trade  event,  the  International  CES.  We  commend  the  Sub-
committee  for  holding  this  hearing  on  the  important  issue  of  energy  efficiency  and 
appreciate the opportunity to provide the views of our membership. 

Our  members  design,  make  and  sell  the  products  and  services  that  keep  us  con-
nected,  informed  and  entertained.  Our  companies  drive  the  U.S.  economy  and  en-
sure that America remains the world’s innovation leader. 

The hallmarks of our industry are dynamism and rapid change. This constant in-
novation, complemented by voluntary programs and initiatives, is the primary driv-
er of improved energy efficiency in our industry. In order to meet consumer expecta-
tions, it is essential that our products use electricity efficiently and effectively. Effi-
cient  use  of  energy  minimizes  heat  generation,  the  prime  enemy  of  component  per-
formance and longevity. Energy efficiency is also essential to minimizing costs asso-
ciated with design and components, such as heat sinks. Beyond improvements in de-
sign, there also are ongoing industry trends which naturally drive, support and sus-
tain  the  increasing  energy  efficiency  of  electronics.  These  trends  include  conver-
gence,  miniaturization,  portability  and  the  transition  from  analog  to  digital  tech-
nology. 

CEA’s members are committed to energy efficiency and conservation. 
For many years, the consumer electronics industry has worked cooperatively with 
government  agencies  in  pursuit  of  successful  voluntary,  market-oriented  programs 
and  initiatives,  such  as  ENERGY  STAR,  which  highlight  and  support  energy  effi-
cient  product  design  and  purchasing.  To  date,  the  ENERGY  STAR program  for 
consumer electronics and residential office equipment has saved 18.8 billion kWh of 
energy  and  avoided  emissions  totaling  3.8  million  metric  tons  of  carbon  equivalent. 
Recently,  consumer  electronics  manufacturers  have  focused  on  new  industry-led 
standards  at  the  national,  regional  and  international  levels  that  relate  to  and  sup-
port  energy  efficiency.  Together,  these  voluntary  initiatives  have  transformed  the 
market and delivered more energy efficient electronics to consumers and businesses. 
As  the  consumer  electronics  industry’s  principle  trade  group,  CEA  has  taken  a 
comprehensive, multi-faceted approach to addressing energy efficiency for our indus-
try sector. Specifically: 

1. CEA conducts research and analysis to ensure that policymakers and the public 

have accurate information. 

Many estimates of consumer electronics energy consumption still rely on data de-
veloped in the late 1990s. Yet, consumer electronics products have changed dramati-
cally  over  the  last  decade,  and  their  energy  consumption  characteristics  have  im-
proved, particularly due to innovation as well as the success of the ENERGY STAR 
program. To provide better data to policymakers, CEA commissioned a recently com-
pleted independent analysis of consumer electronics energy use that covered all sig-
nificant  energy-using  product  categories  in  our  industry.  This  landmark  study  pro-
vides  a  more  refined  assessment  than  prior  studies,  particularly  for  product  usage. 
The  full  report,  titled  ‘‘Energy  Consumption  by  Consumer  Electronics  in  U.S.  Resi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

dences,’’  is  available  on  CEA’s  website  at  www.ce.org/energy.  Among  the  findings 
are the following: 

TWh, excluding DTVs; 

11 percent of residential electricity and 4 percent of total U.S. electricity; 

• Excluding  digital  televisions  (DTVs),  residential  consumer  electronics  consume 
• Annual  residential  consumer  electronics  electricity  consumption  equals  147 
• There  has  been  dramatic  growth  in  the  installed  base  of  products,  especially 
• Active-mode  power  consumption  varies  with  device  type  and  has  increased  for 
TVs and PCs but decreased for computer monitors; 
• With  the  exception  of  complex  set-top  boxes,  standby  power  consumption  has 
generally  decreased,  a  testament  to  the  effectiveness  of  the  ENERGY  STAR 
program. 

PCs, computer monitors, set-top boxes and DVD players; 

As indicated, the only significant category excluded from this study is digital tele-
visions.  The  existing  standard  for  measuring  TV  energy  consumption  in  on-mode  is 
outdated  and  inappropriate  for  measuring  power  consumption  for  today’s  digital 
televisions.  To  address  this  issue,  an  international  industry  standards  development 
committee  involving  a  wide  variety  of  private  and  public  sector  stakeholders  re-
cently  completed  the  draft  of  a  new  standard  that  will  provide  a  fair  measurement 
of  TV  energy  use  across  all  types  of  DTV  displays.  Simultaneously,  CEA  initiated 
a  project  to  collect  TV  power  consumption  data  using  the  new  international  draft 
standard  so  that  CEA’s  overall  energy  use  study  can  be  updated  this  summer.  The 
DTV  data  also  will  be  provided  to  support  the  ENERGY  STAR program,  which  is 
revising its specification for televisions. 

As  noted  above,  standby  power  consumption  has  not  decreased  for  the  category 
of  set-top  boxes,  which  includes  cable  and  satellite  set-top  devices.  Currently,  there 
is  no  ENERGY  STAR program  covering  set-top  boxes.  CEA  believes  this  product 
category  represents  an  important  opportunity  for  ENERGY  STAR,  and  CEA  is 
working with the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency which this spring began de-
velopment of a new ENERGY STAR specification for set-top boxes. 

In  addition  to  our  energy  use  analysis,  CEA  commissioned  another  study,  to  be 
completed  this  week,  which  examines  the  energy-saving  and  emissions-reducing 
benefits  of  using  consumer  electronics  products  for  telecommuting  and  e-commerce. 
Telecommuting  reduces  energy  consumption  associated  with  transportation  to  and 
from the office and, in some cases, a portion of the energy associated with commer-
cial  office  space.  The  draft  final  version  of  this  study  estimates  that  telecommuting 
today reduces energy consumption by an amount equivalent to the annual electricity 
consumption  of  between  approximately  0.8  million  and  1.1  million  U.S.  households. 
2. CEA has been a leader in developing industry standards supporting energy effi-

ciency. 

The  industry  standards  setting  process  is  an  important  forum  for  developing 
standards  relevant  to  energy  efficiency.  CEA,  an  American  National  Standards  In-
stitute-accredited standards development organization, has developed two voluntary 
industry standards related to energy use in set-top boxes. As noted earlier, CEA and 
its  members  also  have  supported  the  development  of  a  new  international  industry 
standard for measuring power consumption for today’s digital televisions, as the cur-
rent decades-old standard is inappropriate for today’s DTVs. 

3. CEA informs consumers about the energy use of consumer electronics. 
CEA believes that our industry has a responsibility to inform consumers about the 
energy  use  of  their  products.  This  year,  CEA  launched  a  new  consumer  education 
initiative  built  on  myGreenElectronics.org,  a  comprehensive  resource  focused  on  the 
energy-conscious and environmentally responsible use of consumer electronics at all 
phases  of  a  product’s  life  cycle.  The  energy  efficiency  portion  of  the  site  presents 
common-sense  consumer  tips  for  saving  energy  with  electronics.  Additionally,  CEA 
added  an  energy-use  calculator  to  myGreenElectronics.org  which  allows  consumers 
to  calculate  and  understand,  in  terms  of  watts  and  dollars,  how  much  is  required 
on  average  to  power  their  electronic  products.  Finally,  the  website  includes  a  tool 
that enables consumers to search for products for which energy efficiency is a selling 
point. 

4. CEA showcases and promotes energy-efficient products. 
CEA  has  used  the  International  CES  as  a  platform  to  highlight  the  importance 
of energy efficiency and conservation, including displays of energy efficient products 
and technologies; conference sessions on energy efficiency and public policy; and an 
eco-design award for environmentally-friendly products. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

In addition, CEA organized an energy efficiency product technology demonstration 
on Capitol Hill on May 16, 2007, which highlighted energy efficiency and innovation 
in several product categories, including desktop and laptop computers, cable set-top 
boxes, and televisions. 

The  best  way  to  encourage  improved  energy  efficiency  in  the  consumer  electronics 

industry is through the ENERGY STAR program. 

The  market  for  consumer  electronics  is  dynamic,  highly  competitive  and  charac-
terized  by  rapid  innovation,  significant  time-to-market  pressures,  rapid  rates  of 
market penetration, and rapid transition from one technology to another. Consumer 
electronics  products  are  vastly  different  by  design,  function,  consumer  use  and  per-
formance than the residential, industrial and commercial appliances and electro-me-
chanical equipment that have been subject to the U.S. Department of Energy stand-
ards and rulemaking process. 

Unlike  residential,  industrial  and  commercial  appliances,  which  tend  to  be  de-
signed for a single purpose, consumer electronics typically offer several features and 
functions and are used in at least three ways that distinguish them from appliances. 
First,  people  use  consumer  electronics  to  communicate  with  one  another;  they  also 
use  consumer  electronics  for  entertainment;  and,  finally,  people  use  consumer  elec-
tronics to receive and store information. 

In  light  of  these  characteristics  and  considerations,  the  best  public  policy  for  en-
couraging  and  supporting  energy  efficiency  in  the  consumer  electronics  industry  is 
the  ENERGY  STAR program.  This  government-industry  partnership  program, 
which  covers  more  than  a  dozen  major  categories  of  electronics,  provides  the  nec-
essary  flexibility,  market-orientation,  competitive  incentive  and  consumer  recogni-
tion that support energy efficiency for our dynamic industry. Most importantly, EN-
ERGY STAR has a long and established track record of success. 

As a voluntary, consumer-oriented program, ENERGY STAR has resulted in sig-

nificant energy savings and reduced greenhouse gas emissions. 

The consumer electronics industry is a strong supporter of the voluntary, market- 
driven and national approach to saving energy represented by the Federal ENERGY 
STAR program  (www.energystar.gov).  This  successful  government-industry  effort, 
which  benefits  from  strong  participation  by  manufacturers,  captures  a  broad  range 
of  consumer  electronics  and  creates  a  competitive  incentive  for  energy  savings.  The 
ENERGY STAR program, coupled with the natural trends toward energy efficiency 
in  electronics  design,  provides  consumers  with  the  products  and  features  they  de-
mand, along with a logo recognized by almost two-thirds of consumers. 

ENERGY  STAR is  clearly  the  best  policy  approach  to  saving  energy  in  the  con-
sumer  electronics  sector,  and  it  has  resulted  in  significant  energy  savings  and  re-
duced greenhouse gas emissions. As noted earlier, the ENERGY STAR program for 
consumer electronics and residential office equipment has saved 18.8 billion kWh of 
energy  and  avoided  emissions  totaling  3.8  million  metric  tons  of  carbon  equivalent, 
according  to  the  U.S.  Environmental  Protection  Agency’s  latest  annual  report  on 
ENERGY STAR. In addition, according to EPA, consumer electronics accounted for 
31  percent  of  energy  saved  by  all  residential  products  in  the  ENERGY  STAR pro-
gram. Finally, consumer electronics including computers and monitors represent 55 
percent or 1.1 billion of the two billion purchases of ENERGY STAR products since 
1992. 

While continuing to target and reduce power consumption of products in low-power 
standby mode, ENERGY STAR is evolving to address active mode power consump-
tion. 

For  most  of  its  history  with  consumer  electronics,  the  ENERGY  STAR program 
has  focused  on  reducing  standby-mode  power  consumption.  Recently,  ENERGY 
STAR has  begun  to  take  a  more  holistic  view  of  a  product’s  energy  use  by  consid-
ering  active-mode  electricity  use  as  well.  The  ENERGY  STAR specifications  for 
computers  and  imaging  equipment  take  into  account  both  active  and  standby  mode 
power  consumption.  The  revised  ENERGY  STAR specification  for  televisions  as 
well  as  the  new  ENERGY  STAR specification  for  set-top  boxes  also  will  take  into 
account  active  mode  energy  use  in  addition  to  standby.  For  these  and  other  con-
sumer electronics products, the consideration of active mode power use presents new 
challenges  related  to  operating  modes,  product  features,  and  consumer  usage  pat-
terns.  CEA  and  its  members  will  continue  to  work  closely  with  EPA  to  ensure  out-
comes that achieve energy savings while protecting innovation and consumer choice. 
Despite  its  success,  the  ENERGY  STAR program  is  threatened  by  unnecessary 

regulation at the state level. 

In 2005, the California Energy Commission (CEC) imposed unprecedented regula-
tions  limiting  the  energy  consumption  of  several  categories  of  consumer  audio  and 
video  products  as  well  as  external  power  supplies,  also  known  as  AC  power  adapt-
ers,  which  are  used  with  a  wide  range  of  consumer  and  commercial  products.  We 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

support the CEC’s focus on energy use, but we are very concerned about the CEC’s 
specific approach. 

To support its regulations for consumer audio and video products, the CEC relied 
on  outdated  and  inaccurate  information  about  energy  consumption  which  led  to  er-
roneous  conclusions  about  cost-effectiveness  and  energy  savings.  Moreover,  for  one 
particular product category not yet on the market in the U.S., digital television con-
verter boxes, the CEC relied on claims that tens of thousands of units were already 
in the hands of California consumers. 

Of particular concern relevant to ENERGY STAR is that the CEC’s new manda-
tory regulations for consumer audio and video products and external power supplies 
are based on the voluntary thresholds established within the ENERGY STAR pro-
gram. Though the ENERGY STAR specifications on which the CEC based its regu-
lations  have  been  superseded  by  new  ENERGY  STAR specifications  in  several 
cases, they were never intended as nor negotiated to be mandatory limits after any 
set  period  of  time.  For  external  power  supplies,  the  CEC’s  mandatory  regulations 
are identical to the voluntary ENERGY STAR specifications for this same category. 
These  voluntary  criteria  for  power  supplies  had  just  been  negotiated  by  ENERGY 
STAR program representatives and industry several months prior to the CEC’s ac-
tion which made them mandatory. 

The  success  of  the  ENERGY  STAR program  is  in  fact  due  to  its  voluntary  na-
ture.  ENERGY  STAR program  criteria  are  the  result  of  broad  industry  participa-
tion, careful negotiation, and recognition of market and technological facts and limi-
tations.  Contrary  to  the  spirit  and  purpose  of  the  ENERGY  STAR program,  the 
California  Energy  Commission,  in  its  revised  Appliance  Efficiency  Regulations,  cre-
ated  mandatory  regulations  based  on  voluntary  specifications.  The  CEC’s  action 
threatens  to  undermine  the  future  success  of  the  ENERGY  STAR program  itself. 
Once the voluntary ENERGY STAR program criteria are viewed as potential man-
dates,  uncertainty  among  manufacturers  increases,  and  the  negotiations  leading  to 
the  program  criteria  would  be  altered.  In  a  recent  CEA  member  survey,  more  than 
half of respondents indicated that mandatory standards based on ENERGY STAR 
program criteria would discourage future participation in the ENERGY STAR pro-
gram.  In  this  way,  the  CEC’s  mandatory  standards  for  consumer  audio  and  video 
products  and  external  power  supplies  will  weaken  the  national  ENERGY  STAR 
program,  with  unfortunate  consequences  for  consumers  and  manufacturers,  as  well 
as energy savings in general. 

In  light  of  these  issues  and  concerns,  CEA  has  urged  the  CEC  to  withdraw  its 
regulations for consumer audio and video products and recognize the success of vol-
untary  programs  such  as  ENERGY  STAR,  which  better  support  energy  efficiency 
in the consumer electronics market. 
Conclusion 

In many ways, electronics are part of an energy savings solution. Many home net-
working  products  help  save  energy  by  providing  increased  control  over  home  heat-
ing,  cooling  and  lighting  systems.  Information  technology  and  telecommunications 
products allow teleworking and remote access to information and entertainment con-
tent, both of which save fuel and reduce greenhouse gas emissions. In addition, elec-
tronics  are  key  enabling  technologies  that  drive  energy  efficiency  in  various  other 
industrial sectors such as automobiles and manufacturing. 

This committee’s focus on energy efficiency is important and necessary. As policy-
makers  consider  programs  and  policies  that  support  the  efficient  use  of  energy,  we 
urge Congress to support innovation and promote consumer-oriented initiatives like 
ENERGY STAR which are the keys to energy efficiency achievements for the con-
sumer electronics industry. 

Thank  you  again  for  the  opportunity  to  share  CEA’s  position  on  this  important 

public policy issue. I look forward to addressing any questions you may have. 

Senator KERRY. Thank you very much, Mr. Johnson. 
Mr. Birnbaum? 
STATEMENT OF JAY BIRNBAUM, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT 

AND GENERAL COUNSEL, CURRENT GROUP, LLC 

Mr.  BIRNBAUM.  Good  afternoon,  Chairman  Kerry.  Thank  you.  I 
appreciate  the  opportunity  to  talk,  this  afternoon,  about  Smart 
Electric Grids. 

CURRENT  Group,  my  company,  designs,  deploys,  and  operates 
Smart  Electric  Grids  for  electric  utilities.  Smart  Grids  are  crucial 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

for  our  country’s  national  security,  economic  stability  and  develop-
ment, and energy policy, overall. 

Let me talk about what we—what I mean when I refer to ‘‘smart 
grid.’’  We’re  not  referring  just  to  advanced  meters  or  distributed 
energy  or  renewable  resources,  although  we  are  talking  about  all 
of  those  items,  as  well.  A  ‘‘smart  grid,’’  in  particular,  is  a  stable, 
fully  automated,  self-healing  distribution  network  that  alerts  the 
utility  company  immediately  when  problems  arise  in  the  network. 
It  then  triggers  prompt  and  even  automated  preventive  and 
proactive corrective action by the utility. This improves the utility’s 
efficiency,  and  enables  demand-side  management  and  distributed 
energy  resources,  and  increases  the  overall  reliability  and  security 
of our power supplies. 

If you would indulge me for 1 minute on a technical description, 
what  we  do  when  we  create  a  Smart  Grid  is,  we  install  sensors 
throughout  the  electric  distribution  grid,  from  the  substation  all 
the  way  down  to  an  end-user  premise.  Even  appliances  can  be 
equipped,  as  some  of  the  previous  panelists  have  mentioned,  with 
devices that can help the utility company manage those appliances 
from a demand response standpoint. The utility company then can 
communicate with those devices over a high-speed communications 
system  and  a  high-powered  computing  system.  Right  now,  utility 
companies really don’t know what goes on inside their distribution 
grids between the substation and the end-users, and what a Smart 
Grid  enables  them  to  do  is  not  only  to  know  what’s  going  on,  but 
to  avoid  outages,  repair  outages  much  more  quickly  when  they  do 
occur, and create much more efficient distribution technologies. 

The Smart Grid is available today. This is not a technology of the 
future.  CURRENT  is  deploying  the  Nation’s  first  true  system-wide 
Smart  Grid  in  the  Dallas/Fort  Worth  region  of  Texas.  When  fin-
ished, it will cover nearly 2 million homes and business. We invite 
you  and  the  other  members  of  the  Subcommittee  to  come  see  it  in 
Texas;  or,  if  that’s  a  little  far  from  your  jurisdiction,  since  we’re  a 
Maryland-based  company,  we  actually  can  demonstrate  it  to  you 
right outside the Capitol Beltway. Some members of the Committee 
staff  and  other  members  of—staff  members  within  the  Congress 
have witnessed this demonstration. 

Because  the  technology  is  available  today,  Mr.  Chairman,  one 
thing that we would caution Congress about doing is trying to leg-
islate  Smart  Grid  technologies  in  such  a  way  that,  although  well 
intended,  will  actually  delay  deployments.  Further  studies,  addi-
tional  administration-based  commissions,  and  even  Federal  fund-
ing, for the most part, aren’t necessary for advancing Smart Grids. 
What  we  need  to  do  is  tackle  the  disincentives  and  regulatory  un-
certainties  that  utilities  have,  and  address  those,  hopefully  at  the 
Federal  level,  and  create  incentives  for  utility  companies  to  actu-
ally  deploy  the  technology.  One  area  where  Federal  funding  might 
be  necessary  is  in—for  significantly  rural  and  other  hard-to-serve 
areas. 

Right  now,  the  peak  demand  for  electricity  is  projected  to  in-
crease  by  19  percent  in  this  country  over  the  next  10  years,  yet 
spending  for  capital  improvements  is  only  supposed  to  increase  by 
about  6  percent,  and  that  tends  to  be  more  disproportionately  fa-
vored  toward  generation  and  transmission,  not  in  the  local  dis-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

tribution  grid.  Ten  to  20  percent  of  electricity  is  actually  lost,  by 
the  time  it  is  generated,  before  it  actually  reaches  the  end-user, 
due to faults and inefficiencies in the distribution and transmission 
systems, and a Smart Grid can actually address a lot of these inef-
ficiencies. 

We’ve  all  seen  examples  of  the  vulnerabilities  of  our  local  dis-
tribution  networks.  The  most  well  known  is  perhaps  the  August 
1993 blackout, but we’ve had a number of storm-related and power- 
supply  related  outages.  All  of  our  local  newspapers  have  examples 
of problems with reliability utility companies have when their grids 
break down and they don’t quite know why, or where, those break-
downs are occurring. 

EPRI,  the  Electric  Power  Research  Institute,  estimates  that 
power  outages  and  power-quality  disruptions  cost  U.S.  businesses 
at  least  $100  billion  a  year,  87  percent  of  which,  EPRI  estimates, 
could  actually  be  avoided  by  a  Smart  Grid.  EPRI  also  estimates 
that reduced CO2 emissions—or CO2 emissions could be reduced by 
as  much  as  25  percent,  and  electric  consumption,  generally,  re-
duced  by  as  much  as  10  percent  through  implementation  of  a 
Smart Grid. 

A Smart Grid can make more use out of plug-in vehicles and re-
newable  and  distributed  energy  resources.  For  instance,  you  can 
plug your car in at night, while the energy prices are at its lowest. 
You  can  then  actually  draw  electricity  from  that  car  and  all  the 
other  cars  that  are  parked  during  the  day  while  energy  prices  are 
at their highest, thereby, saving money and actually mitigating the 
need for peak power plants. 

Similarly,  with  respect  to  solar  or  wind  or  other  renewable 
sources  of  energy  that  are  not  available  24  hours  a  day,  365  days 
a  year,  the  utility  company  can  match  demand  with  those  sources 
of  energy,  so  you  can  decide  to  sign  up  to  a  program  that  not  only 
reduces your electric consumption by turning off a pool pump or an 
air-conditioner  or  a  water  heater  while  prices  are  high,  but  also 
while green energy sources are not available. 

For this reason, we think any renewable portfolio standards that 
Congress  adopts  should  include  investments  in  Smart  Grid  to  the 
same  extent  as  investments  in  renewables.  The  greenest  and  the 
cheapest kilowatt is the one we never have to generate. 

Finally,  Mr.  Chairman,  Federal  guidelines  are  generally  re-
quired,  because  utility  companies,  although  aware  of  the  tech-
nology—and  certainly  the  larger  utilities  have  access  to  capital  to 
build Smart Grids—they have a number of regulatory disincentives 
and  somewhat  skewed  economic  incentives  to  build  distribution 
plant improvements. And I’d be happy to talk to you and the—and 
your staff, at your convenience, about those incentives. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Birnbaum follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAY BIRNBAUM, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT AND 

GENERAL COUNSEL, CURRENT GROUP, LLC 

Thank you, Chairman Kerry, Ranking Member Ensign, and members of the Sub-

committee, for the opportunity to testify about Smart Electric Grids. 

A Smart Electric Grid enables an electric utility to monitor and maintain a more 
stable,  fully  automated,  self-healing  distribution  network  that  alerts  immediately 
when  problems  arise—and  then  triggers  prompt,  or  even  automated,  corrective  ac-
tion.  Smart  Grids  will  dramatically  improve  the  efficiency  of  the  Nation’s  electric 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

distribution infrastructure, enable demand-side management and distributed energy 
resources,  and  increase  the  reliability  and  security  of  the  Nation’s  power  supplies. 
Smart Grids are crucial to any comprehensive clean-energy policy and have the fol-
lowing capabilities: 

• Smart Grid enables electric utilities to— 

—improve efficiency through automated control and load balancing 
—save  businesses  billions  of  dollars  by  preventing,  pinpointing  and  restoring 

power outages and power disturbances 

—identify and prevent theft and tampering 
—improve  diagnostics  and  predictive  maintenance  based  on  rich  data  streams 

never before available 

—provide  real-time  monitoring  of  electric  grid  and  other  critical  infrastructure 

• Smart Grid helps energy consumers— 

—enhancing demand-side management programs means lower costs, fewer new 

power plants, and lower emissions 

—enabling real-time pricing and information about energy use gives consumers 
better  control  of  their  bills,  lets  market  forces  influence  usage  patterns,  and 
lowers overall energy costs 

• Smart Grid promotes alternative energy sources— 

—provides  monitoring  and  control  that  optimizes  generation  portfolios  of  dis-

persed renewable sources like wind and solar energy 

—facilitates  real-time  net  metering  that  enables  distributed  generation  based 

on accurate market signals 

CURRENT Group, LLC (‘‘CURRENT’’) designs, develops and deploys Smart Elec-
tricity Grids. Specifically, CURRENT deploys a network of advanced sensors capable 
of  collecting  and  monitoring  data  from  the  substation,  transformers,  meters  and 
other  electric  distribution  devices  along  the  power  lines,  all  connected  through  a 
high-speed  and  low-latency  communications  system  and  a  distributed  computing 
system capable of real time analysis and event prediction. The Smart Grid increases 
the  efficiency,  reliability,  safety,  and  security  of  the  electric  distribution  network 
and  expands  the  capabilities  and  benefits  of  demand-side  management  that  can 
lower  consumers’  energy  bills  and  reduce  the  need  to  build  more  greenhouse-gas 
emitting generation plants. 

To  deploy  the  Smart  Grid,  CURRENT  overlays  its  state-of-the-art  technology  at 
points throughout the existing electric distribution network. No retrofitting or condi-
tioning of the distribution electric grid is required. Once a CURRENT Smart Grid 
is  deployed,  it  can  communicate  with  points  anywhere  along  the  distribution  grid 
as  well  as  each  electric  outlet  inside  homes  and  businesses.  A  utility  therefore  can 
monitor  and  control  capacitor  banks,  transformers,  switches,  substations  and  other 
critical infrastructure, as well as manage Demand Response programs for end-users 
and  measure  and  coordinate  available  distributed  and  renewable  energy  sources. 
CURRENT is headquartered in Maryland with offices in Texas, New York, Ohio and 
California.1 
What are the Efficiency Benefits of the Smart Grid? 

Each  year,  the  Nation’s  131  million  electricity  customers  (nearly  every  household 
and  business)  pay  about  $247  billion  in  electric  revenues,  at  an  average  price  of 
about 7 cents per kilowatt-hour.2 Demand for electricity is projected to grow 40 per-
cent  by  2030,  which  in  turn  will  likely  increase  prices.  That  is  why  Smart  Grid  is 
crucial—it  offers  a  cost-effective  way  to  increase  the  amount  of  electricity  available 
through greater efficiency and network reliability. In other words, a megawatt saved 
is  even  better  than  a  megawatt  generated  because  it  costs  less  and  because  such 
efficiency-captured  electricity  is  as  at  least  as  clean  as  solar,  wind  or  other  renew-
able energy resources. 

The  strain  on  the  Nation’s  nearly  100-year  old  electric  distribution  grids  is  ex-
pected  to  worsen  in  coming  years  as  already  old  distribution  networks  age  further 
and demand for electricity outpaces the construction of new facilities. Peak demand 
for electricity is projected to rise by 19 percent nationally over the next decade, but 

1 Further information about CURRENT is available at http://www.currentgroup.com. 
2 Overview  of  the  Electric  Grid,  U.S.  Department  of  Energy,  Office  of  Electricity  Delivery  and 
Energy  Reliability,  Gridworks  Program,  available  at:  http://www.energetics.com/gridworks/ 
grid.html. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

capital  committed  to  electric  generation,  transmission  and  distribution  is  expected 
to grow by only 6 percent during the same period.3 Yet at the same time the Nation 
looks  to  meet  rising  demand,  10  to  20  percent  of  electric  energy  is  lost  before  it 
reaches  the  end-user  due  to  network  faults  or  inefficiencies—inefficiencies  that  can 
be reduced by a Smart Grid. 

The  Electric  Power  Research  Institute  (EPRI)  estimates  that  power  outages  and 
‘‘blink of the eye’’ power quality disruptions cost U.S. businesses at least $100 billion 
per year.4 Smart Grid can immediately increase the efficiency of businesses nation-
wide  by  providing  utilities  with  real-time  actionable  intelligence  about  their  net-
works that can be used to prevent such costly disruptions. 
What are the Demand Response Benefits of Smart Grid? 

Forty percent of the Nation’s energy consumption is used to produce the electricity 
that  is  essential  for  economic  prosperity  and  national  security  and  electric  power 
generation produces roughly 40 percent of the Nation’s carbon dioxide emissions. As 
stated  above,  increased  efficiency  of  existing  distribution  and  consumption  equates 
to making additional power available at lower costs and with less environmental im-
pact.  Such  efficiencies  reduce  the  need  for  constructing  new  generation  plants  and 
associated transmission facilities. Smart Grids can provide the communications and 
monitoring  necessary  to  manage  and  optimize  a  portfolio  of  distributed  and  renew-
able  energy  resources.  Indeed,  since  a  Smart  Grid  is  capable  of  reducing  electricity 
consumption up to 10 percent by 2020, leading to a reduction of 25 percent in CO2, 
it should be considered a renewable energy resource in its own right—after all, the 
cleanest  power  of  all  is  power  you  do  not  have  to  use  due  to  captured  efficiencies. 
The  Electric  Power  Research  Institute  projects  that  Smart  Grid-enabled  distribu-
tion  could  reduce  electrical  energy  consumption  by  5  percent  to  10  percent,  carbon 
dioxide  emissions  by  13  percent  to  25  percent,  and  the  costs  of  power-related  dis-
turbances to business by 87 percent.5 

A  Smart  Grid  enables  electric  utilities  to  increase  the  efficiency  of  their  existing 
electric distribution networks by enabling utilities in real time to collect and analyze 
power supply and usage data from distribution network elements and from millions 
of  end-user  devices.  A  Smart  Grid  can  collect  such  data  as  often  as  every  minute 
or  ‘‘on  demand,’’  which  provides  much  more  information  and  control  than  systems 
that allow less frequent reads fewer devices or of only end-user devices or distribu-
tion  elements.  A  Smart  Grid’s  real-time  capability  allows  utilities  and  end-users  to 
partner in shaving peak loads enough to reduce the need for expensive new genera-
tion  plants.  This  saves  end-users  money  and  helps  to  reduce  greenhouse  gas  emis-
sions  over  time—the  Electric  Power  Research  Institute  (EPRI)  has  projected  that 
the Smart Grid can reduced electricity consumption by up to 10 percent (comparable 
to  or  more  than  the  supply  available  from  renewables),  reduce  emissions  by  up  to 
25 percent and reduce the costs of power-related disturbances by 87 percent.6 

Many  Members  of  Congress  are  encouraging  use  of  renewable  energy  resources 
like  wind  and  solar  energy.  The  Smart  Grid  can  improve  the  value  of  such  renew-
able resources, which in the case of wind and solar are often dependent on the time 
of  year  or  prevailing  conditions  that  can  vary  throughout  any  24  hour  period.  With 
Smart  Grid,  real-time  information  about  the  availability  of  renewable-generated 
power  can  be  combined  with  real-time  information  about  the  demand  in  any  given 
part  of  the  grid.  For  this  reason,  any  Renewable  Portfolio  Standard  (RPS)  consid-
ered  by  the  Congress  should  treat  Smart  Grid  efficiencies  as  eligible  for  inclusion 
in RPS. 

Although we will continue to need new and improved generation plants, including 
those  that  provide  renewable  energy  resources  like  wind,  biomass,  and  solar,  the 
United  States  also  must  maximize  the  efficiency,  reliability,  security,  and  safety  of 
the  electric  distribution  network.  Another  benefit  of  Smart  Grid  is  its  ability  to  en-
sure  that  plug-in  electrical  vehicles  are  truly  a  clean-energy  option.  Although  70 
percent  of  all  cars,  trucks,  vans  and  SUVs  could  be  powered  from  the  electric  grid, 
the time-sensitive demand response enabled by Smart Grid and its ability to meas-
ure distributed generation sold back into the distribution grid is necessary to maxi-
mize the environmental and economic benefits of widespread plug-in electric vehicle 

3 The  Brattle  Group,  The  Power  of  Five  Percent:  How  Dynamic  Pricing  Can  Save  $35  Billion 
in  Electricity  Costs,  Discussion  Paper  filed  with  the  Maryland  Public  Service  Commission  (May 
16,  2007)  (citing  North  American  Electric  Reliability  Council,  2006  Long  Term  Reliability  As-
sessment). 

4 http://www.energyfuturecoalition.org/preview.cfm?catID=57 (citing EPRI estimate). 
5 See Electric Power Research Institute, Electricity Sector Framework for the Future: Achieving 
the  21st  Century  Transformation  (Aug.  2003),  page  42  (‘‘EPRI  Report’’),  copy  available  at: 
http://www.globalregulatorynetwork.org/PDFs/ESFFlvolume1.pdf. 

6 See EPRI Report, page 42. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

adoption.7 Automobiles can be charged during the lowest rate periods, say at night, 
and be used to distribute energy back into the grid at high peak times, thereby sav-
ing money and mitigating the need for peak power plants. 

Encouraging  a  Smart  Grid  also  will  help  American  companies  gain  and  preserve 
market leadership in what is fast becoming a worldwide market. Countries all over 
the  world  need  a  modernized  electric  grid,  and  companies  from  the  United  States 
can be leaders in this global market. Indeed, CURRENT and other American compa-
nies  already  are  pursuing  such  international  opportunities,  which  will  create  high 
tech jobs here at home. 
Why must Congress act to encourage Smart Grid? 

Smart  Grid  is  a  reality  today.  For  instance,  in  and  around  Dallas/Fort  Worth, 
Texas,  CURRENT  is  presently  deploying  the  Nation’s  first  true  Smart  Grid  with 
Oncor Electric Delivery. This system, which ultimately will reach almost two million 
homes  and  businesses,  is  already  reading  advanced  meters  at  15-minute  intervals; 
conducting  network  monitoring  that  can  detect  problems  before  they  cause  power 
outages, safety hazards or system quality problems; and providing power outage and 
restoration detection if outages do occur. 

Although  CURRENT  is  deploying  the  first  Smart  Grid  today,  utilities  in  general 
are slow to embrace new technologies largely because of regulatory uncertainty and 
economic  disincentives.  Federal  action  to  address  both  of  these  issues  is  essential 
to  accelerate  Smart  Grid  deployments.  Utilities  often  anticipate  that  their  discre-
tionary adoption of new technology may be politically challenged or that cost recov-
ery  will  be  denied  after  the  fact.  An  even  greater  disincentive  faces  a  utility  that 
might  seek  to  create  efficiency  or  encourage  lower  consumption.  Under  traditional 
regulatory  models,  a  utility  profits  by  selling  energy.  There  is  no  real  incentive  for 
a  for-profit  entity  to  spend  money  in  order  to  earn  less.  As  a  result,  utilities  have 
strong  regulatory  and  financial  incentives  to  spend  money  on  more  traditional 
items,  such  as  new  power  generation  plants,  rather  than  acquiring  new  technology 
to make more efficient use of existing power. An added aspect of such disincentives 
is  that  a  utility  can  earn  a  much  higher  rate  of  return  on  new  generation  plants 
than on conservation, so utilities accordingly can be expected to spend more on such 
traditional assets. 

As a result of the aging distribution networks, skyrocketing demand, the increas-
ing  costs  of  building  generation  plants,  and  the  existing  disincentives  for  change, 
CURRENT  believes  Federal  legislation  in  this  area  is  essential.  We  suggest  Con-
gress consider various incentives for utilities, including grant programs (particularly 
to small utilities that want to adopt Smart Grid), tax incentives, accelerated depre-
ciation,  financial  incentives  for  energy  efficiency  spending,  and  inclusion  of  Smart 
Grid  in  any  Renewable  Portfolio  Standard.  Suggested  investment  incentives  would 
include the following: 

Renewable  Portfolio  Standard—since  Smart  Grid  can  reduce  electricity  con-
sumption by up to 10 percent (an amount comparable to renewables), a utility’s 
deployment  of  a  Smart  Grid  should  be  included  in  any  Renewable  Portfolio 
Standard. 
Cost  Recovery—utilities  should  have  the  certainty  of  knowing  that  they  can  in-
clude in their rates the actual costs of investing in Smart Grid systems. 
Enhanced Return—utilities should be permitted to earn an enhanced return on 
their investment in Smart Grid systems, including a return on a portion of their 
operating and maintenance expenses, to induce utilities to spend on Smart Grid 
investments. 
Retained  Savings—As  an  alternative  to  an  actual  return  on  operating  and 
maintenance  expenses,  utilities  could  be  permitted  to  retain  a  meaningful  por-
tion of the savings resulting from such expenses to the extent they result in effi-
ciencies  that  otherwise  would  be  passed  on  to  end-users  (thereby  producing  a 
return on the utility’s expenditure).8 
Obsolete Equipment—A utility should be able to recover the costs of equipment 
rendered  obsolete  by  its  deployment  of  a  Smart  Grid  system,  based  on  the  re-
maining depreciable life of the obsolete equipment. 

7 Pacific  Northwest  National  Laboratory  Study,  available  at:  http://www.pnl.gov/news/re-

lease.asp?id=204 (Dec. 11, 2006). 

8 This  is  especially  applicable  since  O&M  expenditures  to  implement  a  Smart  Grid  will  cost 
the  utility,  and  therefore  its  rate  payers,  less  than  if  the  utility  were  to  capitalize  the  entire 
cost of building the Smart Grid. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

Regulatory  Reform—States  are  vital  players  in  the  regulation  of  the  Nation’s 
electric  infrastructure,  but  should  not  be  allowed  to  prohibit  or  impede  a  util-
ity’s deployment of a Smart Grid system on its distribution facilities. 

Although  CURRENT  encourages  Congress  to  act  now  to  encourage  the  further 
and  nationwide  deployment  of  the  Smart  Grid,  it  is  important  that  any  legislation 
first  do  no  harm.  CURRENT  would  like  to  underscore  the  delays  that  will  result 
if  legislation  were  to  focus  too  much  on  items  that,  although  well-intended,  would 
in  fact  delay  Smart  Grid  deployments,  such  as  additional  studies,  demonstration 
projects,  and  creation  of  additional  agencies.  The  technology  needed  for  a  Smart 
Grid already exists. The savings available from a Smart Grid are also demonstrable 
today. More study is not necessary. What is needed is to remove existing regulatory 
constraints  and  to  create  affirmative  incentives  for  rapid  action.  As  was  the  case 
decades ago when the Rural Electrification Act helped to wire the Nation, Congress 
should act to ensure that the benefits of a Smart Grid become available to all Amer-
icans as swiftly as possible. 

Senator KERRY. I look forward to that. Thank you very much. 
Mr. Hicks, you’re the cleanup. 

STATEMENT  OF  TOM  HICKS,  VICE  PRESIDENT,  LEADERSHIP 
IN  ENERGY  AND  ENVIRONMENTAL  DESIGNS  (LEED),  U.S. 
GREEN BUILDING COUNCIL 
Mr. HICKS. Thank you. 
My  name  is  Tom  Hicks,  and  I’m  the  Vice  President  of  LEED, 
which is the nationally recognized green-building rating system ad-
ministered by the U.S. Green Building Council. 

USGBC  is  a  nonprofit  coalition  of  more  than  9,500  private,  non-
profit,  and  governmental  organizations  working  to  transform  the 
building design, construction, and operations. Our vision is simple, 
that all buildings achieve sustainability within a generation. 

Thank  you  for  your  leadership  in  this  area,  Senator  Kerry,  and 

for providing us the opportunity to talk with you today. 

Across  the  spectrum  of  green  building,  new  products,  new  serv-
ices,  and  new  ways  of  tackling  building  process  are  emerging,  lay-
ing the foundation for what stands to be one of the greatest market 
evolutions in history. USGBC helps bring these innovations to mar-
ket  quickly,  using  its  role  as  a  market  educator  to  provide  the 
knowledge transfer that integrates new ideas and technologies into 
building practice. 

One  key  venue  is  USGBC’s  annual  Green  Build  International 
Expo  and  Conference,  which,  last  year,  attracted  13,000  profes-
sionals,  featured  almost  1,000  exhibitors,  and  had  12  full  edu-
cational  tracks  in  all  aspects  of  green  building,  setting  up  the 
mechanism for ongoing technology and idea-sharing. 

USGBC  also  encourages  the  introduction  of  new  ideas,  tech-
nologies, and scientific advances directly into the LEED rating sys-
tem.  Many  of  these  innovations  are  focused  on  optimizing  energy 
performance.  That’s  critical,  because  every  year,  buildings  are  re-
sponsible  for  39  percent  of  the  U.S.  CO2 emissions,  70  percent  of 
the U.S. electric—electricity consumption. They also use 15 trillion 
gallons of water and consume 40 percent of raw materials globally. 
Green  buildings  are  an  immediate  and  measurable  path  toward 
energy  independence  and  slowing  climate  change.  Green  buildings 
use  an  average  of  36  percent  less  energy  than  conventional  build-
ings,  with  a  corresponding  reduction  in  CO2 emissions.  In  fact,  if 
half of all new construction in the U.S. were built to that standard, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

it  would  be  the  equivalent  of  taking  more  than  1  million  cars  off 
the road every year. 

Green  buildings  make  sense,  both  for  the  environment  and  for 
the  bottom  line.  Studies  show  that,  on  average,  LEED  buildings 
cost less than 1.5 percent more than conventional construction, and 
that investment is paid back in full within the first year, based on 
energy savings alone. 

But energy savings aren’t the only story. Water conservation, re-
ductions  in  construction  waste  and  effective  storm-water  manage-
ment not only mean savings for the building owner, but also reduce 
the demand on municipal infrastructures. 

In fact, it’s the aggregation of practices in the five key areas ad-
dressed by LEED—energy, water, indoor air quality, materials, and 
site—that deliver true high-performance buildings. 

Health  and  productivity  benefits  are  equally  impressive.  Studies 
from  prestigious  organizations,  such  as  Carnegie  Mellon  Univer-
sity,  demonstrate  that  people  in  green  buildings  have  40  percent 
fewer  incidents  of  colds,  flu,  and  asthma.  Patients  in  green  hos-
pitals  are  discharged  as  much  as  2  and  a  half  days  earlier.  And 
children  in  green  schools  score  up  to  18  percent  better  on  test 
scores. 

The  lower  operating  costs  associated  with  the  LEED-certified 
buildings  are  resulting  in  buildings  with  higher  net  operating  in-
come, and thus, higher asset value than their conventional counter-
parts. Leading institutions, including Bank of America, PNC Bank, 
Goldman Sachs, Citigroup, Wells Fargo, and CB Richard Ellis have 
all embraced LEED. 

Insurance  companies,  including  AIG  and  Fireman’s  Fund,  now 
offer  premium  discounts  for  green  buildings.  Today,  889  buildings 
have been certified, and 6,700 more are in process, totaling 1.1 bil-
lion  square  feet.  Every  business  day,  $100  million  worth  of  con-
struction  registers  with  LEED.  There  are  LEED  projects  in  every 
State  and  in  26  countries,  and,  increasingly,  building  owners  and 
developers are choosing to certify their entire building portfolios. 

The  LEED  rating  system  addresses  all  building  types,  from  the 
individual home to commercial office buildings to large-scale devel-
opments.  It  also  addresses  the  full  building  life  cycle,  from  con-
struction to operations to renovations. 

As  green  buildings  are  integrated  into  the  mainstream,  costs 
come down, aggregate benefits go up, and the whole of the market 
is  driven  to  innovation.  It  is  the  case  study  for  how  even  a  large 
and fractured industry, one that represents 14.2 percent of the U.S. 
GDP, can change itself from the inside out, and how environmental 
achievements  can  be  won  side  by  side,  with  powerful  economic  re-
sults. 

USGBC  is  committed  to  our  mission,  because  green  buildings 
save  energy,  reduce  CO2 emissions,  conserve  water,  improve 
health, increase productivity, and cost less to operate and to main-
tain. Green buildings are becoming highly prized assets and a criti-
cally  important  part  of  the  solution  to  global  climate  change  and 
energy independence. 

Thank  you,  again,  for  the  opportunity  to  address  you  today.  We 
look  forward  to  working  with  you  to  accelerate  transformation  of 
the built environment to sustainability. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Hicks follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF TOM HICKS, VICE PRESIDENT, LEADERSHIP IN ENERGY AND 

ENVIRONMENTAL DESIGN (LEED), U.S. GREEN BUILDING COUNCIL 

Thank  you  for  providing  the  U.S.  Green  Building  Council  (USGBC)  with  the  op-
portunity to testify on the benefits of green buildings. We commend Chairman Kerry 
for his leadership in this critical area. 

My  name  is  Tom  Hicks,  and  I  am  USGBC’s  Vice  President  of  LEED,  USGBC’s 
green  building  rating  system  that  has  become  the  leading  national  rating  system 
for evaluating and certifying green buildings. It is a privilege to talk with you about 
the  role  of  the  Council  and  the  LEED (Leadership  in  Energy  and  Environmental 
Design)  Green  Building  Rating  SystemTM in  addressing  the  urgent  challenge  of  en-
ergy  efficiency  and  climate  change,  and  the  many  far-reaching  benefits  of  green 
building. 
The Impact of the Built Environment 

Buildings are an essential element of the solution to the energy, resource, and cli-

mate issues our country is facing. 

Buildings have a lifespan of 50–100 years, throughout which they continually con-
sume  energy,  water,  and  natural  resources,  thereby  generating  significant  CO2 
emissions.  In  fact,  buildings  are  responsible  for  39  percent  of  U.S.  CO2 emissions 
per  year.  If  the  U.S.  built  half  of  its  new  commercial  buildings  to  use  50  percent 
less energy, it would save over 6 million metric tons of CO2 annually, for the entire 
life of the buildings—the equivalent of taking more than 1 million cars off the road 
every year. 

In addition, buildings annually account for 39 percent of U.S. primary energy use; 
70 percent of U. S electricity consumption; use 12.2 percent of all potable water, or 
15  trillion  gallons  per  year;  and  consume  40  percent  of  raw  materials  globally  (3 
billion  tons  annually).  The  EPA  estimates  that  136  million  tons  of  building-related 
construction  and  demolition  debris  are  generated  in  the  U.S.  in  a  single  year.  (By 
way of comparison, the U.S. creates 209.7 million tons of municipal solid waste per 
year.) 

Green  buildings  are  a  significant  part  of  the  solution  to  the  problems  of  energy 
dependence  and  climate  change.  The  average  LEED  certified  building  uses  32  per-
cent  less  electricity,  26  percent  less  natural  gas  and  36  percent  less  total  energy 
than a conventional building. LEED certified buildings in the U.S. are, in aggregate, 
reducing  CO2 emissions  by  150,000  metric  tons  each  year,  which  equates  to  taking 
30,000 passenger cars off the road. 

Of  the  various  strategies  that  have  been  proposed,  building  green  is  one  of  the 
most effective for meeting the challenges of energy consumption and climate change. 
The  technology  to  make  substantial  reductions  in  energy  use  and  CO2 emissions  in 
buildings  already  exists;  modest  investments  in  energy-saving  and  other  climate- 
friendly  technologies  can  yield  buildings  and  communities  that  are  significantly 
more  environmentally  responsible,  more  profitable,  and  healthier  places  to  live  and 
work. 

By  addressing  the  whole  building,  from  construction  materials  to  cleaning  sup-
plies, LEED generates opportunities to reduce emissions and environmental impact 
throughout  the  supply  chain  and  the  complete  building  lifecycle.  Sixty  five  percent 
of the credits in the LEED Rating System reduce the CO2 footprint of the building. 
The avenues by which LEED mitigates climate change include: 
Energy 

LEED  awards  credits  for  reducing  energy  use  in  buildings  through  such  means 
as  installing  energy  efficient  heating  and  cooling  systems;  using  renewable  power 
(e.g.,  daylight,  solar  heating,  wind  energy);  requiring  building  commissioning;  and 
purchasing green power. 
Water 

On average, a LEED certified building uses 30 percent less water than a conven-
tional  building,  which  translates  to  more  than  1  million  gallons  of  water  saved  per 
year.  Reducing  the  amount  of  water  that  needs  to  be  conveyed  to  and  treated  by 
municipal wastewater treatment facilities also reduces pumping and process energy 
required  by  these  systems.  LEED  also  promotes  on-site  treatment  of  storm  water 
to minimize the burden on municipal treatment systems. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

Materials 

LEED  buildings  use  fewer  materials  and  generate  less  waste  through  measures 
such  as  reusing  existing  building  structures  whenever  possible;  developing  a  con-
struction  waste  management  plan;  salvaging  materials;  using  materials  with  recy-
cled content; using local materials; and implementing an on-site recycling plan. Re-
duced  materials  consumption  lowers  the  overall  embodied  energy  of  the  building, 
which has a direct impact on the building’s carbon footprint. 
Transit- and Density-Oriented Development 

LEED  buildings  earn  credits  for  being  located  near  public  transportation.  LEED 
also  rewards  car  pooling;  using  hybrid  or  electric  cars;  and  bicycling  or  walking  in-
stead  of  driving.  In  addition  to  the  emissions  produced  by  the  cars  themselves,  the 
infrastructure  required  to  support  vehicle  travel  increases  the  consumption  of  land 
and  non-renewable  resources,  alters  storm  water  flow  and  absorbs  heat  energy, 
which exacerbates the heat island effect. 
Green Building Trends and Market Transformation 

Just a few years ago, green building was the domain of a vanguard of innovative 
practitioners.  Today,  green  building  is  being  rapidly  adopted  into  the  mainstream 
of  building  practice  in  both  the  residential  and  commercial  sectors.  McGraw-Hill 
Construction  forecasts  that  the  combined  annual  commercial  and  residential  green 
building markets will total $62 billion by 2010. 

USGBC’s LEED Green Building Rating System serves as an essential, proven tool 
for  enabling  this  market  transformation.  Equally  as  important  as  recognizing  lead-
ing  practice  through  third-party  certification,  LEED  has  given  the  community  of 
building  design,  construction,  and  management  professionals  a  concise  framework 
for best-practices in high-performance green building design and operations. 

To date, there have been 889 LEED-certified buildings worldwide, with the major-
ity  in  the  United  States.  In  addition,  more  than  6,700  commercial  building  projects 
have  enrolled  with  USGBC,  and  are  pursuing  certification.  In  total,  1.1  billion 
square feet of construction space is being built to meet LEED, and that figure grows 
daily. 

The growth is manifest in USGBC’s green building professional accreditation pro-
gram  as  well.  Since  the  program’s  launch  in  2002,  more  than  36,000  professionals 
from all disciplines have become LEED Accredited Professionals (LEED APs). 

The  LEED  Rating  System  was  originally  developed  for  new  commercial  construc-
tion  projects,  and  the  rapid  uptake  of  the  program  demonstrated  that  the  market 
needed  additional  tools  to  address  different  building  types  and  lifecycle  phases. 
USGBC released rating systems for the operations and maintenance and commercial 
interiors  markets  in  2006,  and  is  currently  pilot-testing  rating  systems  for  homes 
and  neighborhood  developments.  Already,  more  than  6,000  homes  and  200  builders 
are  participating  in  the  LEED  for  Homes  pilot  test;  nearly  200  homes  have  been 
certified  to  date.  LEED  for  Neighborhood  Development,  which  integrates  principles 
of  smart  growth,  urbanism,  and  green  building  at  the  neighborhood  level,  is  also 
being  pilot-tested.  More  than  350  projects  have  enrolled  for  consideration  for  the 
pilot. USGBC recently launched LEED for Schools, and is completing rating systems 
for healthcare facilities, retail, labs, and campuses. 

In  addition,  USGBC  is  currently  piloting  a  new  LEED  program  for  portfolio  per-
formance  that  meets  the  needs  of  large  owners  of  commercial  real  estate  who  are 
seeking  to  green  their  entire  real  estate  portfolios.  This  innovative  approach  pro-
vides  cost-effective  solutions  to  improve  building  performance  across  entire  compa-
nies and organizations. The goal is to facilitate immediate and measurable achieve-
ments that will contribute to long-term sustainability. The portfolio program focuses 
on  the  permanent  integration  of  green  building  and  operational  measures  into 
standard business practice. USGBC is working with 26 market leaders as a part of 
the pilot, including American University, Bank of America, California State Univer-
sity—Los  Angeles,  Cushman  &  Wakefield,  Emory  University,  HSBC,  N.A.  ,  PNC 
Bank,  State  of  California  Department  of  General  Services.,  Syracuse  University, 
Thomas  Properties  Group,  Transwestern,  University  of  California  at  Merced,  Uni-
versity of California at Santa Barbara, University of Florida, and USAA Real Estate 
Company. 
Green Building and Innovation 

Across the spectrum of green building, new products, new services and new ways 
of  tackling  building  process  are  emerging,  laying  the  foundation  for  what  stands  to 
be one of the greatest market evolutions in history. USGBC takes seriously its role 
in  helping  these  innovations  come  to  market  quickly,  and  uses  its  role  as  market 
educator to provide the support and visibility these kinds of advances deserve. One 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

key venue is UGBC’s annual Greenbuild International Expo and Conference, which 
last  year  attracted  more  than  13,000  attendees,  featured  almost  1,000  exhibitors, 
and 12 full educational tracks in all aspects of green building, setting up the mecha-
nism for ongoing technology and idea sharing. 

USGBC  also  encourages  the  introduction  of  new  ideas  and  scientific  advances  di-
rectly into the LEED rating system through Innovation in Design credits, which can 
be introduced and tested by individual project teams before being put out for public 
comment and balloted through the consensus membership process. 

Green  building  technologies  touch  every  element  of  green  building  design—from 
site  selection,  to  water  and  energy  efficiency  and  management,  to  indoor  environ-
mental quality, to recycling of construction waste. 

Many of these innovations are focused on optimizing energy performance, and re-
duce  environmental  impacts  associated  with  excessive  energy  use.  The  fluorescent 
lamp, for example, saves three-quarters of a ton of carbon dioxide and 15 lbs of sul-
fur dioxide. It also saves $30 to $50 over the life of the bulb because it uses 75 per-
cent less energy and lasts 10 times as long. 

ENERGY  STAR has  been  a  significant  catalyst  for  the  development  of  energy 
efficient appliances for office buildings, ranging from computers and copiers to print-
ers  and  water  coolers.  All  save  on  the  amount  of  electricity  used,  reducing  the  de-
mand for energy. 

Green  buildings  have  also  been  a  significant  driver  for  renewable  energy  re-
sources,  by  encouraging  on-site  renewable  energy  in  order  to  reduce  environmental 
impacts associated with fossil fuel energy use. Some of the innovations in this area 
include: 

• Biomass, where plant material is converted to heat energy in a boiler or gasifier 
to  generate  electricity.  The  heat  is  converted  to  mechanical  energy  in  a  steam 
turbine,  gas  turbine  or  an  internal  combustion  engine,  and  the  mechanical  de-
vice  drives  a  generator  that  produces  electricity.  Current  biomass  technology 
produces heat in a direct-fired configuration. Biomass gasifiers are under devel-
opment and are being introduced to the marketplace. 

• Photovoltaics  (PVs)  are  composite  materials  that  convert  sunlight  directly  into 
electrical power. In recent years, the efficiency of the cells has increase and the 
cost  has  dropped.  As  a  result  Building-Integrated  Photovoltaics  (BIPVs)  are  in-
creasingly incorporated into building elements such as the roof, cladding or win-
dow systems. They generate direct current electricity, which must be converted 
to alternating current before it can be used in mainstream building systems. 

• Wind  energy,  where  wind  is  converted  into  electricity  via  large  rotors,  has 
gained  a  lot  of  attention  in  buildings.  Advances  in  the  wind  energy  market  in-
clude the development of a vertical-axis wind turbine which relies on simplicity 
of design and advanced blade configuration to create a potentially low-cost, effi-
cient power system. 

• Green  roofs,  where  a  roof  of  a  building  that  is  partially  or  completely  covered 
with  vegetation  and  soil,  or  a  growing  medium,  planted  over  a  waterproofing 
membrane.  It  provides  amenity  space  for  building  users,  reduces  heating  loads 
on buildings, cleans air, reduces storm water runoff and increases roof life span. 
Research  has  shown  that  electrical  lighting  makes  up  a  significant  portion  of  en-
ergy  use  in  buildings,  especially  commercial  buildings.  Re-designing  new  buildings 
to  optimize  the  use  of  natural  light  or  ‘‘daylighting’’  to  replace  electrical  lighting  in 
areas  such  as  atriums,  hallways,  cafeterias,  and  playrooms  can  have  a  significant 
impact on energy reduction. 

Electrochromic or ‘‘smart’’ windows save energy by controlling the amount of solar 
heat that passes through the window glass. For example, in winter, they lighten to 
allow  heat  to  pass  through  the  glass  but  not  back  out,  reducing  the  amount  of  en-
ergy  needed  for  home  heating.  In  summer,  they  darken  without  blocking  visible 
light to reduce the amount of heat coming into the home and decrease cooling costs. 
Electrochromic  windows  darken  or  lighten  by  a  chemical  reaction  that  is  set  off  by 
a  small  voltage  (you  can  run  an  entire  house  on  the  voltage  required  to  run  one 
traditional light bulb). 

Although  they  can  technically  be  classified  as  electrochromic  materials,  the  new 
reflective hydrides that are being developed for windows behave in a noticeably dif-
ferent  way.  Instead  of  absorbing  light,  they  reflect  it.  Thin-film  solar  cell  material 
made of nickel-magnesium alloy is able to switch back and forth from a transparent 
to  a  reflective  state.  The  switch  can  be  powered  by  electrochromic  or  hydrogen  and 
oxygen gases (gas-chromic technology). Furthermore, this material has the potential 
to be even more energy efficient than other electrochromic materials. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

High-performance,  whole-building  design  methods  integrate  passive  solar,  energy 
efficiency and renewable technologies to reduce building energy consumption. Many 
buildings  use  passive  solar  to  offset  significant  electrical  loads,  such  as  replacing 
electrical lighting with natural light or ‘‘daylighting’’ and reducing heating and cool-
ing  loads  by  storing  heat  and  cool  air  in  building  materials  such  as  brick.  Low-cost 
solar  hot  water  systems  can  significantly  contribute  to  reaching  the  goal  of  cost-ef-
fective energy savings greater than 50 percent in most climates. 

On  the  horizon,  there  is  great  promise  for  inexpensive  highly  efficient  nanocom-
posite  materials  for  solar  energy  conversion  and  thermoelectric  materials  that  can 
transform heat directly into electrical energy. 

It  is  clear  that  new  technologies  are  transforming  not  just  what  we  do  but  how 

we do it, reinventing the building industry and driving market transformation. 
Costs and Benefits of Green Building Using LEED 

Projects enroll in LEED by registering their intent with USGBC and paying a fee 
of $450. Project certification fees are approximately $0.03 per square foot, and aver-
age about $4,500. 

According to third-party studies published and updated by Capital E and by Davis 
Langdon  in  the  past  24  months,  the  average  total  additional  cost  for  using  LEED 
on  a  project  (including  professional  fees,  materials,  and  systems)  is  1.5  percent  or 
less. That cost is typically repaid in the first 10 months of building operation based 
on energy savings alone. 

For  example,  according  to  U.S.  Banker  Magazine,  the  greening  of  the  Bank  of 
America  Tower,  being  constructed  in  Manhattan,  is  adding  less  than  2  percent  of 
its  projected  cost.  The  project  expects  to  recoup  any  investments  through  reduced 
electricity usage and water-saving techniques. 

Harvard  Business  Review  cites  the  DPR  building  in  Sacramento,  California,  as 
having  invested  1.4  percent  upfront  additional  costs  to  implement  green  measures. 
The  project  is  expected  to  more  than  make  up  the  investment  by  generating  over 
$400,000 in operations savings. 
About the U.S. Green Building Council 

The  U.S.  Green  Building  Council  (USGBC)  is  a  nonprofit  membership  organiza-
tion  with  a  vision  of  sustainable  buildings  and  communities  within  a  generation. 
Our  9,500  member  organizations  and  92,000  active  individual  volunteers  include 
leading  corporations  and  real  estate  developers,  architects,  engineers,  builders, 
schools  and  universities,  nonprofits,  trade  associations  and  government  agencies  at 
the  Federal,  state  and  local  levels.  Green  buildings  save  energy,  reduce  CO2 emis-
sions, conserve water, improve health, increase productivity, cost less to operate and 
maintain,  and  increasingly  cost  no  more  to  build  than  conventional  structures.  Be-
cause  of  these  benefits,  they  are  becoming  highly  prized  assets  for  companies,  com-
munities and individuals nationwide. 

As the developer and administrator of the LEED (Leadership in Energy and En-
vironmental Design) Green Building Rating SystemTM, USGBC is a leader in green 
building  and  green  development.  Founded  in  1993,  USGBC  is  a  501(c)(3)  nonprofit 
organization,  an  ANSI-accredited  standards  developer  and  a  newly  active  partici-
pant  in  ISO  technical  working  groups.  The  organization  is  governed  by  a  diverse, 
31-member Board of Directors that is elected by the USGBC membership. Volunteer 
committees  representing  users,  service  providers,  manufacturers,  and  other  stake-
holders  steward  and  develop  all  USGBC  programs,  including  the  LEED  rating  sys-
tem, through well-documented consensus processes. Seventy local USGBC Chapters 
and  Affiliates  throughout  the  U.S.  provide  educational  programming  to  local  com-
munities. 

A  staff  of  more  than  85  professionals  administers  an  extensive  roster  of  edu-
cational and informational programs that support the LEED Rating System in addi-
tion to broad-based support of green building. USGBC’s LEED Professional Accredi-
tation program, workshops, green building publications, and the annual Greenbuild 
conference provide green building education for professionals and consumers world-
wide. 
About the LEED Green Building Rating SystemTM 

LEED  is  the  nationally  recognized  benchmark  for  the  design,  construction,  and 
operations  of  high-performance  green  buildings.  Since  2001,  LEED  has  provided 
building  owners  and  operators  with  design  and  measurement  tools  with  the  reli-
ability  and  integrity  they  need  to  have  an  immediate,  quantifiable  impact  on  their 
buildings’ performance. 

LEED  is  a  voluntary  standards  and  certification  program,  and  was  developed  to 
promote leadership in the building industry by providing an objective, verifiable def-
inition  of  ‘‘green.’’  LEED  is  a  flexible  tool  that  can  be  applied  to  any  building  type 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

and  any  building  lifecycle  phase,  including  new  commercial  construction;  existing 
building operations and maintenance; interior renovations; speculative development; 
commercial  interiors;  homes;  neighborhoods;  schools;  healthcare  facilities;  labs;  and 
retail establishments. 

LEED  promotes  a  whole-building  approach  to  sustainability  by  recognizing  per-
formance in five key areas, with an additional category to recognize innovation: sus-
tainable site development, water savings, energy efficiency, materials and resources 
and  indoor  environmental  quality.  Each  category  includes  certain  minimum  stand-
ards (‘‘prerequisites’’) that all projects must meet, followed by additional credits that 
are earned by incorporating green design and construction techniques. Four progres-
sive  levels  of  LEED  certification—Certified,  Silver,  Gold  and  Platinum—are  award-
ed  based  on  the  number  of  credits  achieved.  USGBC  provides  independent,  third- 
party verification that a building meets these high performance standards. 

USGBC  member  committees  develop  the  LEED  Rating  System  via  a  robust  con-
sensus process that enables USGBC to incorporate constantly evolving practices and 
technologies. The key elements of the process, which USGBC has refined over more 
than  a  decade  of  leadership  experience,  include  a  balanced  and  transparent  com-
mittee  structure;  Technical  Advisory  Groups  to  ensure  scientific  consistency  and 
rigor; opportunities for stakeholder comment and review; member ballot of new rat-
ing  systems  and  substantive  improvements  to  existing  rating  systems;  and  a  fair 
and open appeals process. Details about the LEED development process are publicly 
available on the USGBC website, www.usgbc.org. 

USGBC  is  continuing  to  advance  the  market  with  the  next  evolution  of  LEED, 
which will harmonize and align LEED rating systems and versions, as well as incor-
porate  recent  advances  in  science  and  technology.  Congruent  with  this  effort, 
USGBC is introducing a continuous improvement process into LEED, which will cre-
ate  a  more  flexible  and  adaptive  program  and  will  allow  USGBC  to  respond 
seamlessly  to  the  market’s  evolving  needs.  Particular  focus  areas  include  technical 
and  scientific  innovations  that  will  improve  building  performance;  the  applicability 
of LEED to the marketplace, in order to speed market transformation; and the cus-
tomer experience, to ensure that LEED is an effective tool for the people and organi-
zations using it. 

The  inclusion  of  Life  Cycle  Analysis  (LCA)  is  an  important  step  in  the  technical 
development  of  LEED.  USGBC’s  Life  Cycle  Assessment  working  group  has  devel-
oped  initial  recommendations  for  incorporating  Life  Cycle  Assessment  (LCA)  of 
building materials as part of the continuous improvement of LEED. 

LCA  holistically  evaluates  the  environmental  impact  of  a  product  throughout  its 
life  cycle:  from  the  extraction  or  harvesting  of  raw  materials  through  processing, 
manufacture,  installation,  use,  and  ultimate  disposal  or  recycling.  USGBC’s  long 
term  objective  is  to  make  LCA  a  credible  component  of  integrated  design,  thereby 
ensuring  that  the  environmental  performance  of  the  whole  building  takes  into  ac-
count the complete building life cycle. 

In 2006, citing the qualities outlined above, the U.S. General Services Administra-
tion submitted a report to Congress concluding that LEED is the ‘‘most credible’’ of 
five  different  rating  systems  evaluated.  The  GSA  currently  requires  its  new  build-
ings to achieve LEED certification. 

Building  projects  are  enrolled  in  the  LEED  program  by  registering  their  intent 
with  USGBC  through  LEED  Online.  After  the  building  is  constructed,  the  project 
teams  submit  proof-of-performance  in  the  form  of  online  documentation  through 
LEED  Online.  LEED  Online  was  developed  through  a  partnership  with  Adobe  Sys-
tems Inc. 

Expert  certification  teams  review  and  verify  project  documentation,  and  award 
LEED Certified, Silver, Gold, or Platinum certification based on the number of cred-
its the project achieves based on a sliding scale. 
LEED and the Government 

Governments  at  all  levels  have  been  highly  influential  in  the  growth  of  green 
building, both by requiring LEED for their own buildings and by creating incentives 
for  LEED  for  the  private  sector.  From  the  Department  of  Energy’s  support  for  the 
initial development of LEED, to the Federal Energy Policy Act of 2005, to the many 
cities  and  states  that  have  adopted  LEED,  the  public  sector  has  demonstrated  con-
siderable vision and leadership in the transformation of the built environment. Cur-
rently,  12  Federal  agencies,  22  states  and  85  local  governments  have  made  policy 
commitments to use or encourage LEED. 

The Federal Government has been a particularly strong supporter of USGBC and 
LEED.  The  U.S.  Department  of  Energy  enabled  the  development  of  LEED  with  a 
$500,000  grant  in  1997,  and  has  also  provided  USGBC  with  $130,000  in  grants  to 
support  the  Greenbuild  Conference  and  Expo.  Staff  from  the  national  laboratories, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

FEMP and other program areas have actively shared their expertise to develop and 
refine  LEED.  USGBC  has  also  collaborated  with  DOE’s  Office  of  Energy  Efficiency 
and  Renewable  Energy  with  Building  Green  on  the  High  Performance  Buildings 
Data base. 

The  U.S.  General  Services  Administration—which  is  the  Nation’s  largest  land-
lord—requires its new buildings and major renovation projects to achieve LEED cer-
tification. As mentioned previously, GSA also submitted a report to Congress affirm-
ing that LEED ‘‘continues to be the most appropriate and credible sustainable build-
ing  rating  system  available  for  evaluation  of  GSA  projects.’’  In  particular,  GSA 
noted  that  LEED  applies  to  all  GSA  project  types;  that  it  tracks  the  quantifiable 
aspects of building performance; that LEED is verified by trained professionals and 
has  a  well-defined  system  for  incorporating  updates;  and  that  it  is  the  most  widely 
used rating system in the U.S. market. 

Government  leadership  will  continue  to  be  essential  to  the  advancement  of  green 
building.  USGBC  supports  targeted,  viable  government  initiatives  that  facilitate 
market transformation, including: 

• The creation of an Office of High-Performance Green Buildings within the U.S. 
General Services Administration to coordinate green building research, informa-
tion  dissemination  and  other  activities,  as  provided  by  S.  506,  the  High-Per-
formance Green Buildings Act of 2007. 
• The  expansion  of  the  Office  Director’s  duties  that  would  facilitate:  metering, 
sub-metering  and  continuous  commissioning  of  Federal  buildings  in  order  to 
measure energy use and to ensure that building systems are delivering the effi-
ciencies  for  which  they  are  designed;  agency  reports  on  their  CO2 reductions 
using  the  existing  energy  targets  required  by  Federal  law;  establishment  of 
green  building  education  and  training  programs  for  Federal  agency  staff  in 
order to ensure that the capability exists to achieve agency sustainable building 
goals. 
Research 

In a March 2007 report, USGBC found that research related to high-performance 
green building practices and technologies amounts to only 0.2 percent of all federally 
funded research. At an average of $193 million per year from 2002 to 2005, research 
spending is equal to just 0.02 percent of the estimated value of annual U.S. building 
construction.  These  funding  levels  are  not  commensurate  with  the  level  of  impact 
that  the  built  environment  has  on  our  Nation’s  economy,  environment  and  quality 
of life. USGBC recommends that total annual Federal funding equate to 0.1 percent 
of annual construction value, $1 billion. 

Furthermore,  USGBC  has  identified  the  following  eight  research  program  areas 
toward  which  such  funding  should  be  applied:  Life  Cycle  Assessment  of  Construc-
tion  Materials;  Building  Envelope  and  HVAC  Strategies;  Lighting  Quality;  Trans-
portation-Related Impacts of Buildings; Performance Metrics and Evaluation; Infor-
mation  Technology  and  Design  Process  Innovation;  Indoor  Environmental  Quality; 
and Potable Water Use Reduction in Buildings. 
High Performance Schools 

In the U.S., more than 55 million students and more than 5 million faculty, staff, 
and  administrators  spend  their  days  in  school  buildings.  These  buildings  represent 
the largest construction sector in the U.S.—$80 billion in 2006–2008—which means 
that  greening  school  buildings  is  a  significant  opportunity  to  make  a  major  impact 
on human, environmental, and economic health. 

Most important, children in green schools are healthier and more productive. De-
sign  features  including  attention  to  acoustical  and  visual  quality,  daylighting,  and 
color have a profound impact on children’s ability to learn. Green schools also have 
superior indoor air quality and thermal comfort, and expose children to fewer chemi-
cals and environmental toxins—which has been linked to lower asthma rates, fewer 
allergies, and reduced sick days. 

Green schools cost less to operate and greatly reduce water and energy use, which 
generates  significant  financial  savings.  According  to  a  recent  study  by  Capital  E,  if 
all  new  school  construction  and  school  renovations  went  green  starting  today,  en-
ergy  savings  alone  would  total  $20  billion  over  the  next  10  years.  On  average,  a 
green  school  saves  $100,000  per  year—enough  to  hire  two  new  teachers,  buy  500 
new  computers,  or  purchase  5,000  new  textbooks.  The  minimal  increase  in  upfront 
costs—on average less than $3 per square foot-is paid back in the first year of oper-
ations based on energy savings alone. 

To  further  this  effort,  USGBC  supports  Federal  authorization  and  funding  of  K– 
12  green  school  demonstration  projects  in  targeted  school  districts  throughout  the 
country.  Such  a  directive  must  also  include  a  requirement  that  the  buildings  are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

constructed  so  that  they  can  serve  the  students  as  teaching  tools  on  green  building 
design, construction and operation. 
Conclusion 

The U.S. Green Building Council is a coalition of leaders from every sector of the 
building  industry  working  to  transform  the  way  buildings  and  communities  are  de-
signed,  built,  and  operated  through  market-based  tools.  USGBC’s  LEED (Leader-
ship in Energy and Environmental Design) Green Building Rating SystemTM has be-
come a nationally accepted benchmark for high-performance green buildings. 

In just 7 years, LEED has had a significant, positive impact on the building mar-
ketplace.  LEED  was  created  to  establish  a  common  standard  of  measurement  for 
what constitutes a ‘‘green’’ building, and provides independent third-party validation 
of  a  building’s  green  features.  LEED  provides  building  owners  and  operators  with 
the  tools  they  need  to  make  an  immediate  and  measurable  impact  on  their  build-
ings’ health and performance, which is why more than 1.1 billion square feet of con-
struction  space  is  being  built  to  LEED  standards.  The  impact  is  growing:  Every 
business day $100 million worth of construction registers with LEED; 50 people at-
tend  a  USGBC  training  course;  20  people  become  LEED  Accredited  Professionals 
and four organizations join USGBC as members. 

Green building is essential to environmental, economic, and human health. Annu-
ally, buildings account for 39 percent of U.S. primary energy use; 70 percent of U.S. 
energy consumption; use 12.2 percent of all potable water, or 15 trillion gallons per 
year;  and  consume  40  percent  of  raw  materials  globally  (3  billion  tons  annually). 
The EPA estimates that 136 million tons of building-related construction and demo-
lition debris is generated in the U.S. in a single year. 

Buildings  are  an  essential  part  of  the  solution  to  mitigating  climate  change  and 
establishing energy independence. The average LEED certified building uses 32 per-
cent  less  electricity,  26  percent  less  natural  gas,  and  36  percent  less  total  energy 
than a conventional building. LEED certified buildings in the U.S. are in aggregate 
reducing  CO2 emissions  by  150,000  metric  tons  each  year,  which  equates  to  30,000 
passenger  cars  not  driven.  Building  green  is  a  highly  effective  strategy  for  meeting 
the challenges ahead of us. The technology to make substantial reductions in energy 
use and CO2 emissions in buildings already exists, which means that modest invest-
ments  in  energy-saving  and  other  climate-friendly  technologies  can  yield  buildings 
and  communities  that  are  significantly  more  environmentally  responsible,  more 
profitable, and healthier places to live and work. 

Federal,  state,  and  local  governments  have  been  instrumental  in  the  growth  of 
green  building,  both  by  adopting  green  building  themselves  and  by  encouraging  it 
in the private sector. The government’s continued leadership will be essential to on-
going  advancements  in  this  area.  Significant  opportunities  exist  in  increasing  Fed-
eral  funding  for  green  building  research  and  in  Federal  support  for  the  design  and 
construction of green schools. 

Thank you again for the opportunity to present the views of the U.S. Green Build-
ing  Council.  We  look  forward  to  working  with  you  to  facilitate  the  transformation 
of the built environment to sustainability. 

Senator KERRY. Thank you, Mr. Hicks. 
Thank you, all of you. I think we’ve got a really interesting cross- 
section here, between those who are sort of pushing on an industry 
to  change  something,  those  who  represent  an  industry  that  is 
changing  something,  those  who  are  providing  some  of  the  public 
leadership,  as  well  as  some  who  are  designing  systems.  And  you 
can  see  the  cross-section  of  the  ways  in  which  a  whole  bunch  of 
people  get  pulled  into  a  terrific  economic  enterprise.  At  the  table, 
I think, there’s a living example of the upside of all this. 

Mr. Hicks, first of all, congratulations to LEED. The numbers of 
people  that  I  am  increasingly  meeting  around  the  country,  some-
body  will  brag  to  me,  ‘‘Wow,  you  know,  we’re  a  LEED  platinum 
building,’’. Right here in Washington we’ve got the Sidwell Friends 
School.  I’ve  met  several  members  of  the  Board  of  Trustees  who 
come  up  and  make  a  point  of  bragging  on  the  school  and  what 
they’ve  achieved  in  this  building.  And,  likewise,  I  was  visiting 
Biogen,  up  in  Cambridge,  Kendall  Square  has  a  superb  building. 
It’s  won  awards.  The  sun  comes  up,  and  the  blinds  open  up  more. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

It’s  computer-driven.  And  as  the  sun  moves,  then  the  blinds 
change.  The  creativity  is  enormous.  I  think  you  folks  have  had  a 
good chunk of helping people to be aware. 

Let  me  understand  what  you’re  doing  to  make  sure  that  every-
body  who  touches  a  building  is  beginning  to  become  aware  of  you. 
How  do  you  do  that?  What’s  your  outreach,  and  what  do  you  need 
to, sort of, raise the level of awareness even more? 

Mr.  HICKS.  Thank  you.  Well,  I  believe  what  we’re  seeing  is  just 
a  representation  of  what’s  going  on  in  society  today  and  across— 
not  only  in  this  country,  but  across  the  globe,  in—just  an  interest 
in  protecting  our  resources.  I  think  what  we’re  doing,  and  what 
LEED  encourages,  is  really  an  integrated  approach  to  the  design, 
the construction, and the operations of buildings. And so, that real-
ly, necessarily, includes people from around the building, those that 
are  not  just  designing  the  building,  the  architects  and  the  engi-
neers, but also those who are occupying the building, who are pay-
ing the bills. And in the current paradigm, that really doesn’t exist, 
where it’s really those—— 

Senator  KERRY.  So,  what  do  you  do  to  reach  them?  How  do  you 
proactively go out and make sure people are aware of these stand-
ards and of the possibilities? 

Mr.  HICKS.  Well,  I  think  it’s—there’s  a  tremendous  amount  of 
outreach  that  we  have  through  our  chapter  network.  There  are  70 
chapters that are members of the U.S. Green Building Council, and 
it’s—through  those  efforts,  there’s  a  lot  of  advocacy  that’s  been 
done on the local level to try—— 

Senator KERRY. What’s your budget, annually? 
Mr.  HICKS.  Annually,  this  coming  year  we’re  going  to  be  about 

$40 million. 

Senator KERRY. Where does that money come from? 
Mr.  HICKS.  We  have  money  that  comes  from  our  9,500  member 
organizations that are part of the USGBC, through our educational 
programs,  through  our  professional  accreditation,  and  through  our 
certification of LEED. 

In  terms  of  support,  where  we  could  use  the  most  help,  I  think, 
from  the  Federal  Government,  is  really  in  research.  If  you  look  at 
the  federally  funded  research,  about  $1  to  $2  of  every  $10,000  is 
used  in  green  buildings,  or  in  building  research,  and  we’d  like  to 
see  that  be  closer  to  $1  in  $1,000  or  $1  billion  per  year  because  of 
the impacts that buildings have on our society. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  it’s  a  good  idea.  What  are  you  able  to  say 
to people is the average cost to a current homeowner of purchasing 
a  LEED-certified  building?  What’s  the  projected  payback  for  that 
person? 

Mr.  HICKS.  It’s  going  to  follow  very  similar  to  what  we’re  seeing 
on  the  commercial  side,  as  well,  which  is  typically  within  a  year. 
In  fact,  on  the  commercial-building  side,  we’re  seeing  it  within  10 
months,  that  that  cost  premium  is  being  paid  for,  and  that’s  just 
with  the  energy  savings  alone,  that  doesn’t  account  for  the  water 
savings and the waste cost savings that might accompany that. 

Senator KERRY. So, obviously it depends on the size of the home 

and the amount—— 

Mr. HICKS. Absolutely. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Senator  KERRY.—but  that’s  a  pretty  good  payback  time,  10 

months. 

51 

Mr.  HICKS.  Absolutely.  And  I  think  what  we’re  seeing  today  is 
that  green  buildings  and  green  homes  are  being  built  for  not  a 
penny  more.  I  think  the  market’s  maturing,  and  has  learned  how 
to deliver green buildings. 

Senator  KERRY.  What  are  the  biggest  barriers  that  you  find  are 
keeping  prospective  builders  and  developers  from  planning  a  more 
energy efficient building? As you go out there, what frustrates you? 
Mr.  HICKS.  I  think  it’s—what’s  most  frustrating  is  actually  per-
ceptions.  I  think  it’s  that  people  get  to  understand  the  true  costs 
and the real benefits that come—the immediate and measurable re-
sults  that  come  from  green  buildings—I  think,  just  kind  of  getting 
past that barrier of perceptions. People, necessarily, think that be-
cause  it  has  all  these  wonderful  qualities  and  delivers  all  these 
wonderful results, ‘‘Oh, it must cost more.’’ But that, in fact, is not 
the  case.  And  studies—recent  studies  are  showing  that,  again, 
buildings  are  being  built  to  green,  to  LEED  standards,  for  not  a 
penny more. 

Senator  KERRY.  Are  you  finding  that  the  various  associations, 
building trades, architects, et cetera, are proactively now beginning 
to  say,  ‘‘Tell  us  more  about  this,’’  or,  ‘‘How  do  we  join  in  this  ef-
fort?’’ 

Mr. HICKS. Without a doubt. The Alliance to Save Energy is one. 
And  BOMA,  IFMA,  ASHRAE,  AIA  have  all  been  part  of—we’ve 
been actively engaged with all of those folks to promulgate sustain-
ability into their membership and into their agendas, as well. 

Senator  KERRY.  And  are  you  satisfied  with  the  pace,  at  this 

Mr.  HICKS.  The  pace  is—been  incredible.  And—but,  at  the  same 
time,  we  can,  and  have  to,  do  more.  And  I  think,  you  know,  my— 
what  I  do  every  day  is  look  at  how  we  can  increase  the  capacity 
and  scale  to  meet—not  only  meet  the  demand  that  we  see  today, 
but  meet  the  demand  that  we’re  going  to  see  6  months  from  now 
and a year from now, because it’s growing by the day. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  it’s  an  exciting  prospect,  and  we  wish  you 

well with it, obviously. 

Mr.  Birnbaum,  what,  for  a  consumer  who  hears  you  talk  about 
a  ‘‘smart  grid,’’  it  sounds,  kind  of,  ‘‘Whoa,  that’s  out  of  my  league. 
How  do  I  tap  into  that?  What  do  I  do?’’  How  do  you,  begin  to  put 
that down into the grassroots, if you will, so that people can under-
stand what their role is and what’s available to them? 

Mr. BIRNBAUM. A good question, Senator. 
The Smart Grid itself is something that the utility company obvi-
ously  has  to  deploy  before  you  and  I,  as  consumers,  can  take  ad-
vantage  of  it.  When  we  talk  to  consumer  advocacy  groups,  for  in-
stance, what we talk about are the savings that consumers can ex-
perience. The money, whether it’s a business, can save, that we can 
save by signing up to demand response programs—— 

Senator  KERRY.  But  do  you  need  to  get  a  whole  bunch  of  homes 
in one community all to take part? Or could one home sign up and 
benefit? 

Mr.  BIRNBAUM.  You’d  want  to—obviously,  the  larger  the  scale, 

the better. The way we approach—— 

point? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Senator  KERRY.  Is  your  business  plan  one  that  is  built  on  that 

scale? I would assume—— 

52 

Mr.  BIRNBAUM.  Yes.  In  fact,  our  business  model  is  based  upon 
doing  business,  first  and  foremost,  with  the  electric  utility  itself. 
So, when the utility decides to develop—deploy a Smart Grid across 
its  entire  footprint,  everyone  benefits,  whether—whether  they 
choose to or not, they will benefit. 

Senator  KERRY.  How  do  you  cost  something  like  that  out?  Is  it 

per home? Per kilowatt hour? How do you do it? 

Mr. BIRNBAUM. It’s usually per home, per meter, per square mile. 
It  varies,  depending  on  whether  it’s  rural,  suburban,  urban,  the 
utilities’  cost  structure.  What  we  tend  to  do  is,  we  have  sophisti-
cated  business  models,  and  we  work  with  the  utility  company  to 
plug  in  their  costs  and  the  potential  savings,  to  show  them  how 
they can benefit. 

Senator  KERRY.  What  kind  of  technology  does  a  home  consumer 

have to invest in to make this happen? 

Mr.  BIRNBAUM.  Very  little.  The  technologies  that,  I  think,  Dr. 
Krebs  was  talking  about,  essentially  demand  response  or  digital 
load  control  switches,  a  device  that  you  put  on  your  water  heater 
or your air-conditioner, and you can basically have that attached— 
the utility company could come attach that—and you don’t need to 
do  anything  else.  You  would  sign  up  for  a  program,  give  them  the 
ability to reduce load at certain times during the day. 

Senator  KERRY.  Do  you  have  estimates  for  the  amount  of  reduc-
tion in electricity produced in Texas or elsewhere where you’ve de-
ployed? 

Mr.  BIRNBAUM.  As  far  as  what  we  expect  or  what  we  have—— 
Senator KERRY. What you have achieved. 
Mr.  BIRNBAUM.  It’s  still—the  deployment  is  in  its  infancy.  We 
started  deploying  the  technology  last  fall,  so,  at  this  point,  no,  but 
we’re—we  have  real,  live  examples  of  outages  that  have  been 
avoided,  efficiencies  that  have  been  created  by  detecting  things 
going  on  in  the  network,  that  clearly  go  on  in  every  utility  every 
day,  but  the  utility  company  has  no  way  of  knowing  about  it  until 
eventually  it  resulted  in  an  outage,  where  somebody  called  and 
said, ‘‘I’ve lost power.’’ 

Senator  KERRY. 

for 
incentivizing  the  Smart  Grid,  is  there  one  that’s  the  most  impor-
tant? Where would you say, and what would have the most impact 
on the Smart Grid? 

the  six  policy  recommendations 

Mr. BIRNBAUM. Well, probably in the area of decoupling and cost 

In 

recovery, in general. Utility companies—— 

Senator KERRY. You mean the billing structure. 
Mr. BIRNBAUM. Yes. Yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  You  need  to  have  the  company  be  able  to  say, 

get rid of this incentive to actually use more electricity. 

Mr.  BIRNBAUM.  Correct.  What—utility  companies  look  at  a  cap-
ital expenditure and say, ‘‘Well, if I do that, I want to be absolutely 
certain the utility commission in my state is going to approve that, 
so I can get a rate of return. Otherwise, we spend money’’—— 

Senator KERRY. Sure. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

Mr. BIRNBAUM. —‘‘and create efficiencies, and don’t get a return.’’ 
So, that sort of regulatory certainty is probably the most important 
thing that—— 

Senator  KERRY.  Is  there  something  we  could  do  to  more  rapidly 

encourage the embrace of this? 

Mr.  BIRNBAUM.  Absolutely.  Just  2  years  ago,  Congress  adopted, 
under PURPA, amendments that drove the states toward advanced 
metering  technologies.  A  number  of  states  have  had  advanced  me-
tering  system  proceedings.  The  same  thing  can  be  true  of  Smart 
Grid. I think encouragement and requirements that States either— 
encouraging  States  to  have  their  utilities  adopt,  or  prohibiting 
States from taking policies that would impede utilities from adopt-
ing  Smart  Grid,  probably  are  the  most  helpful  things  we  can  get 
at the Federal level. 

Senator  KERRY.  Mr.  Johnson,  all  of  us  have  wrestled  with  con-
sumer home electronics, et cetera. Some of us still have VCRs that 
flash, and we don’t know how to stop them. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator KERRY. I gather that, notwithstanding the increases that 
you’ve talked about, and the benefit of some of the cable boxes and 
so forth that are more effective now, apparently electricity usage by 
consumer  electronics,  when  it’s  either  idle  or  off,  still  cost  an  esti-
mated  $3.2  billion  a  year  to  the  American  consumer.  So,  what  do 
we  do  to  further  decrease  this?  I  mean,  that  seems  like  a  pretty 
big grab that a lot of families would love to have back. 

Mr. JOHNSON. Sure. Thank you, Senator. 
I’d  like  to,  of  course,  know  more  about  what’s  behind  that  num-
ber.  It’s  a  number  that  I’ve  not  heard  before.  But  what  I  can  say 
about  standby  power  in  the  consumer  electronics  industry  is—it  is 
a  good  news  story,  really—that  ENERGY  STAR has  focused  on 
this for many years, starting in 1992, and now, today, addresses all 
major  product  categories  in  our  industry  with  a  program  that, 
again,  attempts  to  drive  down  standby  power  consumption  in  var-
ious product categories over time. And it’s done a terrific job. 

There’s  one  category—you  did  mention  cable  set-top  boxes—EN-
ERGY  STAR recently  launched  a  new  specification  development 
program for set-top boxes, specifically. So, we believe this is an im-
portant category for ENERGY STAR to focus on. 

But,  really,  standby  power  is  a  good  news  story.  Our—the  re-
search  that  I  mentioned  in  our  testimony  has  shown  that,  over 
time,  standby  power  consumption  has  gone  down  for  almost  all 
major categories of electronics. And, again, the remaining ones, set- 
top boxes, is now the focus of ENERGY STAR. 

Consumer electronics use approximately 11 percent of household 
energy,  or  household  electricity;  2.6  percent  is  attributable  to 
standby  power.  So,  three-quarters  of  the  time,  roughly,  we’re  talk-
ing  about  active-mode  power  consumption;  oh,  and  one-quarter  of 
the time, standby mode. So, it’s about that proportion for consumer 
electronics. 

Senator KERRY. We’d be happy to give you the documentation on 
the  figures.  They  come  from  a  number  of  different  observations 
made  by  groups  that  are  concerned  about  this.  But  is  there  a  spe-
cific  technology  or  some  specific  areas  that  we  could  encourage 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

greater  R&D  in,  or  deployment  in,  that  would  more  rapidly  have 
an impact on this? 

Mr. JOHNSON. Well, again, this is—— 
Senator  KERRY.  I  mean,  an  awful  lot  of  Americans  don’t  have  a 
clue  that  some  appliance  they’ve  bought  is  plugged  in,  but  not  on, 
but still drawing power. 

Mr. JOHNSON. Sure. Some—— 
Senator  KERRY.  A  lot  of  people  are  paying  for  something  they’re 
not  using,  and  there  must  be  some  more  effective  technology,  at 
this  point  to  combat  this.  Barring  harm  that  can  be  done  to  some 
particular  kinds  of  appliances  because  they  needs  to  remain  in  a 
warm-bulb status or something. I notice most printers, for instance, 
take time to warm up. You turn them on cold. But you leave them 
on, and they’re drawing unnecessary power sometimes for weeks on 
end. 

Mr.  JOHNSON.  Let  me  highlight  a  couple  of  things  regarding 

standby power. 

First of all, as I mentioned, it’s been reduced in many categories. 

What remains does serve a purpose. And some products—— 
Senator KERRY. So, you’re saying we can’t go any further? 
Mr.  JOHNSON.  I’m  saying—you  can  always  go  further,  but  it’s  a 
question of tradeoffs and how quickly. Standby power serves to en-
able  remote  controls,  it  serves  to  enable  program  guides  in  some 
products, it enables a quick startup of your television, for example. 
So,  there  are  important  consumer  benefits  or  features  that  con-
sumers want in products, that do require a little bit of standby. So, 
again, the effort is to drive it as low as possible, but maintain those 
features  that  consumers  want.  And  many  printers  I’m  aware  of, 
many—much—many  products  in  the  office  equipment  category  are 
ENERGY  STAR compliant,  and  do,  when  they’re  not  being  used, 
go back to a very low standby power mode. 

Senator KERRY. One of the things that you talk about is the lack 
of  information  on  energy  savings  opportunities,  sort  of  the  back 
door  to  what  I’ve  just  been  talking  about  here.  And  you  highlight, 
obviously,  the  upside,  the  ENERGY  STAR program.  And  I  think 
it’s  a  good  program,  a  very,  very  important  program,  personally. 
It’s done a lot of good. But I think it could do a lot more good. And 
the  question  that  ought  to  be  asked  is,  why  are  we  seeing  data 
showing that only 57 percent of the American public recognizes the 
ENERGY  STAR logo  as  a  program  that’s  aimed  at  energy  effi-
ciency?  We’ve  got  a  real  barrier  in  consumer-awareness  limits  in 
this  area.  And  my  question  is,  what  recommendations  would  you 
make  to  us  that  are  within  our  grasp,  or  to  the  American  con-
sumer, for decreasing their energy inefficiency, and increasing their 
efficiency? 

Mr. JOHNSON. I’m glad you mentioned that. Consumer education 
and  the  recognition  of  an  energy—ENERGY  STAR is  really  im-
portant.  And,  on  one  hand,  it  requires  funding  and  focus;  on  the 
other  hand,  I  think  it  requires  partnership.  CEA  has  been  focused 
on  consumer  education  by  providing,  at  the  beginning  of  last  sum-
mer,  energy-saving  tips  for  electronics.  We  noticed  that  a  number 
of utilities in State energy offices just did not have enough energy- 
saving  tips  related  to  electronics  and  ENERGY  STAR.  So,  we’ve 
tried to support and complement that with our own tips. We’ve de-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

veloped  a  website  that  gets  the  message  out  about  ENERGY 
STAR,  where  to  find  products  that  are  ENERGY  STAR compli-
ant,  and  also  what  to  do  with  those  products  to  help  save  energy. 
There are, I think, ways to bolster the ENERGY STAR label, and 
recognition  of  it.  You  mentioned  it’s  about  57  percent.  I  think  our 
research  showed  it’s  around  60,  but  it’s  somewhere  in  there.  But, 
I think, through EPA’s efforts and the private sector’s, we can drive 
that up further for electronics by leveraging what we’ve done online 
and what many retailers are doing in the store. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  we  certainly  want  to  work  on  it,  and  we’d 
love  your  cooperation  and  ideas,  and  we  might  try  to  figure  out 
how  we  might  augment  this  in  a  very  significant  way.  When  we 
talk  about  grabbing  back  energy,  there’s  a  big  educational  chal-
lenge  for  all  of  us.  I  think  we  ought  to  design,  and  think  about 
what we can do here, to stimulate that in ways that we have done 
it  in  the  drug  field,  we’ve  done  it  in  the  health  field  in  certain 
things, like smoking. There are different areas where we’ve proven 
pretty  effective  at  it,  and  had  a  major  impact  on  behavior.  I  think 
that  this  needs  to  be  plus-upped  significantly,  and  we  ought  to 
work together to think about how we’re going to do that. 

I  see  Ms.  Callahan  is  nodding  in  assent,  and  we’ll  work  with  all 

of you to try to do that. 

Dr.  Krebs,  you  know,  we’re  all  watching  California,  obviously, 
with  great  interest,  and  we  congratulate  you  and  others  on  the 
very exciting and interesting choices that you all have been making 
out there. Can you share with me, expand if you will, on the decou-
pling  of  the  financial  returns  of  a  public  utility  and  its  sales,  of 
that  mechanism.  That’s  been  key,  I  gather,  to  your  ability  to  be 
able to get the Commission to move forward. It’s always struck me 
as  bizarre  that  we  have  this  reverse  social  policy  in  place,  where, 
all  over  the  country,  a  lot  of  places  reward  consumers  for  being 
wasteful. 

Dr.  KREBS.  This  is  not  my  area  of  expertise.  I  have  come  to  rec-
ognize  the  importance  of  it  as  I  have  been  working  in  California. 
There is a—there is a report that, I believe, was released sometime 
last year, the National Action Plan for Energy Efficiency, which did 
a detailed study of decoupling under different circumstances for dif-
ferent  kinds  of  utilities,  where  the  states’  different  economies  are 
taken into account. California had the particular benefit that, when 
it made this choice, it was a state with a growing economy, and so 
that—the  impacts,  the  costs  of  the  change,  were  minimized,  and 
the  social  benefits  that  are  available  wherever  you  do  it—in  every 
kind  of  a  utility  in  every  kind  of  a  State  economy,  there  are  social 
benefits to the states, overall—but there are sometimes costs. And, 
in  particular,  in  California  we  had  the  fortunate  situation  where 
we had a growing economy, no history to move around, and so, we 
reaped  general  benefits,  not  just  the  social  benefits.  But  it  was 
hugely important, because the utilities, prior to this decision on the 
part of the Public Utility Commission, and, subsequently, the legis-
lature,  were—basically,  conservation  meant  you  sold  less  elec-
tricity,  you  sold  less  natural  gas,  and,  as  a  consequence,  your  re-
turn  on  investment  was  based  on  what  you  sold.  When  you  basi-
cally  said,  ‘‘You  will  get  so  much  for  providing  connection  to  elec-
tricity,  and  then  so  much  for—you  know,  a  certain  percentage  for 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

what  you—for  the  volume  you  sold,  but  not  all  of  your  rate  of  re-
turn,’’  it  basically  allowed  them  to  use  some  of  their  funds  for  en-
couraging efficiency. And I think that, as the Senate and the House 
look at a national approach to decoupling, you need to take into ac-
count  these  regional  issues.  But  I  think  that  plan,  in  particular, 
demonstrated  the  different  circumstances  that  different  kinds  of 
utilities might face, but the overall social benefit. 

Senator  KERRY.  In  your  written  testimony,  you  observed  that 
the,  I  think  the  California  research  budget’s  about  28  million 
bucks. Is that right? 

Dr. KREBS. Eighty million. 
Senator KERRY. Eighty million. 
Dr. KREBS. Yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  That’s  a  fund  you  have  that  supports  research, 

development, and demonstration. 

Dr. KREBS. That’s correct. And it—— 
Senator  KERRY.  But  35  percent  of  that  is  allocated  to  efficiency 

and demand research, response research. 

Dr. KREBS. Yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  A  smaller  amount  goes  specifically  to  the  effi-

ciency/demand side, is what I’m saying—— 

Dr. KREBS. That’s—— 
Senator KERRY.—the whole fund. 
Dr. KREBS. That’s correct. 
Senator KERRY. OK. The Federal research budget, that’s about 5 
percent  of  the  Federal  research  budget—which  is  $520  million,  is 
given to this whole idea of projected increase in electricity demand 
predicted  over  the  next  20–30  years.  Do  you  think  we  need  to  do 
more? 

Dr. KREBS. Yes. 
Senator KERRY. How much more? 
Dr. KREBS. Well, there have—we work—— 
Senator  KERRY.  What  would  be  an  appropriate  funding  level  for 

national energy efficiency research, in your judgment? 

Dr. KREBS. I would say at least double that. We’ve been working 
with  colleagues  at  the  Lawrence  Berkeley  National  Laboratory, 
which  is  funded  by  DOE,  and  they’re  looking  at  incentives  for  the 
commercial  building  sector  that  probably  are  in  excess  of  a  billion 
dollars. 

Senator  KERRY.  Mr.  Zimmerman,  thank  you  for  being  here,  and 
congratulations  to  Wal-Mart  for  being  smart.  We  all  know  they’re 
smart  in  retail,  but  I  guess  this  is  sort  of  a  sideline  of  retail,  in 
the sense that it augments the bottom line; but it’s not exactly sell-
ing  a  product,  it’s  being  efficient  in  the  management  of  your  oper-
ation. And you saw, long ago, how critical that would be. 

Can  you  talk  about  the  new  prototype  stores  that  are  going  to 
be more efficient than those that have been opened before? Can you 
just  say,  quickly,  what  technologies  and  innovations  are  currently 
available that other people ought to look? 

Mr. ZIMMERMAN. LED lighting is probably the single biggest. We 
made our first application last year with LED lighting, and we are 
aggressively pursuing—it’s in every new store that we build today, 
and  actually  will  be  retrofitted  into  500  existing  stores  this  year, 
and  then  next  year.  But  it’s  just  one  application.  We’re  working 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

prices. 

with  GE  and  Philips  and  other  entities,  looking  at  how  the  entire 
sales floor can be lit with LED. 

Senator KERRY. And what kind of capital cost does it take to cre-
ate  this  progressive  lighting,  I  cite  that  all  the  time  when  I  talk 
to people about this, in terms of hotels, where you come—— 

Mr. ZIMMERMAN. Right. 
Senator  KERRY.—out  of  your  room,  and  in  the  hall—it’s  dark, 
and,  the  minute  you  move,  it  lights  up;  and,  progressively,  as  you 
move  down  the  hall,  it  gets  darker  behind  you  and  lighter  where 
you’re going. 

Mr.  ZIMMERMAN.  Right.  In  our  specific  application,  it’s  about 
$50,000  per  store.  So,  the  500  stores  are—is  a  $25  million  capital 
outlay.  But  it’s  immediate  positive  cash-flow,  and  it’s  2-year  pay-
backs on today’s—— 

Senator KERRY. Two-year payback. 
Mr. ZIMMERMAN.—LED prices. Two-year payback on today’s LED 

Senator KERRY. Which will obviously go down. 
Mr.  ZIMMERMAN.  This  time  next  year,  it’ll  be  12  months  or  less. 
Senator  KERRY.  Well,  I  hope  every  establishment  does  this.  This 
is  the  kind  of  information,  Mr.  Hicks,  we’ve  got  to  get  out  there. 
People have got to be aware of this. No new building should be de-
signed  anywhere  in  America  that  doesn’t  take  advantage  of  these 
kinds of things. 

Mr.  ZIMMERMAN.  Right.  Two  weeks  ago,  at  GE’s  Ecoimagination 
celebration  in  L.A.,  Jeff  Immelt  said  there  are  16  other  companies 
lined up to purchase this actual application that we developed with 
GE,  but,  until  they  get  their  new  assembly  line  on  in  July,  they 
can’t  deliver  the  product.  But  it—the  news  is  picking  up  speed.  I 
mean, 2-year paybacks, that’s a hard investment to beat. 

Senator  KERRY.  So,  what,  in  your  opinion,  has  limited  the  adop-

tion of this technology by competitors and other large retailers? 

Mr.  ZIMMERMAN.  Absolutely,  first  cost.  I  mean,  even  with  the 
great payback, everything we’re doing has an initial first cost. And 
it’s  because  we’re  starting  at  a  much  more  aggressive  base  than 
maybe  some  of  Mr.  Hicks’  other  entities  he  works  with.  But  we 
have a first cost on all of these things. But, again, everything we’re 
doing  today,  from  a  retrofit  standpoint,  has  a  2-year  or  less  pay-
back, so it’s an easy decision. 

Senator KERRY. What, when you say ‘‘easy decision,’’ do we need 
to take—you’ve done it without an incentive, and you’ve done it on 
your  own.  I’m  trying  to  think  about  some  kind  of  government  in-
centive.  On  the  other  hand,  the  faster  a  lot  of  people  start  to  em-
brace,  the  better  off  we’re  all  going  to  be.  What  would  you  rec-
ommend to us, in terms of getting it out there more broadly? 

Mr. ZIMMERMAN. You know, incentives would motivate some, but 
I  think  just  the  example  of  others—and,  you  know,  you—a  Wal- 
Mart as an example; a U.S. Capitol, as an example—you know, it’s 
one of my bad habits, but I counted the incandescent lamps in this 
building—or  in  this  room  alone,  and  there  are  100  of  them,  and 
they’re  new  incandescent  lamps.  They  could  have  been  compact 
fluorescents  behind  these  frosted  glasses.  And  this  time  of  year, 
with  the  tens  of  millions  of  high  school  students  and  college  stu-
dents visiting our Nation’s Capitol and seeing the most energy inef-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

ficient  buildings  they  can  find  in  the  country,  this  ought  to  be  an-
other  place  to  be  an  example,  other  than  just  the  Wal-Mart  stores 
of the world. 

Senator KERRY. It is, and it will be, and Nancy Pelosi and Harry 

Reid beat you to the punch by about 2 hours. 

[Laughter.] 
Mr.  ZIMMERMAN.  Right.  We  met  with  Dan  Beard  yesterday,  and 

we’re going to help him with what we know—— 

Senator  KERRY.  They  did  big  things  out  there.  We’ve  been  push-
ing  this  for  some  time.  In  my  office,  I’ve  got  a  whole  bunch  of  the 
new  lighting.  It  tends  to  be  brighter  but,  nevertheless,  makes  sav-
ings.  The  bottom  line  is,  you’re  absolutely  correct,  and  the  entire 
footprint  of  this  building  has  to  change,  and  it’s  going  to  be,  very 
rapidly, now, as we get this energy bill out of here, as will a whole 
bunch  of  fleet  purchasing  and  other  kinds  of  procurement  policies 
and practices within the entire Federal Government building estab-
lishment.  So,  I  think,  you  know,  people  have  finally  caught  on  to 
that. 

Mr. ZIMMERMAN. Right. 
Senator KERRY. There’s a big sea change in the offing here. 
I’ve  got  to  run,  in  a  moment  here,  and  I  apologize  for  that,  but 
Ms.  Callahan,  where  do  you  think,  beyond  the  comments  that  Mr. 
Zimmerman,  on  the  building  side,  where  in  your  judgment,  should 
we be putting our emphasis to augment what you and others have 
been so engaged in at the grassroots level? 

Ms.  CALLAHAN.  Well,  a  couple  of  things,  if  I  can  do  cleanup,  as 
the  last  one,  and  make  comments  on  some  of  the  things  made.  I 
said, in my written testimony, we think a commercial buildings ini-
tiative, funded by the Federal Government, in partnership with all 
the folks we’re working with, the American Institutes of Architects, 
the labs, the U.S. Green Buildings Council, is something that needs 
to be done. And the order of magnitude that Dr. Krebs mentioned, 
it’s  large.  We  think  about  a  $2  billion  program,  but  if  you  look  at 
it over an annual basis, you’re looking at an investment of no more 
than  12  hours  of  our  building  stock  energy  cost.  It’s  one-tenth  of 
1  percent  of  what  we  spend  in  this  country  each  year  on  energy 
costs in buildings. So, I think that’s a very important place. 

You  mentioned  public  education.  The  Alliance  does  a  lot  of  work 
with  the  Departments  of  Energy,  EPA,  and  in  concert  with  groups 
and  businesses  from  around  the  country,  folks  like  Wal-Mart,  and 
we haven’t been able to capture the kind of money that’s necessary 
to  do  the  commercialization  transformation  that  we’re  discussing 
here.  For  example,  last  year  we  cobbled  together  a  million  dollars, 
and  the  studies  that  we  did  on  that—to  give  consumers  savings 
tips around the home, whether it’s consumer products or in the car 
or  on  the  roads.  But  that  million  dollars  got  us  $140  million—or 
140  million—140  million  impressions,  excuse  me.  So,  if  you  think 
about what we could do if the Federal Government actually put ap-
propriations to the authorizations that you all had in EPAct 2005— 
you  authorized  a  $400  million  consumer  education  and  outreach 
program on efficiency—if you just put some of that money to it, we 
can  go  far.  And  I’ll  give  you  an  example.  In  New  York,  you  cited 
the  ENERGY  STAR label  about  67  percent,  I  think  you  said— 
or—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

Senator KERRY. Fifty-seven. 
Ms. CALLAHAN. What? Fifty-seven? Fifty-seven percent. If you go 
to New York, where we’ve worked with the State and done very ag-
gressive consumer education and outreach, that number is 80+ per-
cent  recognition,  and  people  are—that  are  surveyed—are  saying 
they’re  using  the  ENERGY  STAR—not  just  understanding  what 
it  is,  but  using  it  as  a  purchasing  tool.  So,  it’s  there.  That  can  be 
done. 

Appliance standards, I mentioned we’re trying to negotiate some-
thing right now with the lighting manufacturers. A single standard 
to get the cheap, inefficient, incandescent bulbs off the market, the 
25-cent  bulbs  off  the  market  in  the  next  decade,  that  could  rep-
resent  the  energy  savings  of  all  the  appliance  standards  we’ve  put 
in  place  between  1987  and  2000.  So,  those  are  just  a  few  of  the 
things. And I think—— 

Senator KERRY. Those are great. 
Ms. CALLAHAN.—that’s the areas—you know, it’s—it is, it’s R&D, 
public  education,  incentives,  and  then  the  standards.  That’s  the 
four areas. 

Senator KERRY. Well, those are great, and they’re important. I’m 
going  to  make  sure  that  each  of  my  colleagues  gets  a  summary 
memo  of  today’s  hearing,  because  I  think  it’s  really  important  for 
them to be aware of the breadth and scope of possibilities here. 

I think if everybody in America could hear this kind of thing, and 
be  more  aware  of  it,  we  would  make  huge  leaps.  The  key  here  is, 
really, how do you, in this multimedia unbelievable sort of cacoph-
ony  of  entertainment  news  that  we  all  live  with,  get  people  to  pay 
attention  long  enough  to  realize  they  can  save  some  money  and 
make some money? So, hopefully, we can get there. 

I think one of the things, frankly, that ought to be part of it, the 
President’s request for 2008 has $1.236 billion in support of the De-
partment  of  Energy’s  Efficiency  and  Renewable  Energy  Programs. 
That’s  a  16.5  percent  decrease,  folks,  from  last  year’s  appropria-
tions.  It’s  1  percent  less  than  2005.  So,  it’s  downward,  downward, 
downward. The total budget for the Department of Energy is $24.3 
billion. I just don’t believe, and I think every one of you agree with 
me,  that  a  $1.2  billion  investment  in  energy  efficiency  is  adequate 
for  this  country,  given  where  we  are,  what  we’re  losing  in  energy 
inefficiency. We’re paying much more than that in inefficiency. We 
could turn that around in a year or two, with major efforts. 

When  you  look  at  the  rise  in  electricity  purchases  that  are  pre-
dicted, and you couple that to the pulverized-coal-fired problem, in 
terms of the current trend line of what provides that rise, we’ve got 
a serious issue. So, this is a big, big deal, and I can assure you I’m 
going  to  spend  a  lot  of  time,  have  been  already,  and  will  continue 
to  just  keep  this  right  in  the  face  of  our  colleagues  in  each  of  the 
committees that I’m on. 

We  had  a  little  setback  today  on  the  tax  portion  of  the  energy 
bill.  But,  ultimately,  we’ll  get  something  through  that’s  going  to 
make sense. There were a lot of good incentives in there, and we’re 
going  to  try,  in  the  next  days,  to  tie  down  some  important  things. 
We  also  have  the  DOD  authorization  coming  up.  There  are  some 
important defense initiatives we can take on savings, and so forth. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

There’s almost no bill now that comes in front of us where we don’t 
have an opportunity to try to make a difference. 

So,  keep  doing  what  you’re  doing,  and  keep  us  informed  of  what 
you  think  we  can  do  to  be  more  effective  in  helping  you,  as  well 
as showing initiative on our own. 

I’m  greatly  appreciative  to  you  for  taking  time  to  be  here  today. 

Thank you very, very much. 

With that, we stand adjourned. Thank you. 
[Whereupon, at 3:49 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

SMARTCOOL SYSTEMS, INC. 

Vancouver, BC, Canada, June 29, 2007 

Hon. JOHN F. KERRY, 
Chairman, 
Hon. JOHN ENSIGN, 
Ranking Member, 
Subcommittee on Science, Technology, and Innovation, 
Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
U.S. Senate 
Washington, DC. 
RE:  HEARING ON ENERGY EFFICIENT TECHNOLOGIES AND PROGRAMS—WRITTEN 

STATEMENT 

Dear Chairman Kerry: 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  present  our  written  statement  on  the  topic  of 
‘‘Energy  Efficient  Technologies  and  Programs’’  following  last  week’s  hearing  to  you, 
Ranking  Member  Ensign,  and  the  distinguished  Members  of  the  Committee.  Our 
company,  Smartcool  Systems  Inc.,  an  advanced  global  energy  solutions  company, 
specializes in energy and cost reduction technologies specific to air conditioning and 
refrigeration compressors for commercial and retail businesses. 

Therefore,  it  is  with  enthusiasm  that  we  share  our  experiences  with  the  Com-
mittee by submitting for the record the attached paper titled ‘‘Electrical Energy Re-
duction  in  Refrigeration  and  Air  Conditioning.’’  We  will  be  presenting  at  the  2007 
Energex  Conference  in  Singapore  on  November  27  to  30,  2007  to  an  international 
audience of energy and environmental sector leaders and stakeholders. It is our aim 
to provide the Committee with further insight on the technological advances taking 
place specific to meeting the challenges of reducing electricity use among air condi-
tioning and refrigeration systems. 

Important factors to take away from the presentation include: 
• According  to  the  U.S.  Department  of  Energy,  the  second  largest  use  for  elec-
tricity is cooling (air conditioning and refrigeration) at 15 percent. The challenge 
with  air  conditioning  and  refrigeration  has  been  to  develop  energy  reduction 
systems that are cost effective and less complex to install. 
• In air conditioning and refrigeration systems, the compressor is the largest con-
sumer  of  electricity,  consuming  about  70  percent  in  most  cases.  Reducing  the 
amount of time the compressor runs will substantially reduce the amount of en-
ergy used. 
• Smartcool  Systems  Inc.’s  technology,  the  Energy  Savings  Module  (ESM)TM,  re-
duces  electricity  consumption  (kwh)  and  maximum  demand  (Kw/KVA)  of  com-
pressors  by  improving  their  performance  and  maintaining  temperature  control. 
The ESMTM is not a controller. Instead, it is a supplement, or an interface, de-
signed to work with existing equipment. 
• Through  ‘‘Compressor  Optimization’’  the  ESMTM reduces  compressor  running 
time  by  up  to  30  percent  with  no  affect  on  temperature  conditions.  Other  tech-
nologies  will  impact  the  temperature.  The  ESMTM’s  copyrighted  software  also 
manages the suction pressure of the refrigeration or air conditioning system, al-
lowing it to cool more efficiently. 
• The U.S. Department of Energy’s Oakridge National Labs conducted tests of the 
ESMTM in  2004.  The  results  indicated  a  reduction  of  compressor  kWh  usage  of 
11.8  percent  for  the  total  test  period,  and  18.1  percent  for  the  high  load  test 
period. 
• The  ESMTM is  utilized  globally  by  leading  corporations  in  commercial,  retail, 
and  food  service  industries.  For  one  corporation,  the  ESMTM demonstrated  an 

(61) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

overall  reduction  in  electricity  use  of  30  percent,  resulting  in  a  ROI  of  33  per-
cent  over  36  months.  The  ESMTM’s  performance  is  easily  measured  and 
verifiable. 
• Currently it is estimated that globally the ESMTM’s are reducing electricity use 
each year by 213,000 Mwh and Greenhouse Gas emissions by 255,000 tons. This 
is enough electricity to supply a city with a population of 250,000 people. 

Chairman  Kerry,  we  contend  that  support  from  governments  around  the  world, 
with  the  United  States  taking  the  lead,  is  needed  to  assist  in  the  acceptance  and 
implementation  of  green  technologies  like  the  ESMTM.  We  look  forward  to  working 
with  you,  and  the  Committee,  to  address  this  and  the  many  challenges  facing  us 
so that we all can benefit from green technology. 

Thank you. 

Respectfully submitted, 

GEORGE BURNES, 

President and CEO, 

Smartcool Systems Inc. 

ELECTRICAL ENERGY REDUCTION IN REFRIGERATION AND AIR CONDITIONING 

Ken Landymore, Director of Operations and George Burnes, President and CEO, Smartcool Systems Inc. 

1. Introduction 

In the coming decades, actions to limit greenhouse gas emissions could affect pat-
terns of energy use around the world and alter the level and composition of energy- 
related carbon dioxide emissions by energy source. 

Carbon dioxide is one of the most prevalent greenhouse gases in the atmosphere. 
Anthropogenic (human-caused) emissions of carbon dioxide result primarily from the 
combustion of fossil fuels for energy, and as a result world energy use has emerged 
at the center of the climate change debate. 
2. Carbon Dioxide Emissions 

The U.S. Energy Information Authority 1 projects that world carbon dioxide emis-
sions will increase from 25,028 million metric tons in 2003 to 33,663 million metric 
tons  in  2015  and  43,676  million  metric  tons  in  2030.  Much  of  the  growth  occurring 
in Asia (see Figure 1 & 2). 

1 Energy Information Administration Office of Integrated Analysis & Forecasting (2006) Inter-

national Energy Outlook 2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

l

s
p
e
.
1
o
o
c
1
2
6

63 

When most people consider carbon dioxide emissions, they think of large factories, 

forms of transportation and burning both man made and through forest fires. 

Most people would be surprised to learn that electricity actually causes more car-

bon dioxide emissions than all other anthropogenic sources; 

According  to  the  Energy  Industry  Administration 2 in  the  United  States,  elec-

tricity generates 39 percent of the total anthropogenic carbon dioxide emissions. 

These emissions are expected to grow by almost 45 percent over the next 25 years 

and grow to 42 percent of the total carbon dioxide emissions. 

2 Energy  Information  Administration  Office  of  Integrated  Analysis  &  Forecasting  (2006)  An-

nual Energy Outlook 2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

l

s
p
e
.
3
o
o
c
1
2
6

l

s
p
e
.
2
o
o
c
1
2
6

64 

3. Greenhouse Gas Reduction 

In order to reduce the production of greenhouse gases, it is reasonable to assume 
that we should focus on the reduction of emissions in both electricity and transpor-
tation. 

As  most  people  are  aware,  the  result  of  continuing  and  increasing  pressure  from 
geo-political events, environmental lobby groups and governments around the world 
is  an  accelerating  global  demand  to  reduce  the  dependence  on  fossil-fueled  elec-
tricity.  International  treaties  such  as  the  ‘‘Kyoto  Accord’’  have  resulted  in  many 
countries  formally  committing  to  significantly  reduce  greenhouse  gas  emissions. 
Even  countries  such  as  the  United  States  that  have  not  formally  signed  onto  the 
‘‘Kyoto Accord’’ have introduced their own plans to aggressively reduce ‘‘greenhouse 
gas’’ emissions. Recent geo-political instability in major fossil fuel-producing regions 
has  only  served  to  increase  public  demand  to  reduce  dependence  on  fossil-fueled 
electricity. 
4. Energy Usage 

What  makes  this  a  bigger  challenge  than  most  would  think  is  that  our  depend-
ence  on  energy  is  increasing.  World  energy  consumption 3 is  projected  to  increase 
by 71 percent from 2003 to 2030. Fossil fuels continue to supply much of the energy 
used worldwide, and oil remains the dominant energy source. 

Trends  in  end-use  sector  energy  consumption  can  vary  widely,  according  to  the 
level  and  pace  of  economic  development  in  a  given  region.  On  a  worldwide  basis, 
energy  demand  in  the  industrial  sector  grows  most  rapidly,  at  an  average  rate  of 
2.4 percent per year. Slower growth is projected for the buildings sectors: residential 
energy  use  rises  by  an  average  of  1.7  percent  per  year  and  commercial  energy  use 
by 1.8 percent per year from 2003 to 2030 for the world as a whole. 

3 Energy Information Administration Office of Integrated Analysis & Forecasting (2006) Inter-

national Energy Outlook 2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

l

s
p
e
.
4
o
o
c
1
2
6

65 

All of this is surprising when you consider the efforts to reduce greenhouse gases 

will require the reduction of emissions caused by them. 
5. Electricity Use Reduction 

There are two ways to reduce the emissions caused by electricity. The first would 
be  to  use  more  renewable  energy  sources  like  wind  and  solar  power.  The  second  is 
to reduce the amount of electricity we are using around the world. 

According to the U.S. Department of Energy 4, the largest single use for electricity 
is lighting (27 percent) followed by cooling (refrigeration and air conditioning) at 15 
percent.  In  countries  with  higher  ambient  temperatures,  the  usage  in  air  condi-
tioning will be significantly higher, likely coming much closer to the percentage rep-
resented by lighting in the U.S. 

There has been a great deal of development in the lighting field to reduce energy, 
however, in the area of A/C and Refrigeration, most of the development has resulted 
in  expensive  and  complex  systems  requiring  highly  skilled  installers  and  program-
mers. The cost of these systems prohibited the installation by most small to medium 
consumers  and  even  larger  businesses  have  been  challenged  to  justify  the  expense. 

4 Energy  Information  Administration  Office  of  Integrated  Analysis  &  Forecasting  (2006)  An-

nual Energy Outlook 2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

l

s
p
e
.
6
o
o
c
1
2
6

l

s
p
e
.
5
o
o
c
1
2
6

66 

6. Air Conditioning and Refrigeration Challenge 

In  air  conditioning  and  refrigeration  systems,  the  compressor  is  the  largest  con-
sumer  of  electricity,  in  most  cases  consuming  about  70  percent  of  the  total  elec-
tricity.  Reducing  the  amount  of  time  the  compressor  runs  will  substantially  reduce 
the amount of energy used. 

The  refrigeration  cycle  is  dynamic  and  changing.  From  the  time  the  compressor 
commences  to  run  until  it  stops,  the  suction  pressure,  evaporator  temperature,  the 
rate  of  heat  exchange,  refrigerant  flow,  and  many  other  factors  are  continuously 
changing.  The  total  efficiency  of  the  system  changes  through  the  entire  life  cycle. 
The  majority  of  modern  controls  concentrate  on  the  conditioned  space  tempera-
ture,  the  chilled  water  temperature  or  suction  pressure.  The  compressors  are 
switched on in a response to call for cooling and will operate until that demand for 
cooling  is  satisfied.  To  avoid  rapidly  and  repeatedly  switching  the  compressors  on 
and  off  (short  cycling)  which  will  cause  damage  to  the  compressors,  the  control 
bands  are  usually  set  with  a  minimum  differential  of  approximately  4  PSI  or  5°  F. 
In many cases the compressor control differential is greater than this. 

The compressors capacity to remove heat is directly proportional to the operating 
temperature. That is, the higher the controlled temperature, the higher the suction 
temperature (evaporator temperature), the faster the rate of heat removal. 
of suction temperature to reduce the temperature from 50° to 41°. 

For  example,5 Figure  8  shows  the  compressor  cooling  capacity  at  each  1.8  degree 

5 Sydney Seaworld Study conducted by the University of Technology, Sydney. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

l

s
p
e
.
7
o
o
c
1
2
6

67 

When  the  compressor  first  starts  at  the  high  limit  point  it  will  be  operating  at 
maximum efficiency with a high suction pressure. As the conditioned space tempera-
ture  is  reduced,  the  suction  pressure  reduces  and  compressor  capacity  is  reduced. 
Therefore  each  degree  of  temperature  reduction  takes  a  longer  period  of  time  and 
uses substantially more electricity. 

minutes and 1.84 kWh. 

Looking  at  the  example  in  Table  1,6 Reducing  from  50°  to  48.2°  takes  only  6.6 
Reducing from 42.8° to 41° takes 14.4 minutes and 3.57 kWh. 
The last 1.8 degree of pull down used almost twice the energy and time. 

6 Sydney Seaworld Study conducted by the University of Technology, Sydney. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

l

s
p
e
.
9
o
o
c
1
2
6

l

s
p
e
.
8
o
o
c
1
2
6

68 

This example uses only a ± 4.5° F suction temperature differential. Even with this 
small  control  band  there  is  a  significant  difference  in  energy  consumption  between 
the first one point eight-degree reduction and the last one point eight-degree reduc-
tion. 

Figure  9 7 illustrates  the  percentage  of  energy  used  per  degree.  The  last  degree 

of pull down used 28 percent of the total energy for the cycle. 

Eliminating  the  last  1.8  degrees,  that  is  start  at  50  °F  and  stop  at  42.8  °F  pro-
viding  a  differential  of  7.2  °F,  reduces  energy  consumption  by  28  percent.  Unfortu-
nately this increases the mid-point temperature from 45.5 °F to 47.3 °F. 
7. Air Conditioning and Refrigeration Solution 

Smartcool  Systems  Inc.  is  an  advanced  energy  conservation  solutions  company 
that specializes in energy and cost reduction technologies for commercial and retail 
businesses.  The  company’s  wholly  owned  subsidiary,  Smartcool  International  Inc., 
is the owner, developer, manufacturer and worldwide distributor of the Energy Sav-
ing Module (ESM)TM. 

The  Energy  Saving  Module  System  4000TM is  designed  specifically  to  reduce  the 
electricity consumption (kwh) and maximum demand (Kw/KVA) of refrigeration and 
air  conditioning  compressors  by  improving  their  performance  and  maintaining  tem-
perature control. 

The Energy Saving ModulesTM are designed to interface with all types and makes 
of  air  conditioning  and  refrigeration  controllers  from  the  simple  thermostat  single 
condensing  systems  to  the  most  sophisticated  computer  based  multiple  compressor 
parallel systems. 

The Energy Savings Module System 4000TM is not a controller. It is a supplement 
to  the  existing  system—designed  to  work  with  the  existing  A/C  and  Refrigeration 
equipment  along  with  current  control  methodology—to  reduce  the  consumption  of 
energy.  When  a  call  for  cooling  comes  from  the  existing  control  the  ESM  4000TM 
takes  over  to  determine  when  and  for  how  long  each  compressor  or  unloader  will 
run. 

Because  the  primary  control  is  not  replaced,  at  any  time,  the  ESM  4000TM can 
be  put  into  bypass  and  the  system  returns  to  operating  exactly  as  it  was  prior  to 
the  installation.  This  is  an  important  distinction  for  system  repairs  and/or  trouble-
shooting. 

The ESM System 4000TM enables the compressor to maximize the rate of heat re-
moval  by  optimizing  the  natural  physical  properties  of  the  compressor  operating 
cycle.  This  process,  known  as  ‘‘Compressor  Optimization’’  can  reduce  compressor 
running time by up to 30 percent with no affect on the temperature conditions. 

7 Sydney Seaworld Study conducted by the University of Technology, Sydney. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

l

.

s
p
e
0
1
o
o
c
1
2
6

69 

Figure  10  demonstrates  how  the  ESMTM has  no  appreciable  impact  on  the  con-
trolled space temperature. Many other technologies like floating setpoint will impact 
the temperature. 

Through the use of copyright software, the ESMTM manages the suction pressure 
of the refrigeration or air conditioning system in order to cool more efficiently. This 
is illustrated in figure 11. 

By controlling the suction temperature or pressure over a narrow band, it is pos-
sible to maximize the compressor performance, increase cooling capacity by as much 
as 30 percent and achieving compressor optimization. 

s
p
e

.

l

2
1
o
o
c
1
2
6

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

l

.

s
p
e
1
1
o
o
c
1
2
6

70 

Having  two  modes,  the  ESM  System  4000TM can  operate  in  Simplex  for  single 
compressor  applications  and  in  Multiplex  for  multi-compressor  parallel  racks  and 
packaged  units.  Additionally,  through  our  intelligent  interface  module,  even  the 
most  complex  chiller  packages  can  benefit  from  the  implementation  of  the  ESMTM. 
In March 1998, the Los Angeles Department of Water & Power conducted a study 
of the Smartcool product in a live field test. The results were that: the average kWh 
saving, for comparable days, is in the range of 20 to 24 percent; the unit is capable 
of reducing the operating time of the compressors of the refrigeration system, which 
reduces the energy consumption of the compressors and saves electric billing dollars; 
and  the  compressors  were  turned  on  and  turned  off  more  often  during  the  ‘‘ON’’ 
time when the unit is in saving mode. The number of cycles per hour was registered 
at 3 to 4 cycles per hour, which is in the safe range of cycles for a compressor. 

Oakridge  National  Labs  which  is  part  of  the  U.S.  Department  of  Energy  con-
ducted  several  studies  of  the  ESMTM during  2004.  The  results  were  indicated  to  be 
the  reduction  of  compressor  kWh  usage  of  11.87  percent  for  total  test  period  and 
18.1 percent for high load test period. 

Smartcool’s  services  are  utilised  by  some  of  the  worlds  leading  corporations  par-

ticularly in the commercial, retail and food service areas. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

l

.

s
p
e
3
1
o
o
c
1
2
6

71 

A  test  initiated  by  Tesco  UK 8 where  two  stores  were  tested  for  a  4-week  period, 
resulted  in  between  17  and  21  percent  energy  reduction  Tesco  concluded  that:  the 
ESMTM has  again  proven  substantial  energy  savings  under  test  conditions  and  will 
deliver  a  return  on  investment  well  within  the  3  year  limit  set;  these  savings  pro-
vide substantial financial and environmental benefits to Tesco; and all savings have 
been made without detrimental effect to plant operating criteria. 

Similarly,  Telstra,  the  Australian  telephone  company  commissioned  a  test 9 on 
their  central  office  locations.  The  results  were  that:  the  evaluation  clearly  dem-
onstrated an overall reduction in electricity consumption of 30 percent when the En-
ergy  Saving  Module  System  4000TM was  operating;  this  reduction  resulted  in  a 
straight-line return on investment of 33 percent or 36 months; and the total number 
of compressor starts increased by only 3 per day when the ESMTM was on, however 
the compressor running time was reduced by 36 percent. The benefits of the reduced 
compressor running would exceed any adverse effect of the increased starts. Telstra 
stated  that  this  evaluation  has  comprehensively  shown  the  ESM  System  4000TM to 
be  a  cost  effective  and  reliable  energy  management  tool  whose  performance  can  be 
easily measured and verified. 

Since  1992,  over  25,000  Energy  Saving  ModulesTM have  been  sold  or  installed 
worldwide.  In  that  time,  Smartcool  products  have  reduced  electricity  consumption 
by  1.2  million  Mwh,  eliminating  over  1.4  million  tons  of  greenhouse  gas  emissions. 
Currently it is estimated that worldwide the Energy Saving ModulesTM are reduc-
ing  electricity  use  each  year  by  213,000  Mwh  and  Greenhouse  Gas  emissions  by 
255,000  Tons.  This  is  enough  electricity  to  supply  a  city  with  a  population  of 
250,000 people. 
8. What Is Needed? 

For  the  Kyoto  accord  and  other  greenhouse  gas  emission  reduction  initiatives  to 
work, it is important for a number of areas to focus on both clean power alternatives 
and reducing the reliance and use of existing power sources. 

Support from governments around the world is needed to assist in the acceptance 
and  implementation  of  technologies  like  the  ESM  4000TM.  This  could  come  in  the 
form of grants, funding, and low interest loans to Companies who adopt these tech-
nologies.  Additionally,  legislation  that  enforces  business  and  residential  to  reduce 
their power usage will ensure we can meet the aggressive targets we are committed 
to. 

8 Steven  Martin  (2003)  Report  On  The  Performance  Of  The  Energy  Saving  Module  For  Tesco 

Express At Maida Vale & Fulham. 

9 Transfield  Services  (2002)  ESM  Evaluation—Dalley  Street  Telephone  Exchange—September 

2002. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

l

.

s
p
e
4
1
o
o
c
1
2
6

72 

Secondly, the Utilities that provide these power services must also embrace tech-
nologies such as these. Many of the U.S. Utilities provide rebates to Customers who 
install these technologies. This improves the return on investment for the Customer, 
but  also  reduces  the  cost  of  infrastructure  that  the  utility  would  otherwise  be  re-
quired to build. This may also be another source for low interest loans to Companies 
who install these. 

Additionally,  industry  must  embrace  these  technologies.  With  a  strong  return  on 
investment  of  between  24  and  36  months,  there  exists  a  strong  financial  business 
case  for  these  products.  More  importantly,  the  strong  environmental  case  needs  to 
be accepted as the responsibility of all Companies and citizens of the world. 

Ultimately, it will take all of us to meet the need for reduction of fossil-fuel energy 

dependence. 
References 

[1]  Energy  Information  Administration  Office  of  Integrated  Analysis  &  Fore-

casting (2006) International Energy Outlook 2006. 

[2]  Energy  Information  Administration  Office  of  Integrated  Analysis  &  Fore-

casting (2006) Annual Energy Outlook 2006. 

[3]  Sydney  Seaworld  Study  conducted  by  the  University  of  Technology,  Sydney. 
[4]  Transfield  Services  (2002)  ESM  Evaluation—Dalley  Street  Telephone  Ex-

change—September 2002. 

[5] Steven Martin (2003) Report On The Performance Of The Energy Saving Mod-

ule For Tesco Express At Maida Vale & Fulham. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JACK HE´ BERT, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

COLD CLIMATE HOUSING RESEARCH CENTER 

Introduction 

I  would  like  to  thank  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  Subcommittee 
Chairman  Kerry,  Ranking  Member  Ensign,  and  the  Members  of  the  Subcommittee 
on  Science,  Technology,  and  Innovation  for  the  opportunity  to  address  the  issue  of 
energy efficient technology and programs. I apologize that I was not able to present 
this in person but my schedule would not allow it. 

Although  there  is  not  a  firm  consensus  on  the  exact  figures,  there  is  agreement 
between builders and researchers that buildings account for a significant amount of 
the  United  States  energy  consumption.  The  energy  usage  is  divided  almost  equally 
between residential buildings and commercial buildings (Source: Annual Energy Re-
view 2003. DOE/EIA–0384 (2003). Energy Information Administration, U.S. Depart-
ment of Energy, September 2003.) 

With proper planning, most developments and buildings today can be designed to 
use  much  less  energy  at  little  additional  cost.  Attention  to  siting,  building  form, 
glass  properties  and  location,  material  selection  and  the  incorporation  of  natural 
heating,  cooling,  ventilation,  and  day-lighting  are  among  the  strategies  available  to 
achieve  this  end.  Through  the  application  of  the  most  current  research,  the  energy 
needed  by  a  building,  a  development  or  a  community,  can  be  supplied  or  supple-
mented  by  renewable  sources  such  as  solar,  photovoltaic,  wind,  biomass,  and  other 
viable sources. All of these strategies incorporate energy efficiency and conservation 
to  produce  the  most  effectively-sustainable  buildings  and  homes  for  the  Nation  and 
beyond. 

In  Alaska,  energy  efficiency  is  important  for  our  very  economic  viability  and  sur-
vival, especially in our homes and buildings. To that end, the Cold Climate Housing 
Research Center (CCHRC) is currently engaged in research, demonstration projects, 
and in product testing and development to provide healthy, durable housing that is 
affordable  and  energy  efficient—in  a  word,  sustainable.  Our  research  has  made 
clear  those  areas  where  the  Federal  Government  can  help  support  the  research  in 
the  development  of  building  technologies  that  use  much  less  energy  in  the  near 
term,  with  the  goal  of  our  Nation’s  building  stock  being  more  efficient  in  construc-
tion and operation. It should also be noted that Alaska’s needs are indicative of the 
needs  for  energy  systems  in  many  under-developed  regions  of  the  world.  Systems 
deployed  successfully  in  Alaska  will  have  applications  in  many  parts  of  the  world, 
opening  new  markets  for  innovative  American  businesses.  Additionally,  experience 
with  new  technologies  in  remote  Alaska  settings  will  be  applicable  for  growing  the 
use of distributed-generation technologies in the lower 48 states’ power grid. 

If U.S. building energy usage is halved or even approaches zero in the foreseeable 
future,  this  will  have  a  major  impact  on  national  energy  security  and  the  sustain-
ability of our communities—not to mention the fuel bills of home and business own-
ers! In this effort, CCHRC is leading by example. Our new Building and Infrastruc-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

ture  Research  and  Testing  Facility  (RTF)  is  designed  to  use  60  percent  less  energy 
than a conventional building of comparable size and function in Fairbanks, Alaska. 
CCHRC is also working to reduce fossil fuel use even further by using bio-fuels and 
solar energy systems. 

Included  here  are  six  aspects  of  work  that  CCHRC  is  doing  to  reduce  energy 
usage in Alaska and recommendations for how the Federal Government can further 
that work: 
I. Private Sector Collaboration—CCHRC Examples 

In  1999,  the  Alaska  State  Home  Building  Association,  representing  over  1,000 
building  industry  members,  and  itself  a  member  of  the  National  Association  of 
Home Builders, recognized the need to conduct research, test, and develop materials 
and  technologies  appropriate  to  northern  climates.  To  this  end,  the  members  com-
mitted  to  the  creation  of  the  Cold  Climate  Housing  Research  Center,  a  501(c)(3) 
nonprofit  entity,  whose  mission  is:  promoting  and  advancing  the  development  of 
healthy,  durable  and  sustainable  shelter  for  Alaskans  and  circumpolar  people 
through applied research. Four years after its start, the CCHRC Board of Directors 
authorized  construction  of  a  facility  to  house  the  testing  and  product  development 
labs  needed  to  accomplish  its  mission.  The  charge  is  clear:  research,  test,  and  de-
velop,  if  necessary,  the  materials  and  technologies  to  provide  healthy,  durable,  and 
economically sound housing for the people of Alaska and other northern locales. 

CCHRC’s  nonprofit  status  allows  it  to  establish  collaborations  with  both  private 
and public sector partners. CCHRC is located on the campus of America’s only Arc-
tic  university,  the  University  of  Alaska  Fairbanks  (UAF)  where  the  newly-con-
structed  Research  and  Testing  Facility  (RTF)  is  housed.  CCHRC  works  with  UAF 
faculty and staff to develop joint research proposals. Major funding comes from state 
and  Federal  agencies  that  collaborate  with  many  private  sector  donors  who  con-
tribute  materials,  products,  labor,  and  funds  to  support  the  goals  of  the  RTF. 
CCHRC is also developing relationships with industry partners to help further guide 
and support the product testing and development programs at the RTF. 

Some examples of the collaboration with private sector partners in product testing 

include: 

Wood Products. 

• HVAC digital control systems—Siemens Building Technologies. 
• Insulation—DuPont,  Johns  Manville,  Thermo-Kool,  Western  Insulfoam,  Vertex. 
• Ventilation—Venmar, Lifebreath, Fantech, Solutions to Healthy Breathing. 
• Heating—Weil-McLain, Viesmann, Monitor, Stone Castle Masonry. 
• Windows—Capitol Glass/Northerm Window. 
• Building  materials—Spenard  Builders  Supply,  Mannington  Commercial,  Rivers 
• Data collection and display—GW Scientific, Campbell Scientific. 
CCHRC  also  has  cooperative  agreements  with  such  other  nonprofit  agencies  as: 
• Golden  Valley  Electric  Cooperative—demonstration  of  alternative  energy  sys-
• Interior Alaska Building Association—outreach and continuing education. 
• Alaska Building Science Network—outreach, education, and training. 
• Cooperative Extension Service, UAF—outreach, education, and sustainability. 
• Audubon International—outreach and community sustainability. 

tems and conservation strategies and technologies. 

CCHRC Recommends 

Cooperative programs involving private sector partners need increased funding by 
the  Federal  Government.  Programs  such  as  the  Partnership  for  Advancing  Tech-
nology  in  Housing  (PATH),  Partnerships  for  Home  Energy  Efficiency  (PHEE),  The 
Small  Business  Innovation  Research  (SBIR)  and  the  National  Science  Foundation’s 
Partnerships  for  Innovation  (PFI),  Building  America,  Healthy  Homes,  Weatheriza-
tion,  and  others,  benefit  from  private  sector  partnerships  because  they  have  the 
ability to leverage government funding into grounded projects that address real pri-
vate sector needs. 
II. National Security, Global Warming, Sustainability, and Energy 

To meet growing energy needs, the U.S. imports an ever-increasing percentage of 
its  energy  supply,  in  the  form  of  gas  and  oil,  each  year.  This  creates  an 
unsustainable and unstable situation for national security, environmental concerns, 
and  economic  needs.  It  places  U.S.  energy  security  in  the  hands  of  other  nations, 
fuels  concerns  over  climate  change,  and  may  contribute  to  the  increase  in  dramatic 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

74 

weather events with significant costs in terms of human life and public and private 
funds.  The  U.S.  does  not  have  enough  reserves  of  its  own  to  reverse  the  Nation’s 
supply  shortages  by  simply  increasing  domestic  production.  Development  of  eco-
nomically  and  environmentally  sustainable  energy  efficiency  programs  and  alter-
native  sources  of  energy  is  critical  and  will  require  a  significant  investment.  One 
way  to  reduce  energy  consumption  in  the  built  environment  is  through  efficiency 
and conservation, which takes committing large amounts of both public and private 
resources. 

tainable Community Development. 

CCHRC has undertaken several initiatives to address this situation: 
• CCHRC  Research  and  Testing  Facility  is  designed  to  lead  by  example  using  60 
percent  less  energy  than  a  comparable  building  and  showcasing  several  strate-
gies for energy efficiency, conservation, and alternatives. 
• Audubon  International  has  designated  CCHRC  as  the  Alaska  Center  for  Sus-
• With  the  North-North  Network  and  UAF,  CCHRC  is  working  on  a  Sustain-
ability Initiative to increase the sustainability of the UAF campus and to begin 
an interdisciplinary curriculum in northern sustainable design at UAF. 
• With partners at the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation (AHFC) and the Ca-
nadian Mortgage & Housing Corporation (CMHC), CCHRC is planning a Forum 
on Sustainable Northern Shelter to be held in Fairbanks this October. 
• With  the  Cooperative  Extension  Service  at  UAF,  CCHRC  is  committed  to  find-
ing  solutions  to  community  sustainability  in  rural  Alaska,  especially  housing 
and related systems. 
• With  the  Alaska  Housing  Finance  Corporation  and  the  Alaska  State  Home 
Builders  Association,  CCHRC  has  begun  the  process  of  recasting  the  Alaska 
Building Energy Efficiency Standard in terms of the International Energy Con-
servation Code with the intent that it might be addressed by a statewide build-
ing code review. 

CCHRC Recommends 

The  Federal  Government,  through  programs  at  U.S.  Department  of  Energy,  the 
U.S.  Environmental  Protection  Agency,  the  National  Science  Foundation,  and  the 
U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development must initiate programs aimed 
at  energy  independence.  Part  of  this  effort  must:  (a)  target  energy  use  reduction 
through increased efficiency and conservation in homes and other buildings, and (b) 
develop environmentally-sound energy sources for buildings and communities. Part-
nerships that involve the private sector, along with universities and state agencies, 
are  particularly  well-suited  to  contribute  real  solutions.  National  support  for  trans-
formative  processes  already  underway  by  groups  such  as  the  National  Association 
of  Home  Builders  (NAHB)  and  the  many  state  and  local  groups  focused  on  green 
building will be essential. 
III. Demonstration Projects—The RTF Example 

The  CCHRC  Building  and  Infrastructure  Research  and  Testing  Facility  (RTF)  on 
the University of Alaska Fairbanks campus is designed with transparency in mind. 
CCHRC  encourages  public  tours  of  the  building  and  visits  to  its  website  to  dem-
onstrate how it operates. CCHRC wants to show: 

• how much energy from each source is being utilized, 
• how efficiently and cleanly the energy is consumed, 
• the different ways to heat and cool the building, 
• the better ways to filter indoor air, 
• how wall and window systems are performing, 
• that  the  lighting  strategy  is  providing  maximum  daylight  and  using  minimum 
• that  the  water  system  is  collecting  rainwater,  recycling  grey  water  and  storing 
• How the building is interacting with the permafrost and ground water beneath 

storm water on our green roof; and 

electricity, 

it. 

Over  400  sensors  are  embedded  in  and  beneath  the  building  to  monitor  its  oper-
ation and performance. In addition to housing research, testing and product develop-
ment, the building itself is a multitude of research and testing projects. 

Demonstration  projects  such  as  this  are  important  to  lay  the  foundation  for 
change.  The  public  needs  to  see  that  efficient  strategies  exist  and  that  they  work. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

75 

Essentially,  people  need  to  be  able  to  ‘‘kick  the  tires’’  before  they  will  ‘‘buy’’  new 
ways to design communities, get to work and play, and build and live in homes and 
office buildings that consume much less energy. 

CCHRC  has  an  agreement  with  Golden  Valley  Electric  Cooperative  to  dem-
onstrate  alternative  energy  systems,  such  as  solar,  wind,  bio-fuel,  and  hybrid  sys-
tems  at  the  RTF.  The  Fairbanks  North  Star  Borough  is  also  funding  a  project  in 
the  facility  to  demonstrate  the  use  of  several  clean-burning,  wood-fired  heating  ap-
pliances with the goal of making the building produce more energy than it uses. 

The  success  of  the  RTF  as  a  demonstration  project  is  remarkable.  CCHRC  has 
had  so  many  requests  for  public  tours  that  it  has  had  to  set  up  a  regular  public 
tour  schedules  on  Thursday  afternoons.  CCHRC  has  had  a  steady  interest  from 
UAF faculty and students in proposing joint research projects. CCHRC has also had 
many  requests  to  test  products,  even  though  it  is  not  yet  set  up  to  do  so.  Finally, 
CCHRC  fields  frequent  calls  from  future  homeowners  seeking  advice  about  a  piece 
of equipment or a certain approach to building. Obviously, there is substantial pub-
lic interest in building better shelter. 
CCHRC Recommends 

Demonstration  projects  are  important  elements  to  facilitate  change  for  efficiency 
in  the  building  community.  Even  if  the  technology  is  well  proven  to  scientists  and 
engineers, it is still crucial to educate builders and owners about better ways to de-
sign  and  construct  buildings.  The  Federal  Government  must  vigorously  fund  and 
support  state  and  local  efforts  to  demonstrate  products  and  technologies  that  can 
make this change happen. 
IV. Alternative Energy Projects at CCHRC 

One  of  CCHRC’s  important  goals  is  to  test,  develop,  and  demonstrate  alternative 
energy  solutions.  Some  of  the  technologies  are  built  into  the  RTF  and  some  await 
future  funding  to  be  implemented.  However,  some  alternative  energy  projects  are 
already underway or are on the drawing board and they include: 

Masonry Heater Project: The first thing one sees when entering the RTF is a beau-
tiful, natural rock fireplace called a masonry heater. It has an enclosed firebox, like 
a woodstove with a glass door, and a massive rock edifice like an old-fashioned fire-
place. The flue does not, however, go straight up the chimney as it would in a stove 
or fireplace; rather, it is convoluted throughout the masonry so that the heat of the 
fire  can  be  transferred  to  the  rock  and  brick.  In  this  way,  one  hot  fire  per  day  can 
provide  enough  constant  radiant  heat  to  warm  an  average  house  throughout  the 
cold  Fairbanks  winter.  This  technology  was  first  developed  in  China  and  Greece 
long  ago  and  was  widely  used  in  15th  century  northern  Europe.  Because  the  fire 
is so hot (reaching 2,000 degrees F) it burns very cleanly compared to a conventional 
wood  stove  or  fireplace.  The  RTF  heater  is  instrumented  so  that  CCHRC  can  docu-
ment  its  efficiency  and  emissions  levels.  The  heater’s  massive  size  and  associated 
cost  are  drawbacks  to  widespread  use  of  masonry  heaters  in  homes,  yet  CCHRC 
plans to work toward developing lower cost versions as options for people who want 
to burn wood in the most efficient and environmentally sound manner. 

Wood  Energy  Project:  The  wild  land  fires  in  the  interior  of  Alaska  pose  both  a 
challenge  and  an  opportunity.  A  primary  way  to  reduce  the  risk  to  settlements  in 
and adjacent to these vast forested regions is to reduce the fire fuel-load by clearing 
fire breaks around individual structures as well as along entire ridge lines. This pre-
sents an opportunity to develop local economic enterprises utilizing the bio-fuel that 
otherwise would be wasted. If a sufficiently robust industry can be developed using 
this  ‘‘waste  wood,’’  it  could  help  fund  the  continued  creation  of  firebreaks  around 
the vulnerable areas of the Fairbanks North Star Borough. 

The Fairbanks North Star Borough has funded a project to research, develop and 
test a variety of wood-burning technologies and products that could be the basis for 
local enterprises. These technologies range over a wide scale of complexity and size 
from  ordinary  wood  stoves  and  pellet  stoves  to  masonry  heaters  and  village-scale 
combined heat and power units. Perhaps the most compelling need is to develop the 
technology  for  building  combined  heat  and  power  (CHP)  generators  in  villages  in 
rural  Alaska  where  the  price  of  fuel  oil  and  electricity  is  threatening  their  very  ex-
istence.  This  project  will  evaluate  the  technological  options  for  providing  the  fuel 
source,  processing  it,  and  feeding  it  into  a  CHP  boiler.  CCHRC  will  provide  some 
of  these  critical  evaluations,  testing  and  demonstration  links  in  establishing  new 
and  sustainable  local  enterprises.  In  addition  the  project  will  develop  and  test  the 
cleanest  wood  burning  technologies  available  so  as  to  minimize  the  impact  on  the 
urban air shed in Fairbanks. 

Solar-Thermal  Demonstration  Project:  Utilizing  the  sun  to  heat  domestic  hot 
water  is  practical  in  Fairbanks,  Alaska  for  about  8  months  out  of  the  year.  Solar- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

76 

heated  domestic  water  systems  have  reasonable  payback  periods  even  though  they 
are only usable for part of the year. They also may allow oil-fired boilers to be shut 
down  for  several  months,  thereby  eliminating  the  worst  period  of  standby  losses. 
These systems are particularly well suited for visitor industry facilities that only op-
erate seasonally. 

CCHRC plans to test evacuated-tube and flat plate solar hot water collectors and 
integrate  this  system  into  its  Viesmann  Boiler  domestic  hot  water  system.  CCHRC 
collaborated with the Golden Valley Electric Association and the Cooperative Exten-
sion  Service  to  offer  a  technical  training  class  in  the  installation  of  solar  hot  water 
collection  systems  which  featured  hands-on  training  to  install  these  systems  in  the 
RTF.  The  system  will  be  instrumented  so  that  performance  and  cost-effectiveness 
can be demonstrated in an on-going manner to a broader audience via the Internet. 
Solar  Photovoltaic  Hybrid  Demonstration  Project:  The  Cold  Climate  Housing  Re-
search Center has proposed to partner with British Petroleum (BP) and Alaska Na-
tive  corporations  on  a  project  to  develop  a  sustainable  solar  power  system  that 
works  in  circumpolar  regions.  The  project  will  be  based  at  CCHRC’s  Research  and 
Testing  Facility.  The  ‘‘Beyond  Petroleum’’—Integrating  Solar  Energy  in  Rural  Alas-
kan  Communities  Research  Project  will  benefit  many  communities  in  the  circum-
polar  regions.  Many  rural  circumpolar  communities  face  ever-increasing  energy 
costs  due  to  being  off  the  grid  and  the  rising  costs  of  fuel  transport.  The  RTF  is 
a  perfect  site  for  testing  northern  solar  power  systems  and  developing  Alaskan  ex-
pertise in solar system design, installation and maintenance to benefit Alaskan vil-
lages. The Fairbanks climate offers the full range of weather conditions for cold cli-
mate testing and performance evaluation of products, systems and techniques. 

The purpose of this project is to design, install, and operate a micro-hybrid power 
system. It will consist of 15 KW of PV solar panels, battery banks, AC and DC cou-
pled  inverters  with  capability  to  tie  into  the  GVEA  grid,  and  a  back-up  generator. 
A  web-based  data  acquisition  component  will  be  incorporated  allowing  researchers 
to share results. The system will feature: (a) testing of several different solar/micro- 
grid  configurations,  (b)  the  potential  to  incorporate  other  energy  technologies  (bio- 
diesel, fuel cells, bio-mass etc.), (c) robust data collection, and (d) education, research 
and outreach components, including an interactive ‘‘Solar on the Web’’ feature. 
CCHRC Recommends 

These  critical  research,  development,  and  demonstration  projects  usually  involve, 
in one way or another, the donation of equipment, materials, and labor from private 
sector partners. This important private sector contribution should be encouraged by 
offering  tax  incentives.  Congress  should  consider  tax  incentives  that  would  encour-
age more investment by private sector partners that work on projects to shift away 
from  fossil  fuels  to  alternative,  environmentally  sound  energy  sources.  By  utilizing 
private sector partners in this way, the burden of developing and expanding critical 
research  in  efficiency  programs  is  not  shouldered  solely  by  industry  or  government 
alone. 

A  strong  Federal  and  state  partnership  to  develop  and  demonstrate  new  energy- 
saving,  energy-generation  and  transmission  technologies  is  clearly  warranted.  Such 
an  investment  would  not  only  serve  Alaska’s  residents,  but  also  help  to  develop  a 
market for American technologies by inviting the developing world to see how Amer-
ica  is  solving  its  energy  needs  for  its  rural  and  remote  regions.  Alaska  could  easily 
become America’s showcase for distributed power generating technologies. 
V. DOE Building America in Alaska 

CCHRC  was  funded  by  two  grants  under  the  Department  of  Energy’s  Building 
America  program.  Some  of  CCHRC’s  work  began  with  funding  from  the  second 
grant  and  has  been  carried  forward  with  funds  from  Alaska  Housing  Finance  Cor-
poration.  These  grants  have  led  to  important  advances  in  basic  envelope  design  in 
Alaskan residential construction, which is called the Residential Exterior Membrane 
Outside-insulation Technique (REMOTE), or REMOTE technique. 

Building America in Alaska I: CCHRC, the U.S. Department of Energy, and Alas-
ka  Housing  Finance  Corporation  (AHFC)  formed  a  Federal/state/industry  partner-
ship to implement the Building America program in Alaska. A Building America in 
Alaska  (BAA)  team  of  building  industry  professionals  from  across  the  state  worked 
with  cold  climate  experts  from  the  Building  Science  Consortium.  The  primary  goal 
of  this  project  was  to  develop  plans  for  energy  efficient,  durable,  healthy,  and  cost 
effective  homes  that  are  affordable  to  moderate-income  Alaskans.  The  team  de-
signed  a  single-family  residential  home  with  modifications  for  each  of  three  major 
climatic  regions/environments  found  in  Alaska.  Building  America  home,  using  the 
CCHRC  design  or  Building  America  technology,  were  constructed  by  Bee  Construc-
tion in North Pole (Interior) and blu-Spruce Construction in Juneau (Southeast) and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

sold  shortly  at  or  near  completion.  The  performance  target  for  these  homes  is  Five 
Star Plus, or the highest level of efficiency. 

77 

A Final Report was delivered to AHFC October 30, 2001, and included the build-
ing  design,  material  list,  construction  costs,  and  performance  testing  and  energy 
modeling  of  the  finished  homes.  CCHRC  staff  worked  with  the  Fairbanks  Chapter 
of  Habitat  for  Humanity  to  utilize  the  Building  America  design  and  technology  in 
other  projects.  The  Builders  Guide:  Cold  Climates,  developed  through  the  Building 
America program, was reviewed by the Alaska team and CCHRC staff, and updates 
were recommended, compiled, and delivered to the Building Science Consortium. 

Building  America  in  Alaska  II:  CCHRC’s  second  grant  from  the  Department  of 
Energy  was  awarded  for  a  State  Energy  Program  Special  Project  to  continue  work 
on the Building America in Alaska program. The goals were: (1) to develop builder’s 
education  courses  on  BAA  approaches  to  residential  construction  and  to  continue 
education and promotion of Building America techniques to the Alaskan home build-
ing  industry;  (2)  to  test  and  monitor  the  Building  America  houses  constructed  in 
Alaska in 2001 and assess their performance; and (3) to develop a Building America 
strategy  to  address  the  cold,  wet  climate  of  Southeast  Alaska  which  includes  con-
struction  of  a  test  module  for  checking  wall  panels  for  moisture,  durability  and  en-
ergy  efficiency.  Within  this  project,  the  CCHRC  Mobile  Test  Lab  (MTL)  was  con-
structed  in  North  Pole  and  shipped  to  Juneau  in  January  2003.  Students  of  Con-
struction  Technology  at  the  University  of  Alaska  SE  built  and  monitored  various 
wall  systems  in  the  test  module  for  a  year.  The  wall  built  with  the  REMOTE  tech-
nique  out  performed  other  wall  sections  in  terms  of  drying.  The  MTL  was  later  re- 
fitted  with  new  wall  panels,  new  equipment,  and  continues  to  be  monitored  under 
funding from AHFC. 

REMOTE Wall: The REMOTE technique combines an outside insulation wall en-
velope  system  with  more  conventional  roof  and  foundation  envelopes  to  maximize 
the benefits of both systems. An impermeable membrane is attached to the exterior 
of the wall’s sheathing with foam insulation exterior to that. This membrane is then 
tied  to  an  interior  vapor  barrier  for  the  roof  and  foundation  of  the  structure.  The 
benefit  of  this  system  is  that  condensation  within  the  building  envelope  is  elimi-
nated along with all the associated moisture problems. Nine wall systems were test-
ed  in  Juneau  utilizing  the  Mobile  Test  Lab.  Of  the  nine  walls  tested,  the  best  per-
forming  wall  was  the  REMOTE  wall.  The  REMOTE  wall  offered  the  most  reliable 
results to the drying of built-in moisture and had the lowest recorded moisture con-
tent  in  the  sheathing,  framing  and  bottom  plate  at  the  conclusion  of  the  testing. 
During  intentional  wetting  experiments  in  which  moisture  was  introduced  to  the 
wall  cavity,  the  empty  cavities  dried  in  days,  the  fiberglass  filled  cavities  dried  in 
weeks,  and  the  foam-filled  cavities  did  not  dry  during  the  experiment.  This  shows 
that the fundamental design where all of the insulation is on the outside of the wall 
is the most robust for eliminating moisture problems. 

In  September  2005,  the  Tlingit-Haida  Regional  Housing  Authority  (THRHA)  re-
ceived an award in recognition for its development and application of innovative ap-
proaches and best practices in housing and community development at the U.S. De-
partment  of  Housing  and  Urban  Development’s  (HUD)  National  Indian  Housing 
Summit.  The  work  involved  an  application  of  the  REMOTE  wall.  THRHA  was  one 
of  six  housing  organizations  from  around  the  country  to  receive  one  of  the  pres-
tigious  awards.  In  addition,  THRHA  was  recognized  for  its  partnerships  with 
CCHRC,  the  University  of  Alaska  Southeast  Construction  Technology  Department, 
and  Southeast  Alaska  Building  Industry  Association  for  exploring  new  building 
techniques and materials suitable to Southeast Alaska’s climate. 
CCHRC Recommends 

The U.S. Department of Energy’s Building America program has been very impor-
tant  for  developing  and  demonstrating  improved  building  techniques.  Greater  focus 
should  be  given  to  energy  efficiency  and  conservation  in  buildings  within  this  pro-
gram.  The  program  should  also  be  expanded  with  funding  to  ensure  its  availability 
in  all  of  the  states  with  a  regional  structure,  primarily  so  that  applications  can  be 
considered  in  the  context  of  the  local  region.  Building  America  has  been  very  suc-
cessful  nationwide  and  has  been  embraced  by  NAHB  and  the  homebuilding  indus-
try. 
VI. HUD Healthy Homes and DOE Weatherization 

CCHRC,  the  Alaska  Housing  Finance  Corporation,  University  of  Alaska  Fair-
banks  and  Anchorage,  and  State  of  Alaska  Weatherization  agencies  in  Fairbanks 
and Anchorage partnered on the Healthy Homes in Alaska Project which studied the 
connection  between  indoor  air  quality  (IAQ)  and  asthma  in  children.  CCHRC  has 
also  done  several  other  projects  on  IAQ  and  ventilation  issues,  including  the  mold 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

78 

survey and wildfire smoke remediation studies described below. All of these studies 
are more fully reported at http://www.cchrc.org/completed.html. There is an essen-
tial  connection  between  the  development  of  energy  efficient  buildings  and  ventila-
tion:  as  we  insulate  and  tighten  up  buildings  to  prevent  heat  loss  or  entry,  it  be-
comes  increasingly  important  to  provide  intentional,  mechanical  ventilation  to  sup-
ply fresh air and to control the build-up of moisture in the buildings. The ventilation 
system must be optimized to use the minimum amount of energy and materials con-
sistent  with  the  air  exchange  requirements.  Finally,  outdoor  air  is  not  necessarily 
‘‘fresh,’’ so it is often important to filter the incoming and re-circulated air to obtain 
the best, healthy indoor air quality. 

The  Healthy  Homes  in  Alaska  Project:  This  project  was  designed  to  test  whether 
or not improving the indoor environmental quality of homes for children with asth-
ma  might  improve  their  health.  Only  children  who  lived  in  low-income  homes  were 
eligible, and the parent or guardian of the child was required to own the home. An-
other goal of this project was to increase the capacity of the Low-income Weatheriza-
tion  Program  to  remove  possible  respiratory  hazards  in  the  homes  of  low-income 
people  who  have  children  with  asthma  or  other  upper  respiratory  diseases.  The 
Healthy Homes in Alaska project was conducted in two areas in the state. Fairbanks 
is Alaska’s second largest city and is located in the Interior. Hooper Bay is a larger 
bush community of 1,014 residents on the Bering Sea coastline. These communities 
were selected because they have residents with diagnosed asthma, have an involved 
health  provider  in  the  region,  and  are  generally  representative  of  conditions  and 
housing  stock  throughout  the  state.  The  project  provided  indoor  air  quality  assess-
ment,  health  screenings  of  affected  children,  and  housing  remediation  to  selected 
homes. We identified and studied a total of 36 homes: 10 eligible participants in the 
Fairbanks  area,  9  participants  in  Hooper  Bay,  and  8  and  9  control  homes  in  Fair-
banks and Hooper Bay, respectively. The remediation in the control homes consisted 
of  the  standard  weatherization  items  such  as  improving  insulation,  replacing  win-
dows  and  doors,  sealing  air  leaks,  as  well  as  providing  some  safety  items  such  as 
smoke and CO detectors. In the participants houses the weatherization protocol was 
augmented  by  items  designed  to  remove  possible  asthma  triggers  such  as  moldy 
window  sills,  bedding,  or  furniture.  Some  changes  in  the  home  were  made  to  pre-
vent the moisture and temperature conditions that lead to the growth of mold such 
as  adding  cloths  dryers,  installing  shelving  and  bed  frames  to  improve  air  circula-
tion  by  the  walls  and  floors,  and  installing  quiet  bath  and  kitchen  fans  to  remove 
moist  air  from  the  house.  Qualitatively,  the  clients  in  the  healthy  homes  reported 
improved comfort and health as well as reduced energy bills. While the quantitative 
results of this study were based on a small number of research subjects, and asthma 
is  a  disease  with  multiple  causes,  there  are  some  interesting  suggestive  results:  (1) 
It  is  possible  that  the  homes  of  children  with  asthma  have  higher  levels  of  indoor 
air pollution than the homes of similar people without asthma; and (2) The remedi-
ation  may  have  helped  to  improve  the  pulmonary  function  tests  and  the  IgE  levels 
of asthmatic children, although the numbers from this small a study were not suffi-
cient to reach statistical significance. 

Mold  and  Mildew  Survey:  The  prevalence  of  mold  in  Alaska  Native  housing  is  a 
significant health issue. CCHRC documented over 1,700 residences with mold prob-
lems  in  a  survey  funded  by  HUD.  See  http://www.cchrc.org/completed.html#mold. 
These  instances  varied  from  mild  mildew  around  windows,  in  kitchens,  or  in  bath-
rooms to severe mold development requiring the destruction of the building. CCHRC 
has  been  funded  by  the  Alaska  Housing  Finance  Corporation  to  provide  consulting 
services  to  Alaska  Native  housing  authorities  on  these  and  other  issues  including 
the development of low-cost ventilation systems as adequate ventilation is one of the 
keys to maintaining a healthy, mold-free home. 

Remediation of Wildfire Smoke in Fairbanks Homes: For over 2 weeks in the sum-
mer of 2004, fires around interior Alaska raised the outdoor particulate level signifi-
cantly over EPA’s fine particle standard for PM2.5 of 65µg/m3. The actual figure ex-
ceeded 1,000µg/m3 during part of that period. This study demonstrated a 76–92 per-
cent  improvement  of  indoor  air  quality,  depending  on  method  of  remediation.  See 
http://www.cchrc.org/FANTECH.pdf.  Indoor  air  was  tested  in  houses  pressurized 
with filtered outdoor air, as well as in non-pressurized houses in which the air was 
re-circulated  and  filtered.  Although  residents  of  all  houses  rated  the  improvements 
from ‘‘better’’ to ‘‘very significant,’’ the percentage reduction in fine particulates was 
greatest  in  pressurized  houses.  This  study  has  implications  for  builders  in  areas  in 
which air quality can be hazardous to health, no matter the cause. 
CCHRC Recommends 

The DOE Weatherization programs provide a significant improvement in the older 
housing  stock,  reducing  the  annual  gas  heating  bills  by  an  average  of  32  percent 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

79 

(see  http://www1.eere.energy.gov/officeleere/pdfs/waplfs.pdf).  As  CCHRC  devel-
ops more strategies for retrofitting older houses, the lessons learned by the weather-
ization agencies across the Nation will be increasingly important to incorporate. Im-
provements in the health of children and adults with asthma and other respiratory 
conditions  can  also  be  made  with  the  development  and  application  of  appropriate 
ventilation and filtration standards. 

In  addition  to  the  work  of  CCHRC,  we  are  acutely  aware  of  the  national  focus 
on  energy  consumption  of  buildings,  green  building  and  the  need  for  incentives  to 
promote sustainable building practices. These issues have gained significant promi-
nence in national public policy forums. 
Energy Consumption and Efficiency 

Energy efficiency is the primary focus for many builders and home buyers. While 
many figures are being thrown around these days, the Energy Information Adminis-
tration  (EIA)  estimates  that  buildings  accounted  for  39.4  percent  of  total  U.S.  en-
ergy  consumption  in  2002.  Residential  buildings  accounted  for  54.6  percent  of  that 
total,  while  commercial  buildings  accounted  for  the  other  45.4  percent  (Annual  En-
ergy  Review  2003,  DOE/EIA–0384  (2003)—for  heating,  cooling  and  electric  appli-
ances.  Builders  know  that  building  with  energy  conservation  in  mind  is  both  prac-
tical and profitable. 

Recently,  a  number  of  groups,  including  the  U.S.  Conference  of  Mayors,  have 
joined  with  the  American  Institute  of  Architects  (AIA)  to  support  the  Architecture 
2030  Challenge,  which  suggests  that  buildings  are  the  major  source  of  demand  for 
energy and materials and, incidentally, produce greenhouse gases. The Challenge in-
cludes the goals of: 

• All new buildings must be designed to use 50 percent less fossil fuels. 
• An  equal  amount  of  existing  building  area  must  be  renovated  annually  to  use 
• All  new  buildings  must  be  carbon-neutral  by  2030  i.e.,  uses  no  fossil  fuels  and 

50 percent of the amount of fossil fuel they are currently consuming; and 

emits no greenhouse gases in operation). 

A more detailed look at data provided by the EIA reveals that the 2030 challenge 
has arbitrarily derived the number of ‘‘half’’ of energy consumption and greenhouse 
gases  by  combining  two  categories  for  which  the  EIA  reports  and  creating  a  new 
‘‘buildings’’  category.  Based  on  EIA’s  2000  Annual  Energy  Review,  adding  the  cat-
egories  of  ‘‘Commercial,’’  ‘‘Residential,’’  and  a  portion  of  the  ‘‘Industry’’  categories, 
the  2030  challenge  arrives  at  a  number  of  48  percent.  This  estimate  reflects  a  por-
tion  of  the  industrial  sector  that  is  attributed  to  buildings  because  of  heating,  cool-
ing, etc., but how the AIA arrive at the actual percentage is open to question. 

Older  homes,  for  which  present-day  builders  and  architects  bear  little  responsi-
bility, account for a very large share of residential energy consumption. Single fam-
ily  and  multifamily  units  built  in  the  decade  before  the  Residential  Energy  Con-
sumption  Survey  (RECS)  of  2001  account  for  only  2.5  percent  of  total  energy  con-
sumption in the U.S. Even if each of the new homes built over the 1991–2001 period 
consumed zero energy, it would only have reduced total consumption in the U.S. by 
2.5 percent. Finally, more than half of total residential energy consumption consists 
of energy lost between generation and consumption—that is, energy lost in the proc-
ess  of  producing  and  transmitting  electricity,  rather  than  energy  actually  used  in 
residential structures. This fact illustrates the importance of developing energy pro-
ducing systems within the structures themselves. 
ENERGY STAR and Green Building 

ENERGY STAR is the most prominent of the many voluntary programs builders 
utilize  and  was  the  very  first  program  endorsed  by  the  National  Association  of 
Home  Builders  (NAHB).  ENERGY  STAR homes  meet  specific  energy  efficiency 
guidelines  established  by  the  U.S.  Environmental  Protection  Agency  that  achieve 
notable  energy  savings  above  the  current  energy  standards.  To  date,  more  than  a 
half-million above-code ENERGY STAR homes have been built. 

ENERGY  STAR also  serves  as  a  resource  and  efficiency  benchmark  and  as  an 
integration point for NAHB’s own Model Green Home Building Guidelines. Since the 
1990s,  NAHB  has  been  preparing  for  the  evolution  of  green  building  into  the  main 
stream.  Green  building  means  energy  efficiency,  water  and  resource  conservation, 
sustainable or recycled products, and indoor air quality all incorporated into the ev-
eryday process of home building. 

Published  in  2005,  NAHB’s  Model  Green  Home  Building  Guidelines  (Guidelines) 
were  developed  through  an  extensive  year-long  review  of  existing  programs  and  in-
dustry  best  practices  within  an  open,  consensus-based  process  involving  more  than 
60  industry  stakeholders—including  builders,  researchers,  manufacturers,  environ-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

80 

mentalists,  and  government  agencies.  The  NAHB  Research  Center,  an  American 
National  Standards  Institute  (ANSI)-accredited  standards  developing  organization, 
co-developed  the  Guidelines  with  NAHB.  Due  to  broad  acceptance  by  local  home 
builder associations, the Guidelines will undergo formal consideration procedures to 
become  the  ANSI-accredited  standard  and  serve  as  an  official  ‘‘industry  standard 
practice.’’ 

The Guidelines embody the flexibility that builders need to achieve efficiency and 
conservation  goals  without  meeting  costly  national  or  state-wide  mandates.  Local 
adoption  of  the  Guidelines  allows  builders  to  more  appropriately  address  regional 
and  local  environmental  concerns,  properly  assess  life-cycle  costs  based  on  local 
building  codes  and  climate  zones,  and  encourage  innovation  to  meet  higher  and 
broader energy efficiency objectives. Simply, there is no one-size-fits-all green build-
ing standard. Alaska, North Dakota, Florida, and Maine all have different efficiency 
needs  and  requirements  based  on  their  climate  and  builders  need  the  flexibility  of 
a program like the Guidelines to reach those goals. 

One  popular  green  building  standard  that  is  being  considered  as  a  requirement 
throughout  the  country,  particularly  at  the  state  and  local  level,  is  the  Leadership 
in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED), sponsored by the U.S. Green Building 
Council  (USGBC).  Due  to  its  success  at  mandating  LEED–NC  programs  for  many 
government  facilities,  USGBC  is  currently  offering  a  pilot  program,  LEED–H  for 
homes, to further encourage the penetration of the LEED brand into the private sec-
tor. 

While  many  state  and  local  governing  bodies  have  mandated  the  use  of  LEED, 
some  local  leaders,  e.g.,  in  Boston,  have  recognized  an  important  fact  that  many 
builders  also  recognize:  the  LEED–H  program  is  costly,  requires  many  mandatory 
provisions,  offers  little  flexibility,  and  contains  extensive  implementation  fees  that 
could  cost  a  builder,  and  ultimately  the  public,  from  $12,000  to  $15,000  extra  per 
home.  A  close  analysis  of  NAHB’s  Model  Green  Home  Guidelines  and  USGBC’s 
LEED–H for homes is attached. 

Overall,  at  a  time  when  housing  needs  the  most  innovation  and  most  resources 
spent  on  achieving  resource  and  energy  efficiency,  builders  should  not  be  forced  to 
use  those  resources  for  certification  and  implementation  fees  just  to  comply  with 
costly mandates for programs like LEED–H. Builders need many options and meth-
ods  for  achieving  strides  in  energy  efficiency  and  will  be  sidelined  with  require-
ments, for LEED or otherwise, by any government—state, local, or Federal. 
Tax Incentives for Energy Efficient Housing 

Finally,  another  crucial  way  to  encourage  energy  efficiency  in  housing  is  by  ex-
tending  and  expanding  tax  incentives  that  passed  as  part  of  the  Energy  Policy  Act 
of  2005.  Unlike  spending  programs  or  one-size-fits-all  rules,  tax  provisions  allow 
market  participants—builders,  homeowners,  and  homebuyers—to  marry  the  energy 
incentives with market-determined supply and demand. 

For  example,  the  newly  established  New  Energy  Efficient  Home  Credit  (Section 
45L of the Internal Revenue Code) provides a $2,000 tax credit for the construction 
and sale of a new home which reduces energy use by 50 percent or more. This pro-
gram provides benefits to home buyers and communities by facilitating the construc-
tion  of  new  property  that  takes  advantage  of  the  latest  technology—and  in  a  man-
ner  that  will  work  in  the  marketplace.  Rules  that  simply  eliminate  the  market  for 
new  homes  or  other  property  through  unreasonable  restrictions  do  not  encourage 
the adoption of energy efficient property. In fact, they do the opposite. They encour-
age retention of older, less efficient property. 

Other  examples  of  new  energy  tax  incentives  are  the  energy  efficient  commercial 
building  deduction  (Section  179D),  the  existing  homes  tax  credit  (Section  25C),  and 
the solar credit for residential property (Section 25D). 

Congress  could  improve  the  efficiency  of  these  programs  by  making  them  perma-
nent. Presently, these tax incentives are scheduled to expire over the 2007 and 2008 
period.  This  limited  duration  reduces  the  effectiveness  of  these  programs  as  home 
building in many cases takes months or even a year or more to complete. 
Conclusion 

A  directed  national  effort  must  be  initiated  immediately  to  address  the  global 
issue of unsustainable energy consumption and its many effects. Buildings, land de-
velopment  and  related  infrastructure,  including  electrical  generation,  transpor-
tation,  water  and  wastewater  systems  are  major  factors  to  consider.  Applied  re-
search  and  demonstration  projects  are  very  necessary  components  for  identifying 
and developing technologies and strategies that will move toward effective solutions. 
The  direction  the  Nation  takes  is  dependent  on  the  quality  and  application  of  that 
research. Through a collaborative approach involving industry and the marketplace, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

81 

financial  incentives,  Federal  and  state  regulatory  agencies,  and  most  importantly 
each  individual’s  commitment,  we  can  make  a  positive  change.  The  United  States 
must  lead  this  effort  by  example  to  the  rest  of  the  world.  This  is  an  opportunity 
for the Nation to come together. For the first time there is general agreement about 
the impacts of unrestrained energy use and a real concern for the future. This issue 
can  galvanize  us  as  a  nation  around  a  common  goal  for  the  common  good.  CCHRC 
and the building and research communities of Alaska are prepared to embrace that 
movement. It is our hope that we can be a valuable part of that solution. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:30 Jul 12, 2012 Jkt 074985 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\74985.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

